Authors
Joe Chamberlain
Number of Reviews
89

Title
Review for Exorcist, The (1973)
Starring Ellen Burstyn; Max Von Sydow; Lee J. Cobb; Jason Miller & Linda
Blair
As you can probably glean by the title of the film, The Exorcist revolves
around an exorcism. Specifically, the exorcism of a little girl. When little
Regan (Linda Blair) starts to behave strangely -- like killing family
friends and float in mid-air over her bed -- her mother (Ellen Burstyn)
becomes concerned. Add to that the fact that Regan also claims to be
possessed by the Devil, and it's obvious that the family has a problem on
its hands. Her mother consults every member of the medical profession that
she can think of. None seem to be able to help the little girl, who
continues to get worse. One psychiatrist suggests that Regan's problems may
be more spiritual than mental. Since she thinks that she is possessed, he
suggests that maybe an exorcism might snap her out of it. Little do they
know, she really is sharing her body with something sinister. A Jesuit
priest who works at nearby Georgetown University as a psychiatrist is called
in to examine Regan. He decides that an exorcism is the girl's only hope.
The rest, as they say, is history. More specifically, the rest of the movie
focuses in on the exorcism. At the time, the exorcism scenes were some of
the scariest ever shot.
First let me say that I would like to nominate Ellen Burstyn for the William
Shatner award for overacting. This has got to be one of the worst
performances that I've ever seen in a film (and I've seen Pauley Shore
movies). Quite frankly, I didn't really find any of the characters in this
movie were particularly compelling. Although the performances of the priests
(Max Von Sydow and Jason Miller) who performed the exorcism, and Lee J.
Cobb, who played the police officer investigating the death of the
afore-mentioned deceased family friend, were decent. I have no idea why
Linda Blair became a star over this film. I can find nothing great in her
performance.
The Exorcist looks dated. It was made in the early seventies, and it is
really showing its age. Like most other "classic" horror films, The Exorcist
doesn't exactly fit my definition of a scary film. What might have been
shocking or even frightening nearly 30 years ago doesn't hold up today. The
characters spend far too much time talking about Regan's problems, and very
little time actually doing battle with the thing possessing her. My estimate
is that less than a half an hour is actually spent on things that might
have, at one time, been considered frightening. The only redeeming quality
about The Exorcist is that it involves the very real procedure of the rite
of exorcism. The Roman Catholic Church still practices this ritual to this
day. (In extremely limited circumstances.) I personally have always been
fascinated by this procedure, so some of the movie I found to be
interesting. But I don't generally watch a horror film for the knowledge.
Call me demanding, but I generally like a few scares, or at least a high
amount of tension. The Exorcist has neither.
The only thing that I got out of this movie was a little bit better
understanding of the Catholic Church's rite of exorcism. This is hardly a
compelling reason to recommend a horror film.

Title
Review for Relic, The (1997)
Starring Penelope Ann Miller; Tom Sizemore; Linda Hunt; James Whitmore &
Clayton Rohner
Penelope Ann Miller and Tom Sizemore star in this formula monster flick set
in a museum. Miller stars as a museum curator in the insect department.
Sizemore as a Chicago homicide cop. One of Miller's colleagues has sent an
artifact back to the museum from Africa. He has packed it in palm leaves,
which just happened to be infested with something. On the way back to
Chicago by freighter, that something begins to get a bit bigger and mutate.
It eventually kills everyone on board the ship. When it finally arrives in
Chicago, the killer creature moves into the museum. Which, conveniently
enough, has a large, dark labyrinth of chambers and tunnels. Just the place
for a killer mutated whatever to hide, and that much more difficult for the
police to track it down. Of course, the cops don't know they are on the
trail of a giant killer monster, they think that the deaths on the ship are
the result of a serial killer. Add to that the fact that the museum is just
days away from hosting a big fundraiser that will inevitably lead to a
veritable smorgasbord of human entrees for this big ugly monster.
The whole cast is just going through the motions on this one. They seem to
instinctively know that this isn't a great movie, but rather a pretty
formula one at best. Not even the amazingly talented Linda Hunt
distinguishes herself in this one.
The Relic does have its share of scary moments. Most of the scares come from
the search for the monster in the tunnels under the museum. I'll have to
give the writers credit for setting this film in an old museum, since the
nooks and crannies can make for pretty frightening terrain. The rest of the
writing is pretty much your typical horror film stuff. With the characters
doing the exact opposite of what normal people would do in this situation.
Most people, when they thought that a killer was on the loose in a museum,
would stay they heck away from it. Not these geniuses. They are all
hell-bent on throwing a mighty shindig.
The creature's special effects are nothing special either. It's nothing that
we all haven't seen a dozen times before in monster movies. The Relic is
your average monster movie. Nothing about it distinguishes it from the rest
of the pack. It probably will satisfy some fans of this genre, but most will
be left pretty underwhelmed.

Title
Review for Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade (1989)
Starring Harrison Ford; Sean Connery; Denholm Elliot; Alison Doody & John
Rhys-Davies
How do you make an Indiana Jones film even better? By adding Sean Connery to
the cast. With the one two punch of Harrison Ford and Sean Connery, it is
pretty darn difficult to come up with a bad final product. When you add
Stephen Speilberg as the director and George Lucas as producer and one of
the writers, all the elements are there for a spectacular film experience.
Indiana Jones And The Last Crusade does not disappoint on any level. Other
than the fact that this has long been reputed to be the last film in the
series. One can not be just a little sad that this much talent may never
collaborate again to make another one of these films that really represent
why people love going to the movies.
This time out, Indiana's (Ford) father, Henry Jones (Connery) is working for
a wealthy collector who is financing his life long quest for the Holy Grail.
The Nazis, who are also interested in the Grail, are in competition with
Jones. (I guess they are still ticked off over that whole Lost Ark thing.)
Anyway, Jones goes missing. So son Indiana travels to his fathers last known
location, Venice, to try to find out what happened to his father and also
see if he can't complete his father's search for the Grail. He travels with
longtime friend, Marcus Brody (Denholm Elliot), and the hook up with the
elder Jones' assistant, Dr. Elsa Schneider (Alison Doody). Together the
three search Venice for clues to the location of the Grail. Jones eventually
finds his father who joins the group on the quest for the Grail. As usual,
Indiana's adventures are never dull, and this time he has to deal with
Nazis, rats and a high speed boat chase on the way to his goal of the Grail.
Indiana Jones And The Last Crusade is very well written and lives up to the
first two films. No disappointments here. The film opens with a flashback
sequence with Indiana as a boy and explains many of the reasons that Indiana
is the man he is. Last Crusade is frequently funny which is a tribute as
much to the interaction of the leads as it is to the sharp writing. Harrison
Ford and Sean Connery are perfectly cast as the father and son who don't
always see eye to eye. Throw in the supporting cast of Denholm Elliot and
John Rhys-Davies (Sallah), both returning to their roles from Raiders Of The
Lost Ark and there are more than a few light moments intertwined with the
seemingly nonstop action.
Like the previous films, Stephen Speilberg gives us a film filled with
elaborate stunts and the sort of settings that can only be found in an
Indiana Jones movie. There is virtually nothing wrong with this movie from a
technical standpoint. Last Crusade has stood up well in the 10 years since
it first hit the big screen. It is easily one of the finest action/adventure
films ever made. This film also compares very well to the first one, Raiders
Of The Lost Ark, which in my opinion, is quite possibly the best film ever
made.

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
Starring Antonio Banderas; Anthony Hopkins; Catherine Zeta-Jones; Stuart
Wilson & Matthew Letscher
The Mask Of Zorro is by far the best movie of the summer of 98. While
Armageddon and Deep Impact wowed we the audience with spectacular special
effects, no other movie was as much fun as Zorro. I've never been a big
Antonio Banderas fan -- actually to be perfectly honest I've never thought
that he could act his way out of a paper bag. Maybe in retrospect that's
because he has never had the right roles. There is no doubt that he was very
good in The Mask Of Zorro. It takes real talent to shine when you are acting
next to Anthony Hopkins in a movie. Hopkins plays Zorro, who, after being
imprisoned by the Spanish government escapes to try to make contact with the
daughter (Catherine Zeta-Jones) who was taken from him many years ago when
she was just an infant. Now, many years later she is all grown up. And may I
be the first to say WOW! Catherine Zeta Jones has got to be one of the most
beautiful women that I have seen in a movie in a long time, and unlike some
of the other lovely starlets that populate today's movies, Zeta-Jones is
actually a very good actress. But I digress. Hopkins meets up with a thief
(Antonio Banderas) who has a score to settle with some of the same people
that Zorro does. Since Zorro is now in his late 50's, he really can't don
the mask anymore, so he sets out to train Banderas' character to replace him
as Zorro. Going into much more detail would probably ruin the movie, but
lets just say that tons of sword fighting and other assorted action abound
in this movie.
I can't say enough about how impressed I was with Banderas' performance. He
was charismatic and funny, and if he can continue to find roles as good as
The Mask Of Zorro, he will undoubtedly become one of Hollywood's biggest
stars. As usual, Hopkins gave a tremendous performance, and manages to make
a role his own to the point where you could never imagine another actor
playing that role.
I can't say enough good things about The Mask Of Zorro. It was funny; well
acted; great sets; the fights were well choreographed and Catherine
Zeta-Jones, well, I could go on for hours about her. Do yourself a favor. Go
see this movie.

Title
Review for Halloween 4: The Return of Michael Myers (1988)
Starring Donald Pleasence; Ellie Cornell; Danielle Harris; George P. Wilbur
& Michael Pataki
Halloween 4: The Return Of Michael Myers picks up where Halloween II left
off. (Halloween III had absolutely nothing to do with the Michael Myers
character -- proving once again that movie producers are not all rocket
scientists.) Anyway, it's years after the events of that infamous Halloween
night (Halloween & Halloween II) when Michael Myers went on a murderous
rampage and killed pretty much everyone in sight in the small town of
Haddonfield Illinois. We all thought good old Mike was stopped for good at
the end of Halloween II. But it's the movies, and more specifically a movie
about a bloodthirsty mass murderer, so we all know it pretty much takes a
howitzer to the head to stop them. For those who missed Halloween II, here's
the scoop. Myers' longtime psychiatrist, Sam Loomis (Donald Pleasence)
seemingly blew himself and Myers up to end Myers' killing spree. It ended up
only scarring Loomis and putting the evil Mikey in a coma for a decade.
Well, Halloween is rolling around once again, and it's time for Mikey to get
up and go trick or treating again. This time he's off to a family reunion.
Seems he has a niece living in Haddonfield and, as is his custom, he pretty
much is forced to try to do anything he can to kill her. Like his last
murderous rampage, the body count rises fast and furious as Mike knocks off
anybody who happens to get within two feet of him.
Unlike the original Halloween movies, Halloween 4 has a higher budget. At
least in terms of production values anyway. The budget was obviously not
used to go after the best Hollywood had to offer in terms of acting talent.
With the exception of Pleasence, most of the actors seem to have been cast
for their good looks as opposed to their acting skills. If you've ever seen
a slasher flick, that shouldn't come as much of a surprise to you. Michael
Myers again dons his Captain Kirk mask painted white and his overalls. (At
least they didn't have to splurge on the wardrobe budget.) Although much to
my dismay, unlike the earlier films, there were no gratuitous nude scenes.
If it weren't for the enormous body count, this would be a PG movie. But
there is that body count, and most of the deaths are pretty violent.
I actually enjoyed Halloween 4. I really can't figure out why though. There
is nothing about it that really sets it apart from any of the other cookie
cutter slasher films. Perhaps I was just happy to see Michael Myers, one of
my favorite horror film characters, return after all those years. It's good
for a couple of hours of mindless entertainment, if nothing else.

Title
Review for Bats (1999/I)
Starring Lou Diamond Phillips; Dina Meyer; Bob Gunton; Leon & Carlos Jacob
Bats isn't exactly a bad horror film if you approach it with the attitude
that you aren't about to see anything that you probably haven't already seen
a hundred times in other horror films. It has the usual predictable plot and
dialogue, along with the usual population of stupid horror film characters.
About the only real scary part of this movie is the direction. How Louis
Morneau ever got a job directing a film, even a b-grade one like this, is
completely beyond my scope of comprehension. At first, the direction was
what I would generously call interesting, but it rapidly deteriorated into
something worthy of the result that you would get if you gave a monkey on
speed a handycam and set him loose. Every time there was some sort of
dramatic bat attack -- which was fairly frequent if you haven't already
gleaned that from the title -- the camera wold go off on some sort of hyped
up whirlwind trip of herky jerky motion. Now the more forgiving in the
audience may have attributed this fact to trying to cut down on the gore.
Maybe it could even be called a compensation for poor special effects, but I
tend to think it was just a director who didn't have a clue what the hell he
was doing.
As for the story, it revolves around a small Texas town that is having a
little bat problem. Apparently, genetically enhanced flying foxes have
escaped from a nearby research lab and have infected the entire bat
population in the area. We never quite get an explanation how the other bats
are infected or how this infection seems to increase them to double their
original size. But you really didn't expect a horror film to make perfect
sense did you? It comes down to the beautiful bat expert (Dina Meyer), who
teams up with the local sheriff, (Lou Diamond Phillips) to try to rid the
town of its bat problem. And just to add to the tension -- as if the cheesy
dialogue and plot weren't enough -- they have only a limited time to stop
the bats before the military intervenes by bombing the whole area to kingdom
come to stop the spread of the nasty winged creatures.
The dialogue in the movie goes something like this. Phillips and Meyer are
lifting some crates. She tells him to lift with his legs. He remarks that if
his legs looked as good as hers that he would use them more often. While I
can't disagree with the sentiment, I have to wonder if some horny junior
high student wasn't responsible for some of these winning lines.
Meyer and Phillips are actually two pretty good actors. The problem for each
of them has always seemed to be poor career decisions. Phillips has proven
his talent in films like Courage Under Fire. Meyer is best known for her
work in Starship Troopers, where she was undoubtedly cast as much for her
willingness to go topless as anything else. I have no doubt that Meyer,
given the right role, would hold up admirably -- this isn't that role. The
dialogue and situations aren't quite bad enough as to be embarrassing for
the actors, but they come pretty damn close. I'm still trying to figure out
why the army was going to blow up half of Texas. I'm sure it was explained,
but I was too busy checking out Meyer's ass -- by far the best part of the
movie. I'm not even going to get into the holes in the plot wide enough to
drive a convoy through, or the music that sounded like it was being played
by a drunk using a broken keyboard. Let's just suffice to say that the
cleverest part of this movie was the poster.
Do yourself a favor. Wait for this one to come out on video. Better yet,
save yourself a couple of bucks and wait for it to show up on cable.

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
Starring Michael Madsen; Natasha Henstridge; Marg Helgenberger & Mykelti
Williamson
I'm going to start right out by saying that Species II is not as good as the
first movie. The story is good, the acting is good, and the special effects
are better than the first Species, but Species II seems to lack something.
Oh I know, it must be the fact that Natasha Henstridge isn't naked in every
second scene she is in. While that may seem like a really sexist comment,
(which it probably is) nobody will deny that that little fact was part of
the ingredients that made the first film so successful. So when the lovely
Natasha declined to do as much nudity in the second movie as she did in the
first, (don't worry guys, she still takes her clothes off in one scene) the
producers must have thought that the lack of skin would hurt the movie. So
we now have no fewer than three additional women with nude scenes in Species
II. Now don't get me wrong boys and girls, I love to see beautiful naked
women running around on the screen, but this was just too obvious. They
might have well just put a disclaimer at the first of the film -- Since
Natasha only gets naked once, we have included a whole bunch of other naked
women to make up for Natasha's excessive clothing.
Species II has a simple enough premise. A manned mission to Mars comes into
contact with some alien DNA that decides to hitch a ride with the astronauts
back to Earth. It infects the mission commander, Patrick Ross, (Justin
Lazard) who, much like the alien Sil from Species, finds himself compelled
to mate with as many women as he can to start a race of aliens. When dead
bodies start turning up, the army goes to Press Lenox, (Michael Madsen) one
of the only surviving members of the team that destroyed the alien in the
first Species.
Meanwhile, back at a government lab. Dr. Laura Baker, (Marg Helgenberger)
the other survivor of Species, has gone to work for the government and
cloned a copy of Sil, the alien from the first movie. This new clone is
named Eve and is again played by Natasha Henstridge. Eve has been raised a
little differently from Sil. Having learned from past mistakes, the
scientists have made some genetic changes which make Eve more docile than
her predecessor and try to restrain her naturally overactive libido
Anyway, in the hunt for this new alien, Eve is asked to help. It doesn't
take a real stretch to figure out that an over sexed female alien and an
over sexed male alien have only one thing on their minds. So when the two
finally get together, watch out. Seem like a simple plot line? Well kids, it
is. The producers of Species II didn't put a whole heck of a lot of thought
into this one. Hey it's a nice touch that Natasha Henstridge gets to play a
good alien in this film, just the opposite of her character in the first
film. It's just too bad that little plot device was already used in
terminator 2, and with much better results. My guess is that when this film
was being written, the writers thought that Natasha Henstridge would again
be topless for most of the movie, and no one would care about little
technicalities like a plot since they would be to busy drooling over her
chest.
Considering the writing, Species II isn't all bad. The acting is pretty
good. I mean we aren't talking Oscar nominations here, but its average for a
sci-fi action thriller. Natasha Henstridge continues to improve with each
movie that she is in. Michael Madsen and Marg Helgenberger do their normally
good jobs. Nice additions to the cast include Mykelti Williamson as one of
the astronauts from the infected Mars mission, as an added bit of comic
relief. James Cromwell as a senator and father of the infected astronaut,
and George Dzundza (whom some may recognize best from his work on the first
season of Law & Order) as the army colonel in charge of cleaning up this
latest batch of aliens.
Not a bad film, just not nearly as good as it could have been. Definitely
not for the squeamish, or those who don't approve of nude scenes thrown in
for any reason other than that the producers like looking at naked women.
Hey, it's a fun movie as long as you don't go expecting too much.

Title
Review for Fair Game (1995)
Starring William Baldwin; Cindy Crawford & Steven Berkoff
All right, the first problem that Fair Game has is the casting of supermodel
Cindy Crawford in the lead role. Not that Cindy does that bad, it's just
that anyone who watches this film knows from moment one that that little bit
of casting was not done because of Cindy's extraordinary acting skills, but
for her extraordinary ability to look drop dead gorgeous in any situation.
And in Fair Game most situations tend to find Cindy either soaking wet or
very hot and sweaty, but I'm sure that that is just a coincidence, no doubt
that these situations were essential to the plot and the fact that Cindy
looks great wet, well, that's just a happy coincidence. Sure. William
Baldwin isn't a bad actor. Unfortunately, he just doesn't demonstrate it at
all in this movie. I'm not sure if that's because most of his lines were
just so hokey, or if he was trying to make Cindy's acting look good. If it
was the latter, it worked. Cindy does a surprisingly good job here in her
first movie. Which is not to say that she doesn't have room for improvement.
Although to be fair to Cindy, her lines were kinda cheesy in places.
So right about now you are no doubt asking yourself what sort of movie does
Cindy Crawford, arguably the most beautiful woman on the planet, chose for
her foray into the world of cinema? Well, I'm glad you asked that question.
Cindy plays a lawyer who by some convoluted plot twists becomes a target for
former elite KGB agents. Why woud they target someone as likable as Cindy,
you ask? By the end of the movie you won't care. The story is so contrived
it isn't funny. Anyway after Cindy gets blown out of the window of her
house, without getting so much as a scratch I might add, she is placed into
protective police custody under the watchful eve of William Baldwin. Who's
character, Max Kilpatric, a police detective, seems to possess the skills of
some sort of fighting machine (my guess is that the writers have seen way
too many of Steven Seagal's early films). The point is that the idea of the
Crawford and Baldwin's characters of the run from these killer Russians
isn't all that bad of an idea, it's just everything around that basic idea
which kinda stinks out loud.
The supporting cast members are nothing more that over acted stereotypes. If
I was Baldwin, I'd hope this film disappears. As for Crawford, she may
indeed have some acting ability. Unfortunately, any she does have is
obscured by writing that goes beyond bad.
This movie was obviously written with Cindy in mind, since the writers spend
most of their time finding ways to capitalize off of her looks. It's too bad
they hadn't spent more time on a half decent plot, since Ms. Crawford is
more than capable of looking just fine all by herself thank you very much.
Unless you are a huge fan of either Baldwin or Crawford this is a movie that
will only disappoint you.

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
Starring Elijah Wood; Jordana Brewster; Clea Duvall; Laura Harris & Josh
Hartnett
When I went into The Faculty I was expecting a typical teen horror flick. I
figured it may be a bit above average considering that Kevin Williamson
(Scream, Scream 2) had written the screenplay. My theory was that if
Williamson was involved, at the very least this movie was going to be
entertaining. Not only was the movie entertaining, but Williamson has proven
once again that he is one of the most gifted writers in Hollywood. Add to
that Robert Rodriguez' great job in the director's chair and you have the
makings of a pretty good film. When you throw in a great young cast, you
have a winner.
Elijah Wood plays the school whipping post, who works at the school
newspaper with the head cheerleader (Jordana Brewster). In the course of
looking for leads for a new story, they discover an even bigger one. Their
teachers have been taken over by aliens, which are rapidly taking over the
rest of the school. It then falls to them and four of their classmates, the
only six people left in the school unaffected, to find a way to stop the
aliens before they can take over the world. OK, it sounds a little corny,
but it actually comes off pretty well. There is never any real point at
which you start saying to yourself "As if that would happen". Of course, you
have to get by the whole alien invasion thing. After gettting passed that,
you are home free.
In terms of casting, The Faculty is fairly impressive. To make up for the
relatively unknown, but extremely talented cast of high school students, the
producers decided to cast some familiar faces in the roles of the faculty.
They include Robert Patrick (the liquid terminator in Terminator 2), the
high school principal is Bebe Neuwirth (Cheers), and the school nurse is
Salma Hayek. (I'm betting every guy in that school gets sick at least once a
week.) If Salma weren't enough, adding to the babe factor is Famke Janssen
(Goldeneye). Among the young cast of students is only a couple of
recognizable names, they are Josh Hartnett (who played Jamie Lee Curtis' son
in Halloween: H20) and Elijah Wood (Free Willie). Singer Usher also makes a
brief appearance in a small role. Adding some heat to the younger generation
are up a coming hotties Jordana Brewster and Laura Harris. I enjoyed the
performances of the whole cast. Of course, this is a horror movie and not
Shakespeare, so nobody was really stretching their acting talents to the
limit. As horror movie casts go, this one was fun to watch.
Unlike the early slasher type films of the late seventies and eighties, The
Faculty actually had a production budget and it shows. This film wasn't shot
on any shoestring budget, nor where the special effects cooked up in
somebody's garage. The Faculty lives up to the high production values that
were set by Scream a few years ago. So it's no coincidence that Kevin
Williamson was involved in both films. Maybe it even raises the bar a bit.
Considering that this was a movie about aliens, visual effects are a little
more important.
It's a great movie. Although, parents should be warned -- The Faculty is not
for the kids, even though it seems to be marketed towards them.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
Starring Brendan Fraser; Rachel Weisz; John Hannah; Arnold Voslo & Kevin J.
O'Connor
Brendan Fraser stars in this remake of the 1930's Boris Karloff classic.
This new mummy is not only a tribute to the original but it is very
blatantly paying homage to Raiders Of The Lost Ark as well. Brendan Fraser
is no Indiana Jones, but he comes pretty darn close. I'll admit right off
the bat that I wasn't expecting a whole lot out of The Mummy. I figured on a
few nifty special effects and not a whole lot else. I was in for quite the
surprise. The Mummy is a whole lot of fun, and will probably rank as one of
my favorite movies of the year. Fraser plays a former soldier turned fortune
hunter who, in no small way, resembles a certain character that Harrison
Ford made famous. Although, Fraser's character doesn't have a bullwhip. Rick
O'Connell (Fraser) is one of the few people who has ever seen the Lost City
of the Dead in Egypt. It is reported to contain an immense treasure and
volumes of great knowledge. He is hired by a librarian (Rachel Weisz) and
her brother (John Hannah) to take them to the city so that they can try to
find its hidden treasures. Once there they run into a bit more than they
bargained for. They inadvertently bring back to life a mummy which has been
sealed in the ancient city along with a very bad curse. Basically, once this
Mummy gets reawakened he isn't a real nice guy. And once he gets up to full
strength he will be able to control the world. By the way, the way he gains
strength is to replace the long rotted parts of his body with new flesh from
living victims. The Mummy has as his command the power to create plagues of
biblical proportion, such as locusts, making the water turn to blood and
fireballs falling from the sky. All and all, not the sort of fellow that you
want to be enemies with.
The plot of the movie is a little on the popcorn side of things. It is your
typical light summer fare. This is not a difficult movie to follow, yet on
the other hand there are enough spills, thrills and one liners to keep the
audience thoroughly entertained throughout the movie. I was not really
expecting a whole lot in either the dialogue or acting portions of this
movie. On both counts I was happily wrong. This isn't Oscar-caliber dialogue
mind you, but it is witty and often pretty funny. I found most of it was
designed to give the movie that Indiana Jones feel. Even in the worst of
situations, someone seemingly had a wisecrack. The acting was very
impressive. Brendan Fraser has never really been in a movie that ever really
impressed the heck out of me. This time he did. Fraser comes off as a young
Harrison Ford in this movie. He might not have quite as much talent as Ford,
but he certainly has the charisma and screen presence to make up for it.
Quite honestly, he is no slouch in the talent department either. Rachel
Weisz does a fine job as the take charge librarian who eventually falls for
Fraser's character. The actor who I enjoyed the most was John Hannah as
Weisz's somewhat roguish brother. His character was pure comic relief, and
Hannah delivered all the way. Arnold Voslo was also good playing the mummy.
Although his scenes were somewhat limited because of the nature of his
character.
The reason Voslo's scenes were limited was the fact that for a good portion
of the movie, the Mummy was purely a computer generated character. More or
less a walking skeleton with a little rotting flesh on him. Although there
was more and more meat on him as the movie progressed and the body count
mounted. The CGI Mummy was probably the most impressive CGI character that I
have ever seen in a movie. I would say it will be a long time before the
effects were surpassed if it weren't for the fact that Star Wars: Episode
I - The Phantom Menace wasn't being released a week and a half after this
film. The Mummy itself wasn't the only impressive computer generated horror
in this film. Special effects wizards also used computers to generate a very
impressive killer windstorm as well as the Mummy's undead henchmen. One of
the neatest touches was the CGI flesh eating beetles -- I'll say no more.
If, when you think of The Mummy, you picture a slow moving creature wrapped
in gauze chasing people at speeds approaching 1/4 of a mile per hour, you
are in for a shock. This new Mummy is slick, scary and a whole lot of fun.
The Mummy might not go down as a "classic" like the original, but it will
provide you with one of the most enjoyable movie experiences that you are
likely to see in a summer film.

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Starring Will Smith; Gene Hackman; Jon Voight & Lisa Bonet
If nothing else, Enemy Of The State will do one thing. It leaves no doubt
that Will Smith is officially a movie star. While Smith has been in other
hits like Independence Day and Men In Black, their success could be
attributed as much to their high-end special effects and not so much to
Smith's presence. Well, no more. While Enemy Of The State has great action
sequences and special effects, the main attraction here is Will Smith. He
does a great job in this film, and when you throw Gene Hackman and Jon
Voight into the mix, you can almost guarantee that you have a very
entertaining movie. Smith plays an attorney who becomes mixed up in
something that he wants no part of. A secret US Government agency thinks
that Smith's character has acquired some very sensitive information that
they don't want him to have. They are afraid that he may leak this
information to the press and ruin them. So the agency, led by a very nasty
Jon Voight, sets out do discredit him as a preemptive strike, in case he can
use this information before they can get it back from him. Along the way
Smith enlists the help of a former Government surveillance expert (Gene
Hackman) in order to get his life back.
Enemy Of the State is a top notch movie in every sense of the word. The
acting is terrific, the writing is intelligent, and visually it looks great.
Smith does a great job carrying the film, and he very easily proves that he
is capable of more than just comic relief in a movie. No surprises when it
comes to the performances of Gene Hackman and Jon Voight. These two men
leave little doubt why they are two of the most talented actors working
today. In a little bit of irony, Hackman's paranoid surveillance expert
could almost be the same character that he played back in the early
seventies in The Conversation. The irony being that The Conversation in one
of the worst films of all time and Enemy Of The State is one of the better
movies of the year.
The other thing that is worth mentioning is the fact that unlike many other
similar cloak and dagger type movies, Enemy Of The State doesn't suffer from
the inevitable confusing plot twists that usually plague this type of movie.
At no point will you find yourself scratching your head wondering what the
heck is going on. This is not to say that Enemy Of The State is without it's
intricate plot twists, quite the contrary. The writing is simply so slick
that a brain-damaged chimpanzee could follow along. Another interesting part
of this movie is the technology that the government uses to track and spy on
Will Smith's character. You can't help getting just a little uneasy when you
wonder just who much of this stuff is real, and how much of it is just
strictly a work of fiction. My money is on very little fiction.
Enemy Of The State should appeal to action fans and fans of the suspense
genre alike. Will Smith fans will not be disappointed either. While he isn't
cracking jokes in this movie, his charisma makes up for it. Enemy Of The
State is a very entertaining way to spend a couple of hours.

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
Starring Gary Oldman; William Hurt; Matt LeBlanc & Mimi Rogers
Lost In Space is the updated remake of the campy 1960's television program.
While it certainly is anything but campy, it is a worthy successor to the
original series. Unlike the series, the film version of Lost In Space is big
budget with top notch special effects. None of the aliens made from tinfoil
that were so common from the series. Lost In Space boasts an A-level cast
including Gary Oldman as the evil Dr. Smith, William Hurt as Professor John
Robinson and Matt LeBlanc as Major Don West.
Unlike TV show remakes from recent years, Mission: Impossible comes to mind,
Lost In Space doesn't turn familiar characters into something that you don't
expect. The good guys from the series are still good and the bad guy, namely
Dr. Smith, is still bad. Although, if I had one complaint about the movie it
would be with the character of Dr. Smith. While Gary Oldman does do a good
job, the character of Smith is a little too nasty, although I suppose times
change and the bad guys have to get a little more bad. Maybe part of my
problem with Dr. Smith was that Jonathan Harris wasn't playing him. Harris
was the main reason to watch the series and nobody, not even Gary Oldman,
could properly replace him as Dr. Smith. The same can not be said for the
other characters in the film, all of the current actors more than adequately
filled the rolls of their 1960's counterparts. Lost In Space, in addition to
keeping to the story line of the series also paid homage to it in other
ways. These included cameos from some of the original stars of the TV
series; Dick Tufeld, who was the voice of the Robot in the series also
voices the Robot in the film. You should also pay special attention to the
booster rocket that carries the updated Jupiter 2 from its launch pad on
Earth.
As for plot, it is the mid 21st Century and Earth is doomed to extinction
from the pollution and abuse of the past centuries. John Robinson and his
family are chosen to go to a new planet and ready it for colonization from
the people of Earth. Something goes horribly wrong on the Robinson's
journey. A terrorist stowaway, Dr. Smith, sabotages the mission and the
whole bunch of them find themselves lost in some uncharted region of space.
This new region of space is not without its dangers, including large killer
spiders and some sort of phenomenon which seems to be affecting time itself.
As I mentioned, the main reason to watch the television series was for Dr.
Smith. While Gary Oldman's Smith can't compare to the original, he is still
the most fun to watch. While his portrayal of Dr. Smith is far more evil
than the TV version, the film version of Smith still takes the same joy at
being bad. You have to love somebody that takes such pride in their work. As
for the rest of the cast, while they are not standouts like Gary Oldman,
they all do an excellent job. But what else would you expect from William
Hurt? Hurt and the rest of the cast deserve credit for even being noticed in
Lost In Space. It would have been very easy for all of them to fade into the
background of Oldman's over the top performance and of the spectacular
special effects. Not to mention the very cool updated Robot.
Lost In Space is a whole lot of fun. Whether you were a fan of the TV
series, or had never heard of it before, this is a thoroughly enjoyable
movie. Although I must admit, fans of the series will get a little extra out
of this updated version of Lost In Space with all of the references to the
original series scattered around the film.

Title
Review for 2 Days in the Valley (1996)
Starring Danny Aiello; Greg Cruttwell; Jeff Daniels; Teri Hatcher & Glenne
Headly
2 Days In The Valley is more or less a Pulp Fiction knock off. It basically
involves how a bunch of quirky characters in the Los Angeles area end up
having their lives become intertwined in some very unusual ways. I'm not
going into much greater detail than that, since it would take forever to
explain, and quite frankly, I'm not willing to spend any more time on it
than the 2 hours that I've already wasted.  While it tries very hard to be
Pulp Fiction, 2 Days In The Valley falls way short. This is quite a
condemnation considering the cast includes Danny Aiello, James Spader and
Jeff Daniels.
While the story isn't much, and the dialogue and characters rate only
marginally better, 2 Days In The Valley does have a couple of bright spots.
James Spader's character, while not much better than the rest, is at least
fun to watch in a sick sort of way. And we do get to see a nice cat fight
between uber babes Teri Hatcher and Charlize Theron (in her first role). You
know a movie isn't that good when the highlight is a brawl between two
women. Even if they are both gorgeous.
I will give the writers some credit for the fairly clever ways in which they
managed to intersect the lives of this group of characters that would have
otherwise never interacted. But marveling at that ingenuity is a far cry
from actually enjoying the result. While some of the characters and their
respective stories are fairly interesting, they inevitably are brought down
as they intersect with the other half of the characters that I really cared
absolutely nothing about. If I were to put a number on it, only about half
of the story and half the characters in this movie were particularly
interesting or otherwise enjoyable to watch.
This is the sort of movie that only a huge fan of one or more of the cast
members should rent, and even then prepare for disappointment. Not even
Charlize Theron being naked would get me to sit through this movie again. Or
at least not all of it anyway.

Title
Review for Pumpkinhead (1988)
Starring Lance Henriksen; Jeff East; Cynthia Bain; John D'Aquino & Kimberly
Ross
Lance Henriksen plays a country bumpkin living out in the middle of nowhere.
Some reckless city teenagers who are staying in the area kill his son. He
vows revenge, and seeks out a very sinister old lady who lives in the nearby
woods. He has her summon the demon Pumpkinhead -- who got his name because
his body rests in an old graveyard which doubles as a pumpkin patch. When
Pumpkinhead awakens, he sets out to get the man's revenge in blood. When
Henriksen's character realizes just how horrible the demon is, he has second
thoughts, and tries in vain to help Pumpkinhead's targets get away with
their lives. Pumpkinhead has other plans.
This movie is your typical b-grade horror flick. Just about everything about
it says cheese.
The performances are substandard -- including Lance Henriksen. And the young
teens are mostly there just to fulfill the victims-in-waiting quota that is
so crucial to a movie such as this. The writing doesn't add too much to the
movie to take your mind off the bloody awful (no pun intended) acting. The
monster, while looking pretty good, isn't particularly scary. This is due as
much to the writing as anything else. It's hard to be real scared when you
know who is going to get it next. No suspense whatsoever. The only surprise
was method of death. Perhaps the only thing that saved the creature from
being completely laughable was the fact that the fog was quite thick in
woods where the creature appears, so it makes the creature look slightly
more ominous.
This is a movie that actually appears to have tried, just not succeeded all
that well. Pumpkinhead had a good premise with a lot of potential; it just
wasn't executed properly. It's the typical horror film that you will find
collecting dust in the dark recesses of your local video stores' horror
section. Or populating late night cable TV on some b-movie horror marathon.
It's not unwatchable, just nowhere near the top of my list for horror (even
cheesy horror) flicks. It doesn't even have the virtue of the old "It's so
bad, it's good" phenomenon. There just isn't much to it. It's better than a
late night infomercial on TV though.

Title
Review for Bridge Too Far, A (1977)
Starring Dirk Bogarde; Paul Maxwell; Sean Connery; Ryan O'Neal & Gene
Hackman
Just a perusal of the amazing all-star cast of this movie and you can
probably get a pretty good sense of what you are in store for. The cast
includes Sean Connery; Gene Hackman; Robert Redford; James Caan; and Anthony
Hopkins, just to name a few. It is truly an ensemble piece. While Connery
probably ends up with the most screen time, all of the main actors pretty
much share the spotlight in this World War II epic. In fact, the cast is
listed in alphabetic order in the credits. So my definition of the leads is
an educated guess.
A Bridge To Far is based on the true story of an allied operation towards
the end of the Second World War. The Allies decided to capture several of
the bridges crossing the Rhine River in Germany. Once captured, they felt
that the German industrial heartland would be easily overtaken which would
mean a quick end to the war. Unfortunately, almost nothing went as planned
and this operation turned into one of the biggest disasters for the Allies
during the war. As a bit of a historical note -- more Allied soldiers lost
their lives during the botched attempts to take the Rhine bridges than
perished during the D-Day attack at Normandy.
A Bridge To Far is certainly the type of movie that would be considered an
epic. It seems to have a cast of thousands and the battle scenes are grandly
staged and quite realistic. While realism is a big part of this movie, none
of the scenes contain the graphic horror that is now common in today's war
films.
To a man, the cast of this movie is magnificent. A Bridge To Far almost has
an edge of your seat quality to it. You never know what is going to happen
next in this movie. I always seemed to get the distinct impression that
whatever was going to happen, it was bound to be bad for the Allies. The
total disaster that seems to have befallen the Allies at every turn is
staggering. A Bridge To Far has the sort of plot that if you didn't know it
was based on a true story, you would probably think it was too unrealistic.
The movie has such a large cast that it is truly surprising at just how well
developed these characters actually are by the end of the film. I could feel
for all of them, especially since the disastrous results of this operation
would have been considerably worse if it weren't for the skills of those
actually on the battlefield.
I can't say enough about this movie. Acting, writing, directing are all
simply amazing. Combine that with the fact that this is based on actual
events, and you have a very riveting 3 hours. I was sort of surprised that
the movie was as long as it was. It went quicker than most 90-minute
movies -- certainly a testament to the fine writing and acting. Well worth
checking out if you can find it at your local video store.

Title
Review for Beyond the Valley of the Dolls (1970)
Starring Dolly Reed; Cynthia Myers; Marcia McBroom; John Lazar & Michael
Blodgett
Bad. Bad. Bad. That one word seems to pretty much sums up Beyond The Valley
Of The Dolls. If that summary isn't enough for you, how about T&A, T&A, T&A?
Still haven't got the point? Other than director Russ Meyer's predilection
for casting attractive large breasted women who ultimately expose the
afore-mentioned anatomical areas, there is really only one other reason to
recommend even taking a look at this movie. That is the fact that it was
co-written by famed film critic Roger Ebert, who also was responsible for
the screenplay. After watching this movie you will never be able to sit
through another one of his reviews where he gives a movie a thumbs down for
bad writing with a straight face. This movie stinks out loud. Quite frankly,
this movie deserves a 0 out of 10. But there are parts of it that are so bad
they are almost funny. So I'm giving it a 1 out of 10. And maybe that is too
generous.
Right from the opening credits, I knew that I had a class-A bomb on my
hands. Not only are the way the credits actually shot distracting, but the
first scene you see includes a big breasted young woman being chased by a
guy in a nazi uniform. I had absolutely no idea why the hell that was
happening (it does get explained later) and as soon as the first scene is
over, we cut to a completely unrelated scene. To be honest, as I sat through
this movie mesmerized by just how incredibly awful it was, I actually forgot
about the seemingly out of place opening until it popped up again later in
the film. With the quality of the writing during the rest of the film, it
wouldn't have surprised me if the opening had never been explained.
So what is this movie about? you ask. Like it really matters. OK, here goes.
This all-girl band headed by Kelly MacNamara (Dolly Reed) and her friends go
to Hollywood to try to gain a foothold in the music industry. Once there,
they do manage to find success (Due as much to their hooters as anything
else  it sure wasn't for their brutally bad singing voices), and the movie
chronicles how their lives change for the worse as the pressures of fame get
to them. Everything from big egos, to booze and drugs to free flowing sex
sends them on a downward spiral. There are a couple of other idiotic
subplots thrown in for good measure, but the fame is the one that pretty
much sums up this thing.
>From a creative standpoint there is nothing redeeming here. Other than the
above-mentioned obsession with big knockers that Russ Meyer seemed to have.
The dialogue is so incredibly bad that it literally is funny in parts. Mr.
Ebert has generously thrown in helpings of "hey man","dig" and my all time
favorite -- "this is my happening, and it freaks me out". Now I ask you,
with lines like that how can you go wrong? Ebert had tried to inject as many
big words as possible into the dialogue. Maybe he thought it would make the
movie seem smarter. I don't know, but all the big words in the world
wouldn't be able to disguise the bad writing and even worse acting.
But the wretched dialogue goes along well with the wretched quality of
everything else in this movie. I've seen home movies directed better than
Meyer managed with this turkey. In fact, there is one scene -- the one in
which they are in a van driving to Hollywood to make their fortunes --
during which I really had to question if Meyer or his editors had just
suffered serious head injuries. Add to the directing and writing the music
in this movie. I almost got up to check my sound system to see if it was
broken, there was such a pile of crap emanating from the speakers.
Then we have the cast. First lets start David Gurian who played Harris, the
manager of the band. This has got to be the goofiest looking guy that has
ever set foot in front of a motion picture camera. Sadly, his acting doesn't
come close to making up for his looks. If you have been following along up
to this point, this shouldn't surprise you. Meyer's stable of well endowed
girls also have the benefit of being fairly attractive to go along with
their other assets. Dolly Reed plays Kelly, the leader of the band. And no
surprise here, she was cast for her cup size, not her talents. And yes, she
does loose the shirt a few times and display her impressive talents.  Sadly,
her ass is almost as large as her chest. Hey, it a sexist movie, so I'm
writing a sexist review.
Then we have former Playboy Playmate Cynthia Myers in a fairly small role as
Casey, one of the other band members. This goes along with the rest of the
idiotic thinking in the movie. Meyer casts a gorgeous Playmate with a rack
to kill for and who obviously has no acting talent at all, but her nude
scenes are the biggest disappointment of all. Sure Russ, now is the time to
get artsy and throw in some well placed shadows. On the up side, she does
have a fun lesbo scene. I sound like I'm writing a review in a porn
magazine. But hey, I'll admit it; the only reason that I actually managed to
sit through this damn movie was to catch a look at Cynthia Myers naked. And
since that was a huge disappointment, I pretty much wasted two hours of my
life on this turkey.
The only thing that I can say about this movie is that you should stay away
from it. Unless of course you want to feel good about yourself by knowing
that even a Pulitzer Prize winning film critic like Roger Ebert has screwed
up at least once in his life too. And if you are thinking of checking it out
for the double D's -- you are better off just downloading nude Cynthia Myers
pictures off the Internet. This is a movie that should be avoided at all
costs. An even better idea might be to require video stores to place a
warning on the box of Beyond The Valley Of The Dolls -- Beware: This movie
is extremely hazardous to your common sense. Proceed with extreme caution.

Title
Review for Return of the Texas Chainsaw Massacre, The (1994)
Texas Chainsaw Massacre: The Next Generation
A review by Joe Chamberlain
Starring Renee Zellweger; Matthew McConaughey; Robert Jacks; Tonie Perensky
& Joe Stevens
There is a rule when it comes to movies. A sequel is never as good as the
original. There are very few exceptions to this rule, and Texas Chainsaw
Massacre: The Next Generation is not one of them. Now if you also take into
consideration that the original Chainsaw Massacre was a REALLY bad movie,
and that this isn't even the first sequel to it, you have a recipe for a
very painful viewing experience. Don't be fooled by the presence of up and
coming talents Matthew McConaughey (A Time To Kill) and Renee Zellweger
(Jerry Maguire). They made this movie before they were stars. Judging by
their performances they also made it before they took any acting lessons.
It's a wonder they ever worked in Hollywood again after appearing in this
turkey.
Apparently the producers of this film realized just how bad it was, because
it sat unreleased for years until someone decided that they might be able to
capitalize off the success of McConaughey and Zellweger. Apparently the two
young stars were none too happy about this thing ever seeing the light of
day. And I don't blame them, they would have been better off if this had
been some sort of porno flick starring the two of them. Unfortunately for
them it is a horror film in which Zellweger plays your typically stupid
horror film character. While McConaughey plays a guy who wears a mechanical
brace on his leg that he controls with a television remote control. (Hey,
don't say I didn't warn you.) To make matters worse, Leatherface, the
chainsaw wielding maniac, who was never the scariest of psychopathic killers
at the best of times, has now become a full blown cross-dresser, and spends
the entire movie in drag. There is a plot to this movie but it isn't worth
mentioning. Let's just suffice to say that a group of teenagers are in the
typical wrong place at the wrong time and are left to the mercy of remote
control man (McConaughey) and his lipstick wearing chainsaw revving
half-witted sidekick. Man, I can't get over just how bad this movie is.
This film has absolutely no redeeming qualities. Even the obligatory topless
babe shot wasn't enough to hold my interest for more than 2 seconds. The
writing is bad, the direction is even worse, but both of those things look
good in comparison to the acting. This is the sort of movie that they should
make people in prison watch. A guarantee you, if criminals thought that they
would be subjected to this film they would never break the law again.

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
Starring Kevin Costner; Will Patton; Larenz Tate; Olivia Williams & James
Russo
The Postman is Kevin Costner's much-maligned movie that seems to always be
mentioned in the same breath as his other much-maligned movie, Waterworld.
While Waterworld deserved much of the criticism that it received, I think
that most people where a little bit too harsh on The Postman. By biggest
complaint with this movie was that it was a bit long. Other than that, it
really wasn't half bad. Sure, maybe it was a bit self-indulgent on Costner's
part, but self-indulgence is nothing new in Hollywood.
The Postman is set in the Pacific Northwest region of the United States,
specifically Oregon. It is several years into the future and there has been
a civil war in the US, and the government is now in ruins. The man with the
power in this part of the country is General Bethlehem (Will Patton). He
maintains his power through fear and with the help of his somewhat ragtag
army. Kevin Costner plays a down on his luck actor who stumbles across the
dead body of a US postal carrier whose body had been there from the time of
the war. Costner assumes the identity of the postal carrier in the hopes
that he might be able to weasel some food out of one of the local
communities. The locals buy his story that he is a postman and a
representative of the newly restored US government. In fact, he is so
convincing that he inadvertently inspires a whole legion of postal carriers
who work for the newly restored US government. The fact that there is no
newly restored government is something that none of these postal carriers
ever seem to figure out. Anyway, these new representatives of the US
government pose a threat to the power of General Bethlehem, so he decides
that they should be eliminated. The rest of the movie follows how Costner's
character goes from being a con man to believing in the hope that has sprung
from his lies.
The Postman is a bit hokey in places, but for the most part, it works quite
well. By the end of the movie I even started to like Costner's character. I
never really disliked him; I just didn't care about him in the least. Lorenz
Tate gives a great performance as Ford Lincoln Mercury (named after the
ruins of a local car dealership), the young man who is the first to be
inspired by the postman. It is he who later inspires Costner's postman.
Olivia Williams plays Costner's love interest in this movie. For the most
part, this really didn't work for me. Although by the end of the movie I was
actually starting to root for the two of them. For me, the man who really
made this movie was Will Patton as the evil general. Costner fans might
recognize him as the bad guy in one of Costner's earlier films, No Way Out.
Patton gave the best performance of the movie, and his character was, by
far, the most interesting. Other cute casting touches included Tom Petty as
a guy who used to be famous before the war. And while it was fun to see Tom,
and his performance was pretty good, I wouldn't recommend him for the lead
in a Shakespearean drama anytime soon.
My main criticism of The Postman is that it could have stood a little more
time in the editing room. I'd hazard a guess and say that a half an hour
could have easily been cut from this film. The result would have made for a
significantly more enjoyable experience. But if you don't mind long movies
(especially ones with lags in the action) and a little self-indulgence on
the part of a Hollywood heavy hitter, The Postman isn't all that bad. My
only hope is that the next time Costner decides to make one of his epics
that the studio makes him keep it to a manageable length.

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
Starring Jennifer Love Hewitt; Sarah Michelle Gellar; Ryan Phillippe &
Freddie Prinze Jr.
I Know What You Did Last Summer comes from the same screenwriter who brought
us last year's Scream. Jennifer Love Hewitt; Sarah Michelle Gellar; Ryan
Phillippe and Freddie Prinze Jr. play two couples who are out celebrating
the Fourth of July, and the beauty pageant win of Helen Shivers (Gellar).
After a night of partying, they drive home along a deserted mountain road.
On the way down the road, they hit a man. They decide their only way out is
to dispose of the body. Although disposing of the body turns out to be more
difficult than they had expected. When it is accomplished they swear never
to speak of it again.
At the end of the summer they all go their separate ways Julie Janes
(Hewitt) is off to university and Helen is off to fame and fortune in New
York. Over the course of the next year the two couples break up and the four
friends loose touch with one another. That is, until Julie comes home from
her first year of university and finds a hand written note waiting for her,
stating simply -- I know what you did last summer. None of the four, whom
have all returned home, have any idea who wrote the letter. Quite quickly
all become convinced that they have a real problem.
The note's author goes about terrorizing the four, as well as leaving the
usual mounting body count in his/her wake. Like Scream, the writing is
sharp, and most of the plot twists work well. As with Scream, screenwriter
Kevin Williamson seems to be taking shots at the horror movie genre. With
blatant scenes like the female victim running up the stairs to get away from
the killer when she should be running out the door. This brings me to the
last 20 minutes of the movie.
The audience that I screened the movie with laughed at many of the so-called
scarier scenes at the end of the movie when the lead characters were in dire
peril. This isn't a knock against the movie by any means. Nor am I
suggesting that the movie is so bad that it is funny. The audience was
laughing with the movie, and not at it. One gets the impression that the
makers of I Know What You did Last Summer wanted the final 20 minutes of the
movie to be a very clever send-up of horror flicks. If that was their
intent, then they succeeded.
My only complaint with the movie was the killer. When the killer's identity
is finally revealed I was left asking -- huh? This could also be said
concerning many of my fellow audience members. You actually have to think
about it for a minute to figure it out, not normally a plus for a slasher
film. Which is not to say that you will leave the theater confused, just
having used your brain a little.
The four main cast members were excellent, and as for Hewitt and Gellar, if
their first major starring film roles are any indication, they should both
have bright careers on the big screen ahead of them. Especially Sarah
Michelle Gellar, who will appear in Scream 2 at the end of 1997.

Title
Review for Blob, The (1958)
Starring Steve McQueen; Aneta Corsaut; Earl Rowe; Olin Howlin & Alden
'Stephen' Chase
Cheesy. That one word could serve as my whole review for The Blob. I can't
figure out if that cheesy quality was intentional, or if the filmmakers
actually though that this film would scare audiences back in the 1950's.
Quite frankly, I don't care how it was received in the 50's, this is the
late 90's and the only thing that scares me about this film is that I might
actually have to sit through it again some day. The only real high point of
the movie is that it stars a young Steve McQueen. Which is the only reason
that I would ever recommend anyone actually watch this movie. It is proof
that even big stars had to start somewhere.
A glob of goop falls from the sky in an asteroid. The goop is alive and it's
nasty and hungry. And it particularly has a taste for human flesh. It eats
people by dissolving them, and the more people it eats, the bigger the big
glob of goop gets. It attacks some of the local teens, including McQueen's
character. But no one believes them until it's too late, and the goop is so
large that it threatens to destroy the whole town.
I don't expect the same level of special effects here that I do from a film
like Armageddon. But at least the producers could have made a little more of
an effort with the limited resources that they had back when this film was
made. I could never get over my feeling that I was watching actors running
around and screaming as Jell-O was terrorizing them. Quite frankly, I almost
expected Bill Cosby to end up being an evil mastermind controlling the
creature. But I digress.
Acting abilities don't seem to have been a big consideration for the
producers when they cast this turkey. It's not that the actors are bad, it's
just that I thought is was watching a rerun of the Andy Griffith show.
Everyone had that gee whiz sort of attitude. I don't know if everyone in a
small town in the fifties had that goofy attitude, but I would have hoped
that someone would have gotten slightly pissed off when this overgrown
reject from the dessert menu started destroying their town. Alas, that was
not to be.
I prefer to eat Jell-O to watching it star as the lead in a motion picture.
This is a movie that deserves to be in the cooking section of your local
video store as opposed to the horror section. The best thing about this
movie was its very corny (but kinda catchy) opening theme song. When the
best part of the movie occurs in the first 3 minutes, it's usually a good
idea to avoid it.

Title
Review for Star Trek: First Contact (1996)
Starring Patrick Stewart; Jonathan Frakes; Brent Spiner & LeVar Burton
Star Trek: First Contact is the eighth movie in the series based on Gene
Roddenberry's TV show from the sixties. It is the second movie featuring the
cast of Star Trek: The Next Generation.
First Contact is one of the best movies in the series, and it seems to hold
up the tradition of the even numbered movies being far superior to their odd
numbered counterparts.
Unlike the other films in the series, this is the first one where no members
of the original cast of Star Trek appear. (Except for Majel Barret, as the
voice of the Enterprise's computer.)
In this latest installment, the crew as forced to travel back in time to
prevent the Borg (more about them in a second) from changing the course of
Earth's history. It seems the Borg want to prevent the first warp flight.
For those of you out there that aren't familiar with the Borg, they are half
biological, half mechanical beings that assimilate other races and transform
them into Borg.
This is usually not a pleasant experience, what with all the mechanical
parts being implanted into the victim. As far as villains go, since being
introduced on Star Trek: The Next Generation, the Borg have become on of the
most popular villains in Star Trek.
The special effects in this latest effort are among the best in a Star Trek
film. As are the sets for the new Enterprise. In the tradition of the TV
series Star Trek: The Next Generation, the main cast does their usual superb
job. The "guest stars" of the film include Alice Krige as the Borg's queen,
and James Cromwell as Zefram Cockran, the man who is to make the historic
first warp flight. Cromwell, in my humble opinion, steals every scene he is
in. As usual, there is the normal humor associated with Star Trek, although
most of it is inside jokes that would go right over the head of non Star
Trek fans.
Generally, a great film that both diehard Trek fans and your average movie p
atron will enjoy.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Starring Matthew Broderick; Jean Reno; Maria Pitillo; Hank Azaria & Kevin
Dunn
The advertisements said that size does matter. I guess that's a bit of an
irony considering the size of this film's budget. Even with all of the money
that was obviously spent on this movie, Godzilla will probably go down as
one of the biggest disappointments of all time. Don't get me wrong, the
special effects are impressive -- what there are of them. But this movie
spends way too much time on the characters discussing strategies for
stopping the overgrown iguana and not enough time actually fighting the big
lizard. This movie could have been called Matthew Broderick as opposed to
Godzilla. Because Broderick gets way too much screen time in relation to the
big guy. When Godzilla is on screen, it is always dark and raining, so the
special effects never really come across as being that spectacular. For
those that don't really care about special effects shots, Godzilla has a
decent story line. It's just that Godzilla was marketed as a big budget
special effects picture, so when you notice the decided lack of spectacular
effects, it can be a bit of a disappointment. Add to that the fact that
Matthew Broderick, who is a great actor, just isn't the first person you
think of as the lead in an action film.
Nuclear testing in the South Pacific has genetically altered the native
lizards in the area and created what may be a new species. And a very large
species at that. Godzilla has lived under the sea in the area for years but
is now running out of food, so he is venturing out of hiding to find a new
food supply. His search eventually leads him to New York City
(coincidentally, the place where he can do the most damage). Broderick is a
scientist working for the US government who is brought in when Godzilla is
first discovered. He is supposed to try to figure out exactly what they are
dealing with. He then assists the powers that be in their battle to save New
York City from the big lizard. The search for Godzilla in New York is then
the focus of most of the movie. They never seem to know quite where he is at
any given time -- a point that undoubtedly saved the producers millions
since they didn't need to spend any money on special effects shots.
As I said, Broderick is a good actor, just not somebody who would be my
choice to headline a summer blockbuster movie. That having been said, he
does a pretty good job. As does Jean Reno, playing a mysterious man who
seems to keep showing up at the scene of Godzilla's destructive actions. The
good acting on the part of the leads really doesn't make up for the so-so
writing and the disappointingly scarce special effects.
Godzilla's creative team of Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin were also
responsible for Independence Day, another film that was short on story but
big on effects. I guess they figured this time that they would go short on
both story and effects. The end result is that they don't have nearly the
film in Godzilla that they had in Independence Day. Godzilla is not a truly
bad movie, but it never even comes close to living up to its enormous hype.

Title
Review for GoldenEye (1995)
Starring Pierce Brosnan; Sean Bean; Izabella Scorupco; Famke Janssen & Joe
Don Baker
This latest film in the 007 series finds the actor Pierce Brosnan in the
title role of the British secret agent. If a person were to compare Brosnan'
s portrayal of Bond to that of his predecessors, the most accurate
description would be to say that Brosnan is a cross between Roger Moore and
Sean Connery. Brosnan has the serious side that Connery brought to the
character. Happily, the element of campy humor that was present when Moore
played the Bond has returned. This is a welcome change from Timothy Dalton's
brooding incarnation in the previous two movies.
The premise of Goldeneye is simple. The Goldeneye is a killer satellite left
over from the cold war era that gets stolen by the usual collection of
villains that are always present in a good Bond flick. This includes one of
the most original "Bond girls" in a long while, played by the beautiful
Famke Janssen. Her outstanding trait is her ability to kill men using her
thighs. (Enough said) And while on the subject of female cast members,
British actress Judi Dench has taken over the role of "M", Bond's boss.
As with all Bond films, Goldeneye has its fair share of nifty spy gadgets
and car chases (and tank chases), enough to satisfy this James Bond fan
anyway. Unlike the previous Bond outing, this one never leaves you with the
feeling that the writers were struggling with the script.
All in all a solid value for your entertainment buck, and probably reason
that producers have signed Brosnan to star in the next bond film. Bond fans
will love this movie, and even folks who don't normally like James Bond
films are bound to have a good time as well.

Title
Review for Conversation, The (1974)
Starring Gene Hackman; John Cazale; Allen Garfield & Frederic Forrest
If the conversation is not the worst film ever made, it comes real close.
Which is strange, considering it was directed by Francis Coppola, and it
starred Gene Hackman and a young Harrison Ford.
This snoozer starts to go bad from the opening credits. During a long drawn
out surveillance operation, we see a couple having a conversation but can
only here bits and pieces, and really annoying sound effects in between. The
only reason this was included was so that Coppola could show everyone what a
brilliant filmmaker he is. Guess what Francis? It didn't work
Hackman plays Harry Caul, a master surveillance expert. On one of his jobs,
Harry overhears a conversation that could have serious repercussions to
those involved. Harry then has to wrestle with his conscience about whether
to turn the tape over to his employers or not.
That's the plot in a nutshell. The idea for the movie itself is not a bad
one, if done properly. It might have made a good episode of a half hour TV
show, but not a full length feature film. It's just too long, and for no
good reason. The movie ends up being a character study of Caul, and a bad
one at that. We don't really know that much more about Caul at the end of
the movie than at the beginning. For that matter, we really don't want to
either. Harry Caul is one strange dude, not strange in the funny way but
strange in a very distasteful way. This guy is WEIRD. Although he fits in
well, everyone in the film seems to be a few cards short of a full deck.
I'd say something about the lousy acting in the film, but the blame is less
on the actors and more on Coppola's lousy script. The only thing that the
actors should be questioned about is their judgment, as to why they got
involved with this turkey to begin with. As for Francis Coppola, he should
stick to directing and leave the writing to someone who has a clue how to
write a good script.
I don't know how this film could have gotten any worse.
Quite possibly the worst film ever made  0/10

Title
Review for Puppet Masters, The (1994)
Starring Donald Sutherland; Eric Thal; Julie Warner; Keith David & Will
Patton
Donald Sutherland stars in this story of aliens trying to take over the
Earth. They have landed in a small town and they are taking over the bodies
of the town's folk by attaching themselves to their backs and sticking a
probe into their brains. Even worse, they are rapidly spreading to the
neighboring communities. So it's up to Andrew Nivens (Donald Sutherland) and
his son Sam (Eric Thal) to stop them before the entire United States ends up
as the puppets for these aliens. Also along for the ride for the required
amount of sex appeal is Julie Warner playing a brilliant scientist who
eventually falls for Sutherland's son.
Even in the brief overview I gave of this movie, you may be able to glean
that it is a formula film right from the opening credits. It's sad to say,
but I don't think that the writers had one original thought when they wrote
this movie. I can't think of a single plot point that I hadn't seen in some
other movie. Anything that was even the slightest bit original was so
predictable that you almost knew what was going to happen without even
giving it any thought. Having said all that, the writers did manage to use
some decent plot points from all of the movies that they had obviously
watched, so the movie wasn't a total disaster. It's just not something that
you should sit down with expecting to be overwhelmed by all of the
creatively ingenious ideas. Because it isn't going to happen.
The acting is passable at best, on all counts including Sutherland. In
Donald's defense, he didn't have a great deal of material to work with. He
was playing the uncaring S.O.B. in this movie, which is a role that he has
played many times before with much greater success. Julie Warner was also a
disappointment since I had been very impressed with her in Doc Hollywood.
The only others worth mentioning were Richard Belzer (Homicide: Life On The
Street), and his character only said a few dozen words. Keith David also had
a small role, but as usual, he made the most of it.
The Puppet Masters is just your typical cookie cutter horror / sci-fi flick.
There was absolutely nothing remarkable about it. But it was just good
enough to keep my interest through the whole movie. Although, I can't say
that I would rush out to watch it again any time in the near future.

Title
Review for Phantoms (1998)
Starring Peter O'Toole; Rose McGowan; Joanna Going & Ben Affleck
Phantoms is a very pleasant surprise. I have to admit that I wasn't really
expecting very much from this horror film based on the Dean Koontz story.
Two sisters return to a small northwest town to find it apparently deserted.
Although they soon discover that the town isn't deserted but that everyone
has been killed by someone or something. They also realize that the same
thing that killed everyone has also trashed the engine in their car so that
they are unable to leave the town. It turns out that not everyone is dead,
and the two sisters are joined by a few members of the local sheriff's
department who were out on a call when the carnage ensued, and avoided being
killed. Unfortunately, whatever killed the rest of the town intends to make
sure that they don't stay alive very long. I can't say a whole lot about the
thing doing the killing in this film without giving too much away, so lets
just say the audience is kept guessing throughout most of the film.
While Phantoms was better than expected, I wasn't really expecting a whole
lot. The movie was not incredibly scary, but it was fun to watch. The cast
was the usual assortment of attractive young actors including some names
that you may actually be familiar with. These include Liev Shreiber and Rose
McGowan (both were in Scream) and Joanna Going who isn't a big name yet, but
my money says she will be. Rounding out the cast was Ben Affleck who made
this film before going on to win an Academy Award for Good Will Hunting. All
gave pretty good performances, at least as good as you can expect from a
horror film. Although I won't knock the writing too much since it was penned
by horror master Dean Koontz who knows a good scare when he sees one. The
production values are high and the special effects are stylish, if not
overly spectacular.
The idea behind phantoms is a good one, and it comes across on the screen
fairly well. Phantoms is a good choice for a little scare, just don't rent
it expecting it to become you new favorite movie.

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
Starring Vince Vaughn; Anne Heche; Julianne Moore & Viggo Mortensen
So why remake a classic like Psycho? After seeing the new version I still
have no idea why a remake was necessary. The only reason that I can come up
with is that they wanted to reach a younger audience that wasn't likely to
watch the original Black & White version. So how does this virtual shot for
shot remake compare to the original? Not bad. But compared to current horror
films, Psycho is dated, even if it is in color. Let's face it, the original
Psycho is not real scary by today's standards. I have my doubts that the
shower scene that terrified audiences back in 1960 will even phase today's
more jaded moviegoers. The original Psycho is a classic, this new version
will most likely end up as nothing more than a footnote. This is not to say
that the new Psycho is a bad movie, it's just that considering the only
differences in the movie are the cast and the color, most people would be
better off going to their local video store and renting the original.
For the uninformed out there, the plot of Psycho goes something like this.
Marion Crane (Anne Heche) steals a large quantity of money from her employer
and skips town with it. After a long day of driving, she stops for the night
at a motel run by Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn) and his Mother. Marion checks
in and then never checks out again after a little mishap in the shower.
Marion's sister (Julianne Moore) and Marion's lover (Viggo Mortenson) and
among those that set out to try to find out what happened to Marion.
In terms of the performances, the entire cast of the remake do a good job. A
real credit to them considering they are repeating line for line the
original dialogue of the original cast. Of course the main focus is on the
character of Norman Bates. Vince Vaughn does a very good job as the shy
motel owner with the overbearing mother. It's not good enough to make you
forget why Anthony Perkin's performance made the original the classic that
it is today. Other standouts in the cast are William H. Macy as a detective
working to find Marion Crane and her stolen money. The biggest treat of all
is the inclusion of Robert Forster in the cast. His character shows up at
the end of the film, and while it isn't a big part, it does end the movie
with a nice touch.
In terms of the look of the film, director Gus Van Sant does a good job. Of
course it would be hard not to do a good job since he basically replicated
everything Alfred Hitchcock did 40 years ago. My only complaint was that
they changed the exterior of Norman Bate's house, for what seems like no
reason other than for the sake of change.
Is the remake as good as the original? Not really, but it does have the
virtue of being in color. This new Psycho is good for taking a stroll down
memory lane. I found myself remembering certain scenes from the original as
I was watching this new incarnation. If you hate Black & White movies, then
go see this new Psycho. If you are not concerned about the color, rent the
original. While this new Psycho is a fairly good movie, the best thing about
it is that it will bring a whole new audience to the original

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
Starring Pierce Brosnan; Sophie Marceau; Robert Carlyle; Denise Richards &
Robbie Coltrane
Let me start off by saying that leading up to the release of the latest Bond
film, I really wasn't looking forward to it as much as I have with some of
the previous films. I'm not sure if it was the fairly lackluster trailers or
the ever-present dread that the next film will fall back into the miserable
ways of the Timothy Dalton years. I'm happy to report that any doubts were
erased after about the first 10 minutes of the film. By that point, it was
evident that Mr. Bond was back with a vengeance. All doubts would have
probably been erased sooner except for the fact that the first ten minutes
of the film weren't exactly a pleasant experience. It seems that nobody told
the geniuses working at the theater that the house lights are supposed to be
turned off when the movie starts. It took a reminder from an audience member
to clue them in. I guess they can be excused though, taking tickets and
cleaning up popcorn between shows is extremely taxing on the brain.
Anyway, after somebody remembered what the light switch was for, I settled
in for Bond. I think the most noticeable aspect of this, the 19th film in
the series, is that it really goes back to the almost tongue in cheek style
of the Roger Moore films. There were probably more one-liners in this movie
than in the last several combined. And Bond's last one-liner in the film is
about the best of the series. The World Is Not Enough also contained perhaps
the most action of any movie of the series. Everything from wild boat chases
to the usual assortment of cool Bond gadgets trotted out just when there
seems to be no way out for 007. For the most part, the action sequences
worked very well. Although, there were a couple of times that I thought some
things were a bit over the top, even for a Bond film. I think some of the
blame can be laid at the feet of director Michael Apted. While he did a good
job for the most part, there were points in the movie, specifically during
action sequences, that he seemed to loose site of the fact that he was
making essentially an action film. Most noticeably sequences on a snow
covered mountain and one involving Bond getting through a closing door
looked like Apted thought he was filming some sort of high brow art movie.
He almost seemed like he didn't know what he was doing. But they were brief
scenes and really shouldn't take away from the otherwise solid job that
Apted did in directing.
If you have ever seen a Bond film, you won't be shocked to learn that plot
has never been their strong suit. The World Is Not Enough is no exception.
This time we have yet another over villain that Bond has to stop for the
good of the world. 007 matches wits with the terrorist Renard (Robert
Carlyle), a man who has a bullet lodged in his brain that makes him
impervious to pain. Why this point is included is beyond me. They took great
pains to explain his condition, but it only came up later in the movie as a
scene that can only be described as looking like an afterthought. Anyway,
Renard, like the typical terrorist that he is, is bent on some harebrained
scheme involving a mid-east oil pipeline. I guess world domination just
isn't as attractive to terrorists as a money making venture anymore. Bond is
brought in to protect the pipeline's owner, Elektra King (Sophie Marceau),
who is the daughter of one of Renard's recent victims. Along the way, Bond
has to enlist the help of a nuclear scientist, Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise
Richards), and his old rival Valentin Zukovsky (Robert Carlyle). Like all
Bond films, you basically just have to suspend disbelief over the plot,
since it is ridiculous beyond words. My biggest complaint would be that it
was about the most disjointed of any of the Bond films. There was at least
one point that I had to stop and try to remember why Bond was where he was
and why he was doing what he was doing. The buddy that I saw the movie with
was completely confused over an earlier kidnapping of Marceau's character.
It was alluded to earlier in the movie briefly -- although not included in
the film. Later, it became a big part of the story and left him with the
distinct feeling that he had missed something. But because it is a Bond
film, the beautiful women and nifty gadgets seem to make you forget about
script problems quite quickly. After all, it isn't Shakespeare.
How about the cast? Brosnan seems to get better with each of his appearances
as 007. I grew up with the Roger Moore version of Bond, so I really enjoyed
the lighter style that Brosnan brings to the character. Judi Dench, as M,
had a bigger role in this film than in her two previous appearances in the
role. She brought the talent with her that one would expect from an Oscar
winner. Robbie Coltrane was easily one of the best parts in Goldeneye, so it
was nice to see his Russian mobster character revived in this movie.
Coltrane gets more screen time, which simply leads to him stealing even more
scenes. Then there are the Bond girls. Sophie Marceau might be one of the
most beautiful actresses working today. There is just something about her
breathtaking eyes that makes her a natural to play the innocent victim.
Those that saw her in Braveheart know she is more than just a pretty face.
Marceau may be the most talented actress to ever play a Bond love interest.
Then we have Denise Richards. There was no doubt in my mind that she was
cast exclusively for her looks. And after you see the outfits she wears, you
won't have any trouble guessing what part of her anatomy caught the
producer's eyes. I was pleasantly surprised to find that she really did a
good job playing a nuclear scientist. Admittedly, there was one point that
the audience snickered a bit at one of her technical lines of dialogue, but
other than that she stacks up (no pun intended) to her Bond girl
predecessors nicely.
I must say that the biggest disappointment was Robert Carlyle's character.
While Carlyle did a fine job with the material that he had, his character
just never worked for me. The producers tried very hard to add more
complexity to his character, but it just never quite got off the ground. I
guess I was hoping for a bit more regarding the whole impervious to pain
aspect of his character, but the writers decided to play up the emotional
side of his character. This might have worked well in another movie, but I
don't go to see Bond movies for their deep characterizations. Last, but not
least, we have Desmond Llewelyn as Q. This is the 17th appearance for
Llewelyn as Bond's gadget guy, and he is as good as ever. Although his
screen time has grown far more limited in the past few films, he is still a
treat to watch. Rumors abound that this may be his last appearance in the
role. He says future appearances are up to a higher power. The producers
have introduced his protege and future replacement, a bumbling and somewhat
pompous character played by comedy master John Cleese. While we don't see
much of him in this film, I think it is fair to say that Desmond Llewelyn's
legacy, whenever it is passed on, will be in very capable hands.
So how does it stack up? Despite some problems, The World Is Not Enough is a
very entertaining movie. And, all things considered, what problems it does
have are small compared to some that have plagued earlier Bond movies. This
is easily the best of the Brosnan films. It may even be the best of the
entire series, certainly in the top 3. One thing is for sure, even after 19
movies, there is still plenty of life left in the James Bond series. Here's
looking forward to Bond number 20.

Title
Review for Vegas Vacation (1997)
Starring Chevy Chase; Beverly D'Angelo; Randy Quaid; Ethan Embry & Marisol
Nichols
Vegas Vacation is the fourth film starring Chevy Chase and Beverly D'Angelo
as the heads of the hapless Griswold family. As with the other three films,
their two children, Rusty and Audrey, are played by a revolving series of
actors. This time Ethan Embry and Marisol Nichols fill the roles. Also back,
is Cousin Eddie (Randy Quaid), the slob relative who seems to bring problems
wherever he goes. In Vegas Vacation Clark Griswold (Chase) decides to take
the family on vacation to Las Vegas so that he and wife Ellen (D'Angelo) can
renew their wedding vows. It is at this point when comedy is supposed to
ensue. Apparently the filmmakers thought that putting the Griswolds into Las
Vegas would be so funny on its own that they wouldn't bother to write any
jokes into the script. At least that's the way it looks when watching this
turkey.
About half way through Vegas Vacation I began to have serious doubts as to
whether there would actually be a single laugh in the entire film, since
there had been none up to that point. By the end of the movie I had actually
snickered a couple of times, and I had smiled at a couple of gags. I might
add that none of the funny (and I use the term loosely) moments came as a
result of anything Chase, D'Angelo or Quaid were involved in. They might as
well have stayed home for as much as they contributed to this film. The two
best things in this movie were Ethan Embry and Marisol Nichols as the
Griswold kids, who manage to have a couple of their own adventures. Rusty
becomes a Vegas high roller, providing most of the film's best moments.
Every time Chase and Quaid were involved in a gag, it just made it more and
more apparent that they should have stopped this series after the third
film.
Which brings me to the best moment of the film. The Griswolds are driving
down the highway and Holiday Road (the theme from the original Vacation)
begins to play. Christie Brinkley and her red Ferrari (also from the first
movie) drive by. It was a cute moment, but all it really did was remind me
just how funny the first film had been, and just how far that this series
has fallen. Too bad.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Starring Liam Neeson; Ewan McGregor; Natalie Portman; Jake Lloyd & Pernilla
August
A long time ago in a galaxy far, far away.... I have to admit that when
those words appeared on the screen, my heart skipped a beat, even if only
ever so slightly. By the time the opening setup credits had finished, I was
all set for a good time. After seeing Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom
Menace, I was left wondering if I had seen the same movie that many film
critics had seemingly taken great delight in eviscerating in the weeks
leading up to its release. I certainly didn't experience the colossal
disappointment that many a critic were predicting that fans would suffer.
Nor did it appear as though anyone else in the sold-out theater where I saw
The Phantom Menace was overly underwhelmed. At least, not judging by the
applause that erupted when the film's end credits started to roll. Although,
I suppose that could have been from just being relieved that the worst 2
hours of their lives was now over. Call me crazy, but I don't think so. Let
me set the record straight on some of the more prominent criticisms of this
film. 1) That director George Lucas went a little crazy on the computer
generated aspects of the film. To be honest, the CGI was so subtle that I
hardly noticed most of it. Since 95% of the scenes were in some way
digitally enhanced, you would expect that it might get a little
overwhelming. Much of it involved scenes where some element of the
background had been enhanced in some small way. As for the big scenes such
as the dramatic battle between the Gungans and legions of battle droids, the
digital effects were so well done that I didn't even notice that everything
on screen was CGI. Criticism number 2 -- that the story was seriously
lacking. Admittedly The Phantom Menace is a setup for the next two films.
But the way in which Lucas sets up these cliffhangers that will be resolved
in the next films is brilliant. There are also more than a few winks and
nudges directed to those who are diehard fans of the movie. 3) The computer
generated character of Jar Jar Binks is really annoying. At first he kind of
is a bit, but I found that he grew on me as the movie progressed. He also
had some of the funniest lines in the film, provided you could understand
them. Of my complaints that is the biggest. Jar Jar's whole race spoke in a
backwards dialect that had its funny moments, but in most cases you really
had to work to make out what they were saying. 4) Jake Lloyd, who plays
young Anakin Skywalker, can't act. There are a few brief moments in the film
where it is painfully obvious why Lloyd has gained the nickname of Mannequin
Skywalker among some. To be perfectly honest, he wasn't half bad in most of
the movie. Which is a credit to Lucas for keeping Lloyd's dramatic scenes to
a bare minimum. Although, I certainly won't miss Lloyd in the next film. To
be quite frank, I found most criticism directed toward this film was blown
way out of proportion. I guess that is in keeping with everything
surrounding The Phantom Menace.
Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace, for those of you who are just
emerging from your caves, is the first in a trilogy of prequels to the
original Star Wars saga. This trilogy concerns how young Anakin Skywalker
eventually grew up to be the evil Darth Vader (the father of Star Wars' Luke
and Leia). The Phantom Menace begins with a trade dispute between the Trade
Federation and the planet of Naboo. The Trade Federation sets up a blockade
of Naboo to force them into submission. The Galactic Republic dispatches two
Jedi knights, Qui-Gon Jin (Liam Neeson) and his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi
(Ewan McGregor), to try to settle the dispute. Once there, the two Jedis
realize that there is something more sinister going on that just a trade
dispute. The mysterious Darth Sidious (even more mysteriously uncredited) is
secretly pulling the strings of the Trade Federation armies encircling
Naboo. He orders his men to commence the capture of the peaceful planet.
Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan manage to rescue the ruler of Naboo, Queen Amidala
(Natalie Portman), from the clutches of the Trade Federation's army, and
whisk her off to the planet of Coruscant where she can plead her planet's
case before the ruling Republic's Senate. On their way, their ship
experiences engine trouble and they have to land on the desert world on
Tatooine for repairs. There, Qui-Gon and Amidala meet a young boy named
Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) who seems to have a great connection with the
Force. The rest of the film is more of less the Jedi's and Amidala's
attempts to free her planet.
Much of The Phantom Menace is a setup for Episodes II and III. A good
portion of the movie is spent introducing the characters and their
forthcoming intertwining relationships which we all know will eventually
happen. At least those of us who have seen the first three films know what
is going to eventually happen. Episode I gives us a sneak peak of sorts into
what we know these characters are to become. For instance, we get the first
hints of the romance that is to blossom between the Anakin and Amidala (Luke
and Leia's parents). We also start to see the rise to power of the Senator
from Naboo named Palpatine (Ian McDiarmid) who would later become Darth
Vader's master, Emperor Palpatine. We also have the first indications from
the Jedi council, headed by Yoda (Frank Oz) and Mace Windu (Samuel L.
Jackson) that while Anakin may be strong with the Force, his future might be
less than rosy. All of this, and other subtle hints, will be to the great
delight of Star Wars fans. Those that have never seen the original trilogy
or haven't seen it in a while, may miss out on some of the more subtle
comments and hints. Lucas seems to have made The Phantom Menace as a teaser
of sorts for what is to come, and in that respect he has done it
brilliantly. The hints and anticipation about what is to come has left me
wishing that I didn't have to wait three more years to see the next chapter.
Aside from the setup for Episodes II and III, The Phantom Menace does stand
up on its own. The plot may be a bit light in places, but I certainly never
noticed. I was so caught up in the spectacle of it all. Visually, The
Phantom Menace is one breathtaking movie. The computer technology available
today has allowed Lucas' technical wizards to create whatever magical worlds
that Lucas can dream up. Particularly staggering were the capital city on
Naboo which featured grand waterfalls and ornate architecture. The
underwater sequences involving Jar Jar Binks' totally submersed home are as
stunning as anything you are ever likely to see on film. And of course, the
final battle involving the thousands of battle droids is something that
never could have been created without the use of computers.
"How about the actors?", you are no doubt asking yourself. Liam Neeson
displays the same abundant talent in this film as he did in Schindler's
List. He, along with Natalie Portman, is the heart of the movie. Portman is
incredible as the young Queen with the weight of an entire planet on her
shoulders. I feel obligated to note that when you take away the Queen's
strange outfits and even stranger makeup, Natalie Portman is absolutely
stunning. I realize that she was cast for her enormous talent as much as
anything else, but her classic beauty made me think that she was born to
play a queen. I was a bit disappointed that Ewan McGregor and Samuel J.
Jackson didn't have bigger roles in this film. I was especially shocked at
how little screen time McGregor got. But both be and Jackson gave great
performances in their roles. I also would have liked to see a bit more of
Darth Maul (Ray Park) who was other character that fit into the under used
category. The cast as a whole was an amazing one especially considering most
of them were acting with blue screens and not real actors at any given time.
And even those that weren't quite what they should have been (anyone who
sees the film will know who they are) didn't detract from the movie. In
fact, very little detracted from the movie. And if something did, you could
be sure that some other nifty thing would come along to take your mind off
any little bumps in the road. George Lucas threw enough small touches and
tiny details in to make up for any deficiencies that may have arisen.
Sure there were things that probably could have been done differently. I've
never seen a perfect movie yet, so I didn't expect this one to be flawless
either. Lucas has made a fun little movie that all ages will be able to
enjoy. It may not be quite as good as Star Wars, but it certainly stands up
well to The Empire Strikes Back and Return Of The Jedi. I only had one major
complaint as I walked out of this film -- that I have to wait 3 more years
to see the next one. That's the sort of complaint I wish I had with every
film.

Title
Review for Go (1999)
Starring Katie Holmes; Sarah Polley; Suzanne Krull; Desmond Askew & Nathan
Bexton
When I sat down to watch Go, I must admit that I was expecting yet another
in a long line of teen-oriented movies which have been popping up recently.
That is to say long on style and very short on substance. At first it seemed
as though that was what I was in store for. The movie started out a little
on the slow side (read lame). The director seemed more interested in showing
off music video style camera work than actually trying to tell a story.
Happily, the movie steadily improved to the point where it ended up being a
very good film. Due in no small part to its excellent young cast (some of
whom, I had never heard of before).
Go is basically three intersecting stories. They all start at more or less
the same point and then later converge in much the same point. All work very
well on their own and the fact that they all combine in the end is simply
icing on a very pleasant cake. There are no predominant stars in Go. All of
the cast have pretty decent sized roles. If I had to focus in on a few as
the main leads Sarah Polley, Katie Holmes, Scott Wolf and Jay Mohr come to
mind. Polley and Holmes play supermarket check out girls who are approached
by soap-opera starts Wolf and Mohr who are looking to score a few drugs for
a party that they are having. Polley and Holmes then try to procure the
drugs for the two actors but things don't go exactly as planned. This is a
gross simplification of the plot of the movie but to explain it in any
greater detail would risk spoiling it. It would also take a couple of
paragraphs.
Acting wise, Go is almost without fault. With the exception of one minor
character who got on my nerves a bit, the cast is amazing. Many will be
familiar with Scott Wolf from TV's Party Of Five. Anyone that has watched
TV's Dawson's Creek is no doubt familiar with the talent of Katie Holmes,
who ranks very high in my book as one of Hollywood's most talented young
stars. To hear US film critics talk, Sarah Polley has just magically
appeared out of nowhere. Canadians have been aware of Ms. Polley's
considerable talent for quite some time, so it comes as no shock to anyone
that she gives a standout performance in this her first major American film.
I'm guessing that those same critics forgot her performance in the Academy
Award-nominated The sweet Hereafter in 1997.
My only complaint was with some of the bad camera work in the early part of
the movie. To be honest, I don't think it really improved all that much as
the movie went on, but the story was so compelling that the poor direction
wasn't such a major issue. It's sad that Hollywood seems to thin that the
only way to keep a young audience's attention is to direct a film like a
music video. Herky jerky camera moves works well in a 3 minute music video,
but it gets real old real fast in a feature length movie.
Go is cleverly written and frequently funny, although some of the scenes do
miss the mark. I would say that Go is certainly the smartest movie that I
have seen in 1999. It will probably rank among the best of the teen-type
films released this year. If nothing else, it gives stars Sarah Polley,
Katie Holmes, Scott Wolf and the rest of the very talented cast a showcase
for their ample acting abilities.
8/10 -- Clever story and cast, only detracted from by the director's MTV
style camera work

Title
Review for Daylight (1996)
Starring Sylvester Stallone; Amy Brenneman; Viggo Mortensen; Dan Hedaya &
Jay O. Sanders
At first glance, Daylight would seem like your typical disaster movie. On
second glance it looks that way too. Although, as typical disaster movies
go, Daylight isn't that bad. Admittedly, it seems to rip off a great deal of
its plot devices from disaster flicks of days gone by (think Poseidon
Adventure). But the decent dialogue and surprisingly good acting make up for
the "haven't I seen this scene somewhere before?" feeling that creeps up all
too often during the film.
Sylvester Stallone stars as the recently fired head of New York's Emergency
Response team. By sheer luck, he is in the right place at the right time
when disaster strikes the unaware inhabitants of this little film. "What
disaster is that?" you ask, as you inch ever closer to the edge of your
seat. Glad you asked. Through a whole sequence of entirely probable events
(about as probable as hitting the lottery) a large explosion takes place in
the Lincoln tunnel running under the Hudson River in New York City. The
explosion results in the tunnel collapsing at both ends, which causes not
only massive loss of life, but traps a dozen people inside the wreckage of
the tunnel. Good old Sly, who is only feet away from entering the tunnel
when it collapses, offers his services to the rescuers, who gladly accept
it. Sly then enters the tunnel through a vent shaft (think Judge Dredd)
which he can only go in, and not out off, and proceeds to try to rescue
those trapped inside. So begins the fun, but the fun has to be quick,
because this tunnel has started to spring a leak.
The acting is about what you would expect of a Stallone movie. Not superb by
any means, but far above some of his other films (think Judge Dredd again).
Daylight's acting is probably average, or a little above, in terms of this
sort of genre, starring this particular star. Amy Brenneman is the only
actor of any note, and she does a pretty good job as Stallone's reluctant
helper. Oh yeah, Stallone's real life son, Sage, is in this too. Sage --
nice name. I guess it could be worse, he could have been named nutmeg or
parsley. Note to Sage -- you are still young. Go to school and get a good
education -- you don't have a future in acting.
The plot runs along the same lines as the acting -- interesting, but
predictable. Mostly due to the fact that it was pretty well recycled from a
dozen other action flicks. The biggest problem with a film of this nature is
that they try to cram too many things into the movie. As soon as the cast
clears one seemingly impossible hurdle, another one seems to pop right up,
even worse than the last one. I realize that it wouldn't be much of a movie
otherwise, but it does make the movie a bit predictable. Adding to the
predictability is the cast of characters, which of course, has to include at
least one or two difficult people who want to do things their own way and
think the qualified guy (in this case Stallone) doesn't know what he is
doing. Why is it in disaster movies we can never have everyone agree with
each other and all work together? Would this be too much to ask? Can't we
all just get along?
Special effects weren't bad -- but I've certainly seen better. Some of the
scenes, while fun to watch, were such blatant rip-offs that you had to
wonder if scripts from old movies were just copied verbatim. Especially all
of the scenes that involved anything underwater (the tunnel, of course,
starts to flood). I really expected Gene Hackman, Roddy McDowell and Ernest
Borgnine to appear at any minute -- I wasn't sure if I was watching Daylight
or The Poseidon Adventure. I suppose if you have to rip off a movie for good
ideas, The Poseidon Adventure is a good one to use. The underwater sequences
(aside from the deja vu) were very well shot and worked fairly well. They
were the best part of the movie by a long shot.
Better than average Stallone flick. I realize that's not saying much when
the man has Judge Dredd on his resume. But certainly not up to the standards
of Cliffhanger. Daylight is a fun movie, and as long as you aren't expecting
a whole lot you might even be pleasantly surprised.

Title
Review for Junior (1994)
Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger; Danny DeVito; Emma Thompson & Frank Langella
The only thing that you can say about Junior is that it is a disappointment,
and a big one at that. Junior brings together Arnold Schwarzenegger and
Danny DeVito with director Ivan Reitman. These are the same men that brought
us the very funny Twins. So foolish me, I was hoping for something that
would at least come close to the level of quality of Twins. So much for
hopes. Schwarzenegger and DeVito play two scientists (Doctors Hesse and
Arbogast) who are working on a new drug that will reduce the possibility of
miscarriage in pregnancy. Unfortunately, due to circumstances beyond their
control, they are denied permission to test this new drug on humans, and
subsequently lose their funding. Still believing that their drug will work,
they decide to test it anyway, on Hesse. So, Dr. Hesse (Schwarzenegger)
artificially inseminates himself and begins taking the drug. Their theory is
that if the drug can prevent a man from miscarrying, surely it will work on
a woman.
Does the thought of Arnold Schwarzenegger pregnant sound funny or humorous
to you? Well, it must have to the producers of Junior. Admittedly,
Schwarzenegger has the comedic talent to pull it off. Perhaps if it had been
done differently it might have actually been funny. But it wasn't,
Schwarzenegger pregnant is goofy at best. The sight of Schwarzenegger
running around going through the hormone imbalances that come with
pregnancy, and the accompanying emotional swings, is not funny.
Schwarzenegger comes very close to embarrassing himself with these antics. I
kept thinking to myself, with the time Arnold wasted making this turkey he
could have been making an action picture. Better yet, with Schwarzenegger,
DeVito and Reitman all in the same place at the same time, why didn't they
make a sequel to Twins? Anything would have been better than this mess.
Danny DeVito is wasted in this movie. His part could have been played by any
joker they pulled in off the street. (After seeing the movie, if I was
DeVito, I probably would have wished they had pulled someone in off the
street.) Emma Thompson is wasted here as well. While Thompson is best known
for her Jane Austin adaptations, she is also a fine comedian. Too bad she
didn't get to use any of that talent here.
Am I being too hard on this film? I don't think so. Schwarzenegger and
DeVito are two of my favorite actors in film today, and Ivan Reitman is one
of the more talented directors in Hollywood. With a supporting cast of Emma
Thompson and Frank Langella, the filmmakers really have to be trying hard to
make a bad film. They certainly managed here. Maybe it was well intentioned,
but unfortunately this is a movie that never should have been made.
If you are tempted to see this film, do yourself a favor and go rent Twins,
a film that truly takes advantage of Arnold Schwarzenegger and Danny
DeVito's comedic talents.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Starring Keanu Reeves; Laurence Fishburne; Carrie-Anne Moss; Hugo Weaving &
Gloria Foster
Let me first say that the conditions that I was forced to watch The Matrix
under were less than ideal. So I have tried to be as fair as possible
considering that my viewing experience was significantly less than ideal. I
watched The Matrix in a theater that is in serious need of upgrades at the
best of times. Under no circumstances, should it have ever been allowed to
show a big budget special effects laden film like The Matrix. This theater,
owned by the parent company of one of Hollywood's biggest studios, hasn't
even graduated into stereo sound yet. The mono sound that the audience was
subjected to sounded as if it was coming out of a speaker that was many
years past mandatory retirement age. In other words, the sound sucked. As
someone used to digital sound in a movie theater, bad sound doesn't do
anything to add to a film. I'm not even going to go into the horrible
splicing job that the projectionist did putting this film together.
There, I've had my rant, now on with the regularly scheduled review. Which
sadly won't include commentary on the film's sound which I'm assuming was
spectacular, but I'm just guessing. My guess on the sound seems like a
fairly solid one considering the visual quality of The Matrix. It is nothing
short of stunning visually. Sadly, the rest of the film, while pretty good,
doesn't quite measure up to the obvious effort that was expended on making
this film look so darn good.
The Matrix has at it's core a good concept, although it strays into the
confusing side more often than I would have liked. Keanu Reeves plays a
computer hacker who is drawn into the frightening realization that reality
is just a hoax. It turns out that that many years ago the world was
devastated by some sort of disaster. Now machines run the planet and humans
spend their lives in a sort of incubator, plugged into a computer network.
The computers are generating a virtual reality world which is a
representation of the Earth before it was destroyed. The population of the
planet never realizes that their entire life is a hoax and that they really
spend their entire lives as comatose. That is except a small band who have
discovered this horrible secret and have escaped their virtual prisons. They
now spend their lives combating the computers in an effort to expose this
lie. Reeve's character, Neo, is recruited by this band of rebels led by
Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne). Newcomer Carrie-Anne Moss and one of
Hollywood's most underrated actors, Joe Pantoliano, join Fishburne in the
band of freedom-fighters.
The action sequences are nothing short of spectacular. This can be
attributed as much to the amazing special effects as to many of the actor's
extensive pre-production training in martial arts. This lends itself to some
of the best martial arts sequences that you are ever likely to see in a
film. When you add this to some of the wild effects in the computer
generated world, it all adds up to an eyeful.
As I already said, the visuals far outpace the rest of the film. Acting in
The Matrix is not bad, but it certainly isn't real good either. Keanu Reeves
gives his usual fairly emotionless performances. Although to his credit, it
is one of his better performances. Laurence Fishburne on the other hand
often seemed to forget that he was in a sci-fi action film. More than a few
times he delivered his lines as if he thought he was performing in some sort
of Shakespearean drama. Joe Pantoliano was a little under used in this film
but he made the most with what he had. Carrie-Anne Moss turned out a
surprisingly good performance for this her first feature film role. It's
nice to see that she was cast as much for her talent as for her breathtaking
looks.
You have to give all of the main actors a healthy dose of credit for the
work that they obviously put into the physical training for their roles in
this film. It was clear that no small effort went into getting the moves
down perfectly for the fighting sequences. I also put much of the blame for
the somewhat strained performances in The Matrix on the dialogue, which was
terrible at times.
In more than a few places it got way too existential for my liking and at
other times it was just plain weird. It almost seems as though the writers
were having a difficult time trying to figure out how to explain the concept
for the movie. So they decided to make the dialogue as obtuse as possible so
that no one could figure out what the heck they were talking about. Thereby
covering up any leaps of faith that they may have had to make in the
departments of logic and believability. My other major complaint with The
Matrix was with the very unsatisfying ending. The setup for it was hokey and
frankly used in many a bad film before. The ending itself was just plain
strange.
The main reasons to recommend The Matrix are the visual effects and computer
animation which make this a real treat to watch. While the rest of the film
(acting, dialogue and to a degree plot) detract from the high production
values, they don't detract enough to prevent me from recommending The Matrix
as a fun way to spend an evening.

Title
Review for Blazing Saddles (1974)
Starring Cleavon Little; Gene Wilder; Slim Pickens; Harvey Korman & Madeline
Kahn
I'm giving this stinker 0 out of 10. Normally, the worst that I would ever
rate a movie would be 1 out of 10. But the total waste of time that is
Blazing Saddles is, compounded by the fact that this movie is incredibly
offensive, helped me come to the big goose egg. I'm not sure what the hell
Mel Brooks was thinking when he made this thing, or if he was even thinking
at all. Maybe in Mel's little mind a horse being knocked unconscious because
of a punch to the face is funny. In mine, it's not. Or maybe Mel graduated
from the Spike Lee school of filmmaking. Because only the self-righteous Lee
uses the N-word more often in his films than Brooks did in this one. At
least Lee has the smarts to realize that nobody is going to find that term
amusing. Brooks bandies it about like he figures the audience will be
rolling in the aisles every time they hear it. Wrong Mel! I would call you a
boob Mel, but that insults breasts everywhere.
This idiotic attempt at a comedy centers on the evil Lieutenant Governor's
(Harvey Korman) attempts to clear out a town so he can buy up the land cheap
and sell it to the railroad. He sends his goons to run the townsfolk out.
But the town appeals to the governor (Mel Brooks in one of many uninspired,
and unfunny roles) to send them a new sheriff to protect them. The governor
pawns the task off to Korman's character Hedley Lamarr. (I can tell you are
rolling off your chairs right now just thinking of all the humor in that
name.) Lamarr decides to send the town a black sheriff (gasp) in the hopes
that the town will be so disgusted at the prospect of a black man living
among them that they will all just leave. Hold on, I've got to stop while
these gales of laughter pass. It's just too funny. Racism passing as
humor -- gosh why didn't anybody ever think of that one before? Oh wait, I
think somebody might have -- they are called the KKK. I'm not calling Brooks
a racist -- but I am calling him an insensitive bastard who wouldn't know
what was funny if it hit him over the head. But I digress. Anyway, the black
sheriff rides into town amid a flurry of townsfolk using the N-word. Golly,
will the hilarity just never end? He ends up joining forces with a drunk
(Gene Wilder), who happens to be the former fastest gun in the West.
Together, they save the day from evil.
Not one person in this movie gives a decent performance. Wilder looks like
he is recovering from a head injury for most of the movie, and Korman looks
embarrassed to be a part of the movie. OK, he really didn't -- but he should
have. The films star Cleavon Little goes along with the black jokes as if
they were discussing the time of day.
I did not laugh once during this whole sorry experience. I admit to starting
to snicker on a couple of occasions. Actually, the end started to look as if
it was going to have some promise, but alas, it ended up being as crappy as
the rest of the movie. I can say with full confidence that Blazing Saddles
has no redeeming qualities whatsoever. Mel Brooks would be doing the world a
favor if he burned every last copy of this film.

Title
Review for Friday the 13th (1980)
This is the first film in what would become the most successful series of
horror films of all time. A fair warning to those of you who might be
inclined to watch this movie for the first appearance of everyone's favorite
goalie-mask-wearing homicidal maniac. Jason, the guy who single handedly
controlled the overpopulation problem around the Crystal Lake area, doesn't
start his quest to find the most interesting household item with which to
kill someone until the sequel. While he does have a small role in this film,
we the audience have to depend on another blood thirsty maniac to rack up
the body count. The plot, like every other Friday The 13th movie goes
something like this -- crazed killer murders as many unsuspecting teenagers
as he/she/it possibly can in the space of a 90 minute movie. The reasons
that the afore mentioned unsuspecting teenagers come into contact with the
bloodthirsty killer are usually of little importance to the story. But for
those of you out there that might actually care about such trivial matters
in a movie such as a plot, here are the basics. A bunch of unsuspecting
teens get a summer job at a long closed summer camp. They are days away from
the arrival of the kids and they are spending their time fixing the place up
and making sure it is ready for the kids. Sadly, they start being butchered
one by one by the bloodthirsty killer.
At this point I would usually say something about the quality of acting,
directing or maybe something about the high quality of the production. Since
I'm not going to do that, feel free to assume that if I did, it wouldn't be
positive. I will say that this movie looks as if it was made for about a
hundred bucks, and that includes the actors' salaries. If you are used to
recent horror films like Scream, you are in for a bit of a surprise. The
only saving grace for Friday The 13th is that it was really the first of its
kind, with the killer taking real pride in their work. Using as many methods
of murder as they could. None of this single murder weapon stuff life that
unimaginative Leatherface in Chainsaw Massacre, or the creatively stifled
imagination of Halloween's Michael Myers who just used brute force or a
really big kitchen knife. Nope, in the Friday The 13th movies, you can
always count on the killer taking great pride in his work.
One fun fact about this movie is that the cast includes a very young Kevin
Bacon, although after this movie it is a wonder he ever worked again. The
main reason to see Friday The 13th is if you want to watch all of the series
from the beginning. If not, stick with the later films with Jason,
everyone's favorite hockey fan. Friday The 13th is the sort of movie that is
fun to sit down and get a couple of scares from, just don't sit down
expecting a whole lot.

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
Starring James Marsden; Katie Holmes; Nich Stahl; Ethan Embry & Natassia
Maltke
Disturbing Behavior is your typical teen oriented horror flick. It's
certainly not going down as one of the classics in the genre. To be
perfectly honest, probably the only reason it will be remembered is because
of the presence of Katie Holmes. While her performance isn't quite as good
as fan's of her TV show Dawson's Creek might have come to expect from her,
she does make the most of the material that she has to work with. As do the
rest of the fairly talented, if not exceptional, young cast.
Steve Clark (James Marsden) and his family move to a small Pacific Northwest
community where something seems just a little to good to be true about some
of the local high school students. They are high over achievers and very
community oriented. They also have the tendency to become homicidal on
occasion (nobody's perfect). Like every school, this one also has its less
than perfect students. They are the leather clad, drinking and smoking (not
necessarily cigarettes) bunch, who aren't exactly on the honor role. Their
numbers seem to be diminishing slowly as many of them are joining the ranks
of the preppy elite in the school. This is all due to the influence of the
school guidance counselor who is doing a little experimenting on his
students. The basis of this movie is how Marsden and his new friend the
leather- clad Katie Holmes run head on into the preppies.
First, I should start by saying that Katie Holmes in leather is more than an
adequate reason for me to recommend this movie. If that isn't enough for you
(and I can't see why it wouldn't be), I'll give the movie a couple of more
points in the win column. As I've already alluded to, the acting is solid,
and is certainly better than most films of this genre, although not quite up
to films such as Scream and I Know What You Did Last Summer. This is a good
looking film, very well photographed, and the Pacific Northwest scenery is
used to full advantage. At least to the extent that it looks god in the
daylight shots. Which, as horror fans know, are few and far between in
horror flicks.
The basic premise of the movie is a pretty tired one. The population slowly
being converted into something else has been done more times than I care to
imagine. There are really not a great deal of new twists that make it
considerably different from other films of this type. Even though it's not
particularly original, it does add enough twists to keep your interest
through the whole movie. Not exactly ringing endorsements, but considering
the horror films of just a few years ago (pre Scream), this could almost be
considered a masterpiece.
If taken for what it is, a formula horror flick, Disturbing Behavior isn't
half bad. My guess is 10 years from now the only reason that anyone will
remember this is for the fact that it was one of the very talented Katie
Holmes' first starring roles.

Title
Review for Tarzan and the Lost City (1998)
Starring Casper Van Dien; Jane March; Steven Waddington; Winston Ntshona &
Rapulana Seiphemo
The only two really good things that I can say about Tarzan And The Lost
City are as follows: Jane March was very cute as Jane, and the movie was
thankfully under 90 minutes in length. If you haven't already figured it
out, I didn't like this movie very much.
The plot was boring and contrived to the extreme. Tarzan (Casper Van Dien)
has now left the jungle and living in civilized society. He is just days
away from his impending marriage to Jane, played by the aptly named Jane
March. Back in his former home of Africa, a group of looters has found the
key to locating a lost city. (Mind you I never really figured out why they
actually wanted to find this city.) Anyway, Tarzan's old jungle friend
appears to him in a vision. Tarzan realizes that he must return to Africa to
help stop the bad guys from finding the lost city. He leaves Jane (his first
mistake, in my opinion) and travels to Africa. Of course, Jane is hot on her
ape man's heals. The two of them are reunited in Africa where they do battle
with the bad guys. Sound like a dumb explanation of the plot? It's actually
an improvement over the real thing.
The acting is just plain awful. I'm not quite sure what Casper Van Dien was
doing in this film, but it wasn't acting. Jane March wasn't a heck of a lot
better, but at least she is easy on the eyes. Compounding the bad acting was
the fact that in many places the dialogue had obviously been re-recorded,
and I've seen better dubbing in some old Bruce Lee movies. Added to the
sound problems was the cinematography. This film was filled with beautiful
African scenery. But the panoramic scenery shots looked overexposed to me.
Quite frankly, I think you could probably do a better job capturing the
beauty of Africa with a camcorder than this bunch did with professional film
equipment.
Then we have the special effects. "Special effects in a Tarzan movie?" you
are no doubt asking yourself? Yes friends, the writers injected some very
out of place supernatural elements into the story. Probably for the sake of
using CGI, since it did nothing but hurt the story. In most parts, they
weren't bad, just nothing special. But, they were more than a little on the
hokey side. Except of course, when we got to the ridiculous climax of this
movie. The grand finale's special effects went right into the toilet at that
point. It almost looked like they had run out of money. These effects were
of noticeably lower quality than those in the rest of the film and looked
like something in an amateur video production.
I took one lesson away from watching Tarzan And The Lost city -- ape men and
bones that morph into skeletal warriors don't mix. Stay far away from this
version of Tarzan.

Title
Review for Raiders of the Lost Ark (1981)
Starring Harrison Ford; Karen Allen; Paul Freeman; Ronald Lacey & John
Rhys-Davies
In My humble opinion, Raiders of The Lost Ark ties Star Wars as the best
movie of all time. If that doesn't give you a hint as to the contents of
this review, nothing will.
It's 1935, and Indiana Jones (Harrison Ford) is a professor of archaeology.
Only, that's his day job. Jones is a globe hopper who has a unique talent
for acquiring rare antiquities. Jones' talents come to the attention of U.S.
Army intelligence, who just happen to require a little assistance. It seems
that Adolf Hitler and his Nazis have set out to recover the long lost Ark of
the Covenant. The Ark, according to the bible, was the container in which
the Ten Commandments were housed. According to legend the Ark will bring
incredible power to those who possess it. Jones, always up for a challenge,
agrees to try to find the Ark before the Nazis do.
I'm not going to bother giving a synopsis of the rest of the movie, because
99% of the people reading this review will already have seen the movie. As
to the other 1%, trust me when I say that nothing I could write here would
ever do this movie justice. Raiders is the classic action adventure, there
has never been anything like it before, and nothing since has ever measured
up to it. Including it's two sequels.
Harrison Ford is perfect as the adventurer who completes his goals no matter
what it takes.
The rest on the supporting cast do a fantastic job, including John
Rhys-Davies as Indiana's Egyptian connection Sallah and Paul Freeman as
Beloq, the French archaeologist who heads up the Nazi team searching for the
Ark. The only weakness in this movie comes from the casting of Karen Allen
as Marion Ravenwood, Jones' former flame and current partner in his quest
for the Ark. Not that there is anything wrong with Allen's acting, I've just
never felt that she was right for the part. Oh well, if that is my biggest
complaint about a movie I'm doing OK.
I could rave on and on about this movie for hours, but in the end I would
probably be just preaching to the choir. If you are one of the very few
people who have never seen this film, do yourself a favor and watch it. I
guarantee you will not regret it.
Possibly the best film ever made  10/10

Title
Review for Congo (1995)
Starring Laura Linney; Dylan Walsh; Ernie Hudson; Tim Curry & Grant Heslov
Congo is based on the Michael Crichton novel of the same name. Laura Linney
plays a scientist whose company has sent an expedition into the Congo to
look for a lost city. While the expedition is in contact with their
employers in the US via a video satellite link, they are attacked. Before
the transmission is cut off, it appears as though the attackers are giant
gorillas.
Linney is told to mount another expedition to find out what happened. Her
character hooks up with another expedition that is also going to the Congo.
This one consists of a scientist who is returning his gorilla, Amy, to the
Congo. Oh yeah, Amy knows sign language and the intrepid scientist has
developed technology that interprets her signs into words. So Amy can speak.
Sound kinda dumb? Well, in the original novel, Crichton pulls it off. The
movie doesn't.
Congo is a disappointment from the get go. Amy, as you might expect, is not
a real gorilla -- and it shows. There are very few scenes in this movie were
you might actually be fooled into thinking this was anything other than a
guy in a bad gorilla suit.
The actors are largely wasted in this movie -- especially Ernie Hudson who
plays the guide, and Tim Curry as the shady treasure hunter along for the
ride. The rest of the cast is almost laughable. It may be as much a fault of
the script as it was of the actors. I suppose if I was an actor, it would be
pretty difficult trying to give my best effort while acting alongside a
talking monkey.  Not to mention the fact that Congo doesn't quite seem to
know if it is an action movie or if it some sort of environmental cause. The
movie seems to instantly switch gears back and fourth from this dangerous
search for the lost city, to some sort of animal rights message that Amy
should be with her own kind in the jungle and not in captivity. Of course
that message is completely forgotten when the killer apes arrive and the
cast starts unloading some heavy firepower into them. I'm not even going to
go into the somewhat schizophrenic killer apes. For most of the movie they
are portrayed as being these highly intelligent creatures, but during the
final climactic scenes of the movie all those brains seem to have gone right
out the window.
Confused? Don't feel bad. So were the filmmakers. The movie isn't a total
disaster; it just could have been so much better considering the source of
the story. Which, in all fairness, is not Crichton's best work. So let's
just say this film is no Jurassic Park. The only high point, and we're not
talking Mount Everest here, is the fact that some of the special effects
weren't half bad. But they weren't good enough to make up for the guy in the
bad monkey suit. My advice? If you are a Michael Crichton fan -- read the
book. Everyone else should stay away from this movie and check out one of
the better Crichton movie adaptations  like Jurassic Park or Rising Sun

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
Starring Jamie Lee Curtis; Adam Arkin; Josh Hartnett; Michelle Williams &
Adam Hann-Byrd
Good old Michael Myers is back to instill his usual brand of terror on
Halloween night. Unlike the previous 2 dozen sequels (at least it seemed
like that many), this latest installment has some real actors involved. At
the head of that list is Jamie Lee Curtis who became a star after starring
in the first Halloween and its first sequel as Laurie Strode, Michael Myers'
sister and the object of his obsession. Of course obsession in Mike's case
means that he wants to kill her. Joining Curtis this time out are Adam Arkin
(from TV's Chicago Hope) and Michelle Williams (from TV's Dawson's Creek).
It must have seemed like a reunion of sorts for Michelle Williams, since the
executive producer of Dawson's Creek, Kevin Williamson, also had a hand in
the making of Halloween: H20. By now people are starting to realize that
Kevin Williamson's involvement in a movie tends to mean that a quality
project is going to appear on the screen. With such horror films as Scream,
Scream 2 and I Know What You Did Last Summer under his belt, Kevin
Williamson knows a little something about horror films. A fact that is
fairly evident in the latest Halloween movie. Gone are the plot less,
mindless, badly acted sequels on the past few years, Williamson and company
have managed to breathe new life into a very tired horror series that by
rights should have been killed off years ago. It's a credit to all of those
involved in H20 that it makes you remember just why the original is
considered to be the classic that it is today. And speaking of classics, no
review of H20 would be complete without the mentioning the inclusion of
Janet Leigh in a small but memorable role in H20. For those of you who are
less knowledgeable out there in movie land, Leigh starred in psycho and was
the one who ended taking that ill- fated shower at the Bates motel. She also
happens to be Jamie Lee Curtis' mother. I only mention this because most of
the fairly young audience that I screened the film with completely missed
the very clever psycho references that Leigh made.
Anyway, on to the plot. As everybody already knows, Michael Myers is the
masked knife wielding psycho who seems to be on a fairly relentless quest to
kill off all members of his family. (As a bit of trivia, the mask that Myers
wears is a William Shatner mask painted white. Which may explain all of the
bad acting in the past several sequels.) Although just how relentless that
murderous quest is seems to be questionable. This latest Halloween film
seems to ignore the events of the last 3 or 4 sequels where Myers has killed
off half of the Midwestern United States. It seems to suggest that Myers
hasn't been heard from since the events of the first two movies. But in
other ways it doesn't, since Curtis's character supposedly changed her name
and went into hiding sometime after the events of the first two movies --
giving way to explain why she wasn't around for the last 3 of these movies
when Myers was trying to slice and dice her daughter. At any rate, good old
Mike, after all these years has finally figured out where his sister Laurie
is and he is coming over for a family reunion. Since Laurie Strode and Mike
last exchanged pleasantries (in the form of Laurie blowing him up in
Halloween 2), Laurie has changed her name, and is a divorced mother of one
(which doesn't explain her daughter who Myers terrorized through Halloween 4
and 5) and she is a teacher at a private school in California. It seems that
the majority of the student body is going off on a little field trip that
will leave the gated campus largely deserted over the Halloween weekend.
Gosh, that's convenient. Also hanging out on the campus are Strode's son and
his girlfriend, as well as another young couple who are playing hookey from
the field trip. Oh yeah, uncle Mike shows up too, just in time to show off
his own brand of trick or treating. You can probably figure out the rest.
But lets just say that Jamie Lee Curtis shows us that even after twenty
years she can still take on masked killers with the best of them.
My complaints with this movie are small ones. Unlike the Scream films, the
characters in this movie don't appear to have watched that many horror
films, so as a result, when Myers appears wielding some large weapon, they
tend to be your typical dumb horror film characters. I.e. They run upstairs
as opposed to running out the front door. My next beef is the whole timeline
thing. While I understand that the producers would love to forget the last
few movies, it tends to be a bit confusing for those of us who actually sat
through all of them. (What can I say? I have no life.) I guess my biggest
disappointment was sadly one that could not have been prevented. Donald
Pleasance, the only bright spot in all of the Halloween films passed away
after the filming of the last Halloween movie, so Dr. Sam Loomis was not
around to save the day as he was in the earlier 6 films. Although as a sort
of tribute to him, they did use his voice in one of the opening scenes of
the film as they were recapping the Halloween story for those that may not
have seen Myers and company in twenty years.
The best Halloween since the original.

Title
Review for Fright Night Part II (1989)
Starring Roddy McDowall; William Ragsdale; Traci Lin & Julie Carmen
It is with some sad irony that I screened Fright Night Part 2 on the day
that one of it's stars, Roddy McDowall passed away at the age of 70.
McDowall was one of the most talented and prolific actors in Hollywood,
having a career that spanned over 60 years and appearing in more than 100
films. Fright Night Part 2 probably will not be counted among his more
memorable roles. This is really sad considering how good the first Fright
Night film was. William Ragsdale and Roddy McDowall both reprised their
roles as the somewhat reluctant vampire killers who seem to be the only ones
that realize that vampires walk among us. (At least in the movies anyway.)
It has been several years since Charlie Brewster (Ragsdale) and B-movie
actor turned late night horror film host, Peter Vincent (McDowall) came face
to face with a real live vampire who just happened to be Charlie's next door
neighbor. Charlie and Peter won that battle, but apparently even vampires
have relatives who get pissed if you kill members of their family.
Apparently Charlie's former bloodsucking next door neighbor had a sister who
was none too pleased to find out that some kid and an aging actor staked her
sibling. So she decides to exact a little bit of revenge. This ends up
forcing Charlie and Peter to battle the forces of darkness yet again.
One of the things that made Fright Night such a success was Chris Sarandon
who played Charlie's stylish next door neighbor with a taste for blood.
Fright Night Part 2 tries to duplicate that modern style but it falls sort.
While they are stylish, the vamps in this film just don't have the
personality of the undead in the first film. With the exception of a
werewolf who adds some much needed comic relief to a few of the scenes. One
bright spot, speaking from a strictly sexist point of view, is Traci Lin,
who plays Charlie's very skeptical girlfriend. It's really a shame that her
career hasn't been better since she made this film. Ragsdale does a fair job
in this film, but doesn't give nearly the performance that he did in the
original. Roddy McDowall makes the most with what he is given, which
unfortunately isn't much which is a shame because his character was a lot of
fun in the original movie.
I guess I would have to say that the first film was a superior product in
every way. The original always left you feeling danger was lurking right
around the corner, Part 2 had more of the feel of a music video. Never a
good thing for a horror film. Another minus for Part 2 was the traditional
scenes that leave the audience on the edge of their seats waiting for
something to jump out of a shadow where very rare. For that matter, they
were almost nonexistent.
If I was going to watch a horror film, this would be far from my first
choice. The first Fright Night, on the other hand, would be right up near
the top of my list. If I was in the mood for a Roddy McDowall film I'd
probably head to the science fiction section of my local video store and
rent Planet Of The Apes. Either way Fright Night Part 2 would most likely
not enter into the equation.

Title
Review for Empire Strikes Back, The (1980)
Starring Mark Hamill; Harrison Ford; Carrie Fisher; Billy Dee Williams &
Anthony Daniels
The Empire Strikes Back is the second film in the original Star Wars
trilogy, and the darkest of the three. And easily the worst. Although worst
is a relative term when it comes to Star Wars films, since I would still
rank The Empire Strikes Back as one of the ten best films of all time.
The film picks up shortly after Star Wars left off. The Death Star has been
destroyed and the Empire is none too happy about it. In particular, Darth
Vader wants to get his hands on Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill), and will go to
any lengths to do so. Vader and his men track Skywalker and company to the
Rebel's new base on the ice world of Hoth. The ensuing battle is still one
of the best in film history. The Rebels manage to escape (if they didn't it
would be a real short film). Luke, along with R2-D2 goes off to find Yoda,
the Jedi master, to learn how to become a Jedi like his late father. In the
mean time, Vader's forces pursue Han Solo (Harrison Ford), Princess Leia
(Carrie Fisher), Chewbacca and C-3PO. There is not much point saying more,
since the movie has been out almost two decades everyone knows what happens
from here. Let's just say it involves asteroid fields, swamps and a way cool
cloud city.
Even after this many years, the special effects still look good. Although
now that the Special Edition has been released, you may find it difficult to
find a copy of the original. This is by far the darkest movie of the
three -- it's almost depressing in places. But it still finds time to inject
some humor. No surprises when it comes to acting, directing or story. All
are impressive. Harrison Ford continues his trend from the first movie by
stealing pretty much every scene he is in with his roguish charm. And the
scenes that Ford doesn't steal go to Frank Oz in his performance of Yoda,
and Kenny Baker as R2-D2.
As stated earlier, one of the ten best movies of all time, always worth
checking out again and again. My guess is that you will probably have to
settle for the newer digitally mastered Special Edition though. But on the
up side, the differences are fairly insignificant, and some of the minor
flaws of the original version have been corrected.

Title
Review for Return of the Jedi (1983)
Return Of The Jedi
A review by Joe Chamberlain
Starring Mark Hamill; Harrison Ford; Carrie Fisher & Billy Dee Williams
Return Of The Jedi is the third installment of the Star Wars trilogy, and
the second best of the three. (Star wars being the best.) It picks up where
The Empire Strikes Back left off -- Han Solo is feeling somewhat confined
and Luke Skywalker is dealing with some serious parental issues. In this
film, Han Solo (Harrison Ford), Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill), and Princess
Leia (Carrie Fisher) travel to the forest moon of Endor. There they must try
to deactivate a generator that is powering a shield protecting the Empire's
new Death Star. Once the shield is removed the Rebel armada plans to attack
the Empire's new space station in their final showdown with Darth Vader and
friends. If you don't know all this by now, most likely you have either been
in a coma or living in a South American jungle for the last 15 years.
Unlike The Empire Strikes Back, which bordered on depressing in places,
Return Of The Jedi is much more fun. Especially the scenes on the Endor Moon
involving the Ewoks -- probably the cutest creatures to ever hit the big
screen, with the possible exception of E.T.. Return Of The Jedi also
benefits from what seems like the most action of the three films. This is
highlighted by the spectacular battle between the Imperial forces and the
Rebel/Ewok team.
I must confess to being a much bigger Han Solo fan than I am a Luke
Skywalker fan. So if I have one criticism of the movie, it is the extended
periods in the film that focus on the Emperor's attempts to turn Luke to the
dark side of the Force. A minor complaint, but one point worthy of note.
Although it is not a point large enough to prevent me from ranking Return Of
The Jedi as one of my favorite films of all time. Return Of The Jedi serves
as a fitting end to one of the greatest series of movies ever produced. It
ties up all the loose ends of the previous films and stands as a reminder
that sequels don't necessarily have to be inferior knockoffs of the original
film.
Whether you've seen the first two films or not, Return Of The Jedi is easily
two of the most enjoyable hours you will ever spend watching a film.

Title
Review for Buffy the Vampire Slayer (1992)
Starring Kristy Swanson; Donald Sutherland; Paul Reubens & Rutger Hauer
Buffy The Vampire Slayer is the film that spawned the successful television
series of the same name. While Buffy's creator Joss Whedon, who is probably
one of the most talented men in Hollywood, wrote both the TV series and the
movie, the lead actress is different. Buffy was first played by Kristy
Swanson in this movie, as opposed to Sarah Michelle Gellar who plays the
vampire killing babe on TV.
Buffy is cheesy. And it is meant to be (at least I hope that they meant it
to be). My first piece of advice is if you watch this film expecting
anything other than a campy, fun little film, you are in for a big
disappointment.
Apparently vampires roam the Earth. On top of this disturbing fact, there is
only one person that can stop them. The Vampire Slayer. Now there is only
one slayer at a time, and each time one gets killed a new one is chosen to
replace her. Well, in present day Los Angeles its air-head cheerleader Buffy
(Kristy Swanson) that gets the nod to be the next slayer. When she gets
approached by Merrick (Donald Sutherland), her watcher (the guy that trains
her), she is not exactly interested in the job. But soon becomes convinced
that LA has more than its share of vampire activity. The vamps are headed up
by Lothos, played by Rutger Hauer in one of his usual villain rolls. The
interesting casting choice comes in Lothos' sidekick, Amilyn, played by none
other than Paul Reubens (a.k.a. Pee Wee Herman). Now I don't want to give
anything away, but when Pee Wee's fate is decided at the end of the movie it
is one of my favorite scenes in a movie of all time. I won't say any more
but the movie is almost worth it for that one scene alone. Almost, but not
quite. As a horror film -- it isn't scary. As a comedy -- it isn't that
funny. So I'm not really sure what Buffy The Vampire Slayer is trying to be.
As I said, I think Buffy's writer Joss Whedon is one of the most talented
men in Hollywood, but I get the impression that this one of his earliest
efforts, and I must say that his skills have improved significantly since
this movie.
Kristy Swanson shines in this movie if only because she is just so darn
cute. That and the fact that she seems to get most of the best lines on the
movie, other than Pee Wee. Donald Sutherland and Rutger Hauer are good in
their roles but one has to wonder just how bad their careers were at the
time to take these roles. Luke Perry also shows up as pike, Buffy love
interest. Not being a big Luke Perry fan, I was surprisingly impressed at
the job that he did.
In Summary, Buffy is cheesy, campy, and not a particularly great movie,
although worth a look if you are just interested in a little bit of fun
without having to think too much.
Good for a few laughs, but not much else  5/10

Title
Review for Texas Chain Saw Massacre, The (1974)
Starring Marilyn Burns; Allen Danziger; Paul A. Partain & William Vail
The Texas Chainsaw Massacre is one of the original slasher films. Unlike the
current crop of slasher films, like Scream -- The Texas Chainsaw Massacre is
a little more low budget. Actually, that is an understatement. Chainsaw
Massacre makes the original Halloween look as if it was shot on a budget the
size of Titanic. This is one cheesy movie. Cheesy camera shots, cheesy
locations and even cheezyer (is that a word?) acting, if you can even call
it acting. Even with that all said, Chainsaw Massacre wasn't as bad as I
though it was going to turn out to be. I'm not sure whether it was the fact
that I appreciated that it was one of the original classic slasher horror
films, or if it was the fact that it was just so bad that it was almost
good. Oh well, I guess it doesn't matter.
Chainsaw Massacre focuses on a group of teenagers out for a drive who go to
explore an abandoned property owned by one of their parents. In the true
tradition of horror films, this turns out to be a mistake. It turns out that
this old house has some neighbors nearby who aren't that friendly. Among
them is a kindly gent named Leatherface who has a tendency to cut people up
with a chainsaw. Never an endearing quality in a neighbor. Anyway, you can
undoubtedly figure out from the title of the film what good old Leatherface
ends up doing to these poor unsuspecting teenagers.
As I said, the acting, writing, camera work and just about everything else
you can think of is so low budget that a kid with a camcorder could almost
have done a better job. But that is sort of the sick charm of this little
film. Although, Scream it is not. If you are interested in watching Chainsaw
Massacre for nonstop terror, keep right on going past this title in the
video store. On the other hand, if you are looking for a few laughs (albeit
unintentional) and a kind of historical perspective on the genre, give
Chainsaw Massacre a look. At the very least you will appreciate just how far
these films have come over the years.

Title
Review for Mimic (1997)
Starring Mira Sorvino; Jeremy Northam; Alexander Goodwin; Giancarlo Giannini
& Charles Dutton
Mira Sorvino stars as a bug expert in this science fiction horror film. A
deadly plague, spread by cockroaches, breaks out and is wiping out the
children of New York City. Bug-friendly Mira develops a new strain of bug
using genetic engineering to wipe out the roaches and stop the spread of the
deadly disease. When the killer bugs have done their job they are supposed
to die out, and apparently that is just what happens. Except, a few years
later it seems as though they hadn't all died, and those that survived have
evolved into something big and nasty and have multiplied quite rapidly. Now
they are living down in the sewers and old subway tunnels under New York,
and emerging when they get hungry to prey on the human population above
ground. To make matters worse, these overgrown insects have developed a
unique kind of camouflage which enables them to pass themselves off as
humans long enough to easily lure their prey into being a human happy meal.
It then is left up to Mira, her boyfriend and a New York transit cop to stop
the insects.
Nothing about Mimic really makes it any different from any other monster
film that I have ever seen. The special effects are pretty good in terms of
the big bugs, but they certainly don't reach out and grab you (pardon the
pun). They are nowhere near the groundbreaking quality of the original
Alien. I will give the film points for the nifty concept of the bugs
developing the camouflage to pass for human. That alone is one of the more
original ideas that I have seen in a film of this nature. It makes it stand
out just a bit more in a genre that sadly lacks a whole lot of original
ideas. I'll also give Mimic points for a showdown between Sorvino and
friends against the bugs, which takes place in abandoned subway tunnels
under the city. It is one of the better sequences that I have seen in a
while in a horror flick.
Sorvino also deserves some praise as the heroine of this movie. While she
doesn't quite compare to Sigorney Weaver in the Alien films, she does manage
to hold her own while doing battle with her mutated creations. And, on a
purely sexist male note, she looks damn good doing it. The rest of the cast
is competent, but no one really distinguishes himself or herself. With the
possible exception of Charles Dutton, playing the subway cop who becomes a
less than eager tour guide to the bug busters as they make their way through
the subways.
Mimic is the type of movie that you rent on a Saturday night for some light
entertainment. Just don't rent it with real high expectations. It's far
better than most of what you are likely to find on the shelves of the horror
section of your local video store, just don't expect it to become a classic
any time in the near future.

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
Starring Liam Neeson; Catherine Zeta-Jones; Owen Wilson; Lili Taylor & Bruce
Dern
When The Haunting arrived in theaters, all I kept hearing about was the
overdone special effects and the fact that very often the unseen bumps in
the night in a horror film are far scarier than those that you can put a
face to courtesy of special effects. While I agree that this remake of The
Haunting goes a bit overboard in the visual effects department, I don't
think that they are completely to blame for this movie's failure. It appears
that some people have failed to take into account that the original Haunting
had the "unseen" terrors, and it was about as scary as a dust bunny. So
special effects or not, if the story isn't the least bit scary, you aren't
going to end up with a very frightening movie. The thing that interested me
most about this movie was the caretaker of this building played by Bruce
Dern. Dern is always great, and even though he may have had only about 3
minutes of screen time he was still the most interesting element of the
movie. As I sat through the seemingly endless, albeit fairly impressive,
special effects, I kept wishing that this movie was about Dern's caretaker
and not the one dimensional characters that populated the cast. Never a good
sign when a bit player is the best part of the movie.
Liam Neeson plays a scientist who is conducting experiments on fear. He
decides the best way to get results is to trick a group of fairly unstable
individuals to spend a few days in a haunted mansion. He tricks them into
participating by letting on that he is conducting an experiment on insomnia.
And he also fails to mention that the mansion has a reputation for strange
goings-on. Catherine Zeta-Jones, Lili Taylor and Owen Wilson play his
subjects. Like the original, Taylor's character is the star of the movie.
But since she doesn't quite have the marquee power of Liam Neeson and Ms.
Zeta-Jones, their parts did seem to be a big larger than in the original.
And let's face it, probably half the people who see this movie will do so
because of Zeta-Jones. I'll admit that I would have never seen this thing if
she weren't in it.
But the real stars here is the special effects combined with the fairly
overdone sets. They take over the movie as the supernatural elements of the
house start to interact with our hapless insomnia patients. There really
isn't much of a story here. Just endless setups so director Jan de Bont can
showcase all the nifty special effects that he got to play with. And the
special effects are great. In many cases they are as good as you are likely
to see anywhere. In other cases they are overdone and obviously thrown in
just for the sake of hitting the "cool shots" quota. At no point in the
movie do any of these things ever come close to being scary -- funny, maybe.
But not scary. Then we have the set. When I first saw the house, I was very
impressed with the very cool gothic look about it. But it only took a short
tour by the characters around the place to see that the set designers
obviously had as much money to burn as the visual effects people did, and
decided to take the idiotically overdone route. This included a flooded
hallway with books as stepping stones and a mirrored circular room that
revolves. What part did these rooms play in the story? Absolutely none. They
were just there to take our minds off the fact that there was neither a
descent story nor a single scare in the entire movie.
Then we have the actors. Lili Taylor has never been one of my favorites. And
when the fact that her character is mousy and pathetic is factored in, she
comes in around the average or slightly below mark. I have no idea why Liam
Neeson took this role. He basically reminded me of the ringmaster at an out
of control circus. His character was in charge of this farce but it quickly
got away from him. I have no doubt that Liam will want to lock all prints of
this movie in a very secure vault along with all copies of Darkman.
Zeta-Jones was cast because she is too hot for words. The fact that her
character is bi-sexual is just icing on the cake. All Catherine has to do in
this movie is look good. Fortunately that is something she does very well.
While she does have a fairly good size part, it is obvious that her only
purpose in the movie was as eye-candy. It's too bad someone of her talents
wasted them here. Any random supermodel pulled out of a fashion show could
have easily filled her role.
The Haunting is the antithesis of another of 1999's horror movies, The Blair
Witch Project. The Haunting had a seemingly limitless effects budget, while
Blair Witch relies on piles of rocks for its scares. Both prove quite nicely
that special effects are irrelevant to a horror film. If the story sucks,
it's all downhill from there. My advice? If you are looking for special
effects, go rent Star Wars. If it's scares you want, rent Halloween. Either
way, it's probably in your best interests to skip The Haunting.

Title
Review for Psycho (1960)
Starring Anthony Perkins; Vera Miles; John Gavin; Martin Balsam & John
McIntire
Psycho is the Alfred Hitchcock film considered by many to be a masterpiece.
When it was released in 1960 it was probably one of the scariest movies ever
made. By today's standards it has a couple of shocking moments, but it
certainly wouldn't be what I'd consider to be a real scary film. Since I'm
judging Psycho by today's standards, it is for that reason that I wouldn't
really recommend Psycho to someone who was looking for a real good scare.
They won't find it in Psycho. Even the famous shower scene has lost its
shock value. When Psycho was first released it had the virtue of never
having been done before. Today there are very few people out there who
haven't at least heard about the shower scene. As a result, when it happens,
it isn't a real big surprise to anyone watching. As soon as Janet Leigh
turns on the water in the bathroom, you know exactly what is coming next.
But I'm getting ahead of myself.
The afore mentioned Janet Leigh plays Marion Crane. Marion steals a large
sum of money from her employer and hops into her car and leaves town. She
decides to spend the night in a lonely motel out in the middle on nowhere.
It's the very deserted Bat's Motel run by the very odd Norman Bates (Anthony
Perkins) and his mother. To be brief, Marion decides to go in for a shower
after she settles into her room. Once she goes in, she never comes out again
alive. The rest of the movie centers on Marion's sister, boyfriend and a
private investigator hired by her employer, trying to track down Marion, who
has seemingly disappeared off the face of the Earth. And none of them get
any help from Bates, although they all suspect that he knows a little more
than he is willing to let on.
While I wouldn't recommend Psycho for its shock value, I would recommend it
on the basis that it is brilliantly made. Even though I'm not a big fan of
black and white movies, visually it works very well. Add to that some of the
best music found in a horror film, and you have a decidedly creepy, if not
scary movie. The final reason, and the main one for recommending Psycho is
the performance of Anthony Perkins as Norman Bates. It was probably the
performance of his career. With the exception of Anthony Hopkins in Silence
Of The Lambs, you will never find a more eerie personality on screen than
Bates. Almost as soon as Perkins appears on screen, the audience knows that
something just isn't right about this guy and he is bound to be trouble. For
the sake of those 2 or 3 people that are just waking from a coma that
they've been in since the early sixties, I won't go into any more detail
about why good old Norm is as frightening as he is, let's just say his
problems seem to run in the family.
Psycho is a classic, and like many classics, I've found it to be just a
little disappointing when compared to current films. The only reason to
watch Psycho is for the haunting performance of Perkins, which is more than
ample reason to plunk down a few bucks at the video store. As a personal
note, the original is a far better way to spend your time and money on that
the 1998 remake starring Vince Vaughn and Anne Heche.
7/10 -- Most of that due to Perkins' performance and Hitchcock's direction.

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
Starring Sean Connery; Catherine Zeta-Jones; Ving Rhames; Will Patton &
Maury Chaykin
First, let me get something off my chest. Over the last few days I have been
reading the reviews of Entrapment. All anybody seems to be able to talk
about is the romantic pairing between Sean Connery and Catherine Zeta-Jones.
I'm really beginning to wonder if I saw the same film that these critics
did. I didn't think that the age difference was such a big deal. Especially
not considering the story behind it. This may sound a bit sexist, but here
goes. As far as I know, the main audience for an action movie is young
males. So it seems perfectly reasonable to me to cast a young, very
attractive actress in the leading role. Many of the critics have wondered
why an actress closer to Connery's age wasn't cast in the Zeta-Jones role.
Some have even suggested Meryl Streep. Streep might be a great actress, but
even in her prime, she didn't look half as good as Zeta-Jones. I guarantee
you that half the reason that people are flocking to Entrapment is to see
Zeta-Jones. Young guys aren't going to spend money to see Meryl Streep in an
action film. They certainly aren't going to pay to watch her writhe through
the much publicized laser beam shots in which Ms. Zeta-Jones' behind is so
prominently displayed. Am I just a sexist pig? Or is it just realistic to
think that Hollywood makes movies with the intention of making money. And
Catherine Zeta-Jones is going to get a whole lot more people into the
theater than an older actress. I'd like to see Angela Landsbury look that
good in spandex.
And now, our feature presentation. Entrapment is what I like to call a
popcorn film. It is your typical big budget summer movie. It is all style
and the plot is a fairly simple one. Although, it does manage to throw a few
curve balls. The chemistry that Sean Connery and Catherine Zeta-Jones had on
screen was amazing. Quite frankly, I got so wrapped up watching the two of
them that I might not have even noticed if there was no plot at all. He is
still one of the top leading men in movies, even though he is almost 70.
Zeta-Jones, in addition to her obvious stunningly classic beauty, is one of
the most talented actresses that is working in film today. Her beauty gives
her a captivating screen presence, but her considerable talent certainly
doesn't hurt either. The combination of Connery and Zeta-Jones plus some of
the most stylish direction that I've seen in a while, all adds up to one fun
film. The supporting cast of Ving Rhames and Will Patton are like icing on a
great cake.
Entrapment focuses on insurance investigator Gin Baker (Catherine
Zeta-Jones). She has set her sights on bringing to justice master thief
Robert MacDougall (Sean Connery). In order to catch him, she must first gain
his confidence. She does so by pretending to be in need of his services for
a very high profile robbery. He agrees, and the two team up to pull off the
ultimate heist, using the latest in amazing high-tech devices. Of course,
this is Hollywood, so not everything goes quite according to the way we the
audience thinks it will.
I don't think that I have ever seen a movie in which Sean Connery gave a bad
performance. Entrapment doesn't change that. Connery still looks as much at
home in the role of action star as he did in 1962, when he first played
James Bond, the role that made him a household name. I suppose that it's a
bit of an irony that many people who will undoubtedly flock to see this
movie may never even have seen some of the original Bond films. Catherine
Zeta-Jones made her mark in 1998's The Mask Of Zorro. She held her own
against Anthony Hopkins in that film, and she proves that she is more than
capable of doing it again in Entrapment. I would go so far as to say that
she even outshines Connery in a few scenes. Contrary to popular belief, she
didn't just become an overnight success with The mask Of Zorro. She was an
accomplished actress for over a decade before that film was made. Her
experience shows with her performance in Entrapment. The Mask Of Zorro might
have made her a star, but her performance in Entrapment will ensure that she
stays one. Ving Rhames plays a sort of assistant to Connery's thief. He is
the man who procures all of the high tech tools of the trade that are used
in the spectacular robberies. Will Patton is also present as Zeta-Jones'
boss at the insurance company. Both Rhames and Patton were a little under
used in my opinion, but both give the solid performances that audiences have
come to expect from them.
The plot was a bit over the top in places, but it didn't hurt the film. Most
of the questionable plot devices led to spectacular stunts or nifty visual
effects. So, I for one, wasn't complaining. And the twists and turns of the
story line more than made up for any minor weaknesses in my book. Entrapment
is a great looking film. And I'm not just talking about Zeta-Jones. Director
Jon Amiel makes the most of the exotic scenery that, more often than not,
surrounds his cast. The high tech robbery scenes, in addition to being very
well filmed, also have that air of believability about them. Even as
fantastic as some of them are, I was never left thinking that none of it
could possibly happen.
Entrapment is a light summer film. The story is a fun one, and I appreciated
the extra effort of some of the plot twists in the story. Of course none of
these plot twists are designed to make you think real hard -- just keep you
guessing a bit. I'm going to go out on a limb and say that Entrapment will
probably end up as one of my favorite movies of 1999.

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
Starring Neve Campbell; Courteney Cox; David Arquette; Jamie Kennedy & Rose
McGowan
Scream is the movie that breathed new life into the genre of film that was
rapidly on its way to a very painful extinction. Namely, the teen slasher
film. Not only is Scream stylish, and incredibly smart, it also has a budget
comparable to about 20 typical slashers combined.
Scream centers on Sydney Prescott (hottie Neve Campbell), a high school
student in the small town of Woodsborrow. Syd has a little problem, there is
a serial killer on the loose and she is his next intended victim. But Syd
and her friends aren't about to be the typical horror film victims in
waiting. Oh no. You see they've seen all of the horror films so they know
what not to do. They realize that there are rules to a horror film and if
you don't follow the rules, they will be carrying you off in a body bag at
the end of the movie. The problem for Syd and her friends is that the killer
appears to have seen all the same movies that they have. In a sense, Scream
spoofs the rest of the genre, because the characters know that typical
horror film characters are stupid, so they just don't do what typical
victims in waiting do in a horror film. And even when Scream does give us
some of the typical ingredients of normal horror films; it does it with a
wink and a nudge. Almost as if to say, "it wouldn't be a horror film without
these cliches".
Scream's success is accomplished by the fact that the characters in this
movie actually have personalities. Not something usually encountered in your
typical horror film characters. At least you don't normally find
well-rounded ones anyway. (We're talking personalities here, not silicone
implants.) This film also gets credibility from the fact that it has
established stars in it. Albeit not huge stars, but Neve Campbell and
Courtney Cox have both been quite successful on television. And just for
good measure, director Wes Craven throws in a couple of cameos from Drew
Barrymore (E.T.) and Henry Winkler (yes, The Fonze) to add to the star
quality of the film. Star power aside, two unknowns really steal the movie.
Jamie Kennedy plays a video store clerk who has seen every horror film ever
made. He spends most of the movie referencing old horror movies for the best
ways to avoid becoming a victim of the killer. The other scene-stealer is
Matthew Lillard. The only way to describe Lillard is that he reminded me of
a young Michael Keaton. His part might be relatively small, but he has some
of the best scenes in the movie.
Admittedly, this might not be the scariest film that I've ever seen, but
what it lacks in chills, it makes up for in style. The fact that this movie
doesn't resemble the typical low-budget-cookie-cutter-slasher counts for a
great deal in my book. Add the fact that we have a director and actors that
actually know what they are doing, and Scream is in a class all by itself.
It's very rare that I will walk out of a theater and really be struck by
just how good a movie was. When I first saw Scream in the theater, I still
remember thinking that this was one of the best films that I had seen in a
long time. It is certainly the best horror film that I have ever seen.
Admittedly, horror film fans will get more of the inside jokes, but even if
you aren't a fan of Halloween or Friday The 13th, it should still be very
entertaining. If you are one of the few that hasn't seen Scream, check it
out.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Starring Leonardo DiCaprio; Kate Winslet; Billy Zane & Kathy Bates
So the question is -- is this the greatest movie of all time? Well, it's
certainly the most successful. Maybe not the best movie of all time in my
books, although I would have to say it comes pretty darn close. That's quite
an admission coming from me, since I've never seen a love story that I
didn't hate or fall asleep before the 1 hour mark. Titanic is just that a
love story, even with the multimillion dollar sets and special effects, it
is just a movie about the love two young passengers have for one another. I
will have to admit, as love stories go, this was a very compelling one.
Certainly, the best one I've ever seen. Although I still can't figure out
what all the excitement is about regarding Leonardo DiCaprio. I guess I
would have to be a teenage girl to figure out that one, but I digress. I
went to see titanic not for the love story (I planned on tolerating it) but
for the special effects. Believe it or not I actually found my cold-hearted
self actually enjoying the romance between Jack Dawson (Leonardo DiCaprio)
and Rose DeWitt Bukater (Kate Winslet). While, as I've already said, I don't
see what the fuss is over Leo, after seeing this film I couldn't imagine it
being made with actors other than DiCaprio and Winslet in the lead roles. A
fact that I think speaks volumes about their performances. There was truly
no doubt, in my little mind at least, that by the end of the movie the
characters of Jack and Rose were deeply in love. Heck, I actually even
started to care about their romance. (I think I'm getting too soft.)
Anyway, as they say, time flies when your having fun, and since I went to
see the special effects, that is what I wanted to see. Now to get off topic
for just a second, I was one of those who asked the burning questions before
the movie came out. Who in their right mind spends 200 million dollars to
make a film? Better yet on a film that everybody knows the ending to? If you
are crazy enough to spend such huge amounts of cash, why wouldn't you cast
some big name actors in the lead roles, so we the audience would have some
reason to go? A whole lot of people asked those same questions. If they are
anything like me, after seeing Titanic they had to ask themselves -- Why
would I have ever asked such stupid questions? Why? Well, because critics
are not filmmakers, and while we like to comment on films, and are
relatively knowledgeable on the subject, for the most part we don't know as
much as the people who make them. This is abundantly true with regard to
Titanic's director James Cameron. The same man who many considered would be
run out of Hollywood just a few short months before the film opened, is now
being recognized as being among the greatest directors of all time. I really
don't think that anyone can say enough about the job that this guy did.
This brings me back around to the reason I went to see this film -- the
special effects. The movie opens with breathtaking shots of the real Titanic
on the bottom of the Atlantic, shot specifically for this film by director
James Cameron. Although that almost pales by comparison to the special
effects used during the last half of the movie as the ship is sinking. The
200 million dollar price tag is certainly evident on the screen. Both in the
long shots where we get to see the great ship break up, and in the interior
shots that were done in giant flooded tanks. If, like me, you go to Titanic
for the special effects, I promise you will not be disappointed by anything
that appears on the screen.
A funny thing happened as I was watching the Titanic in its final minutes
above the water. As much as I was in awe of the effects, and the complexity
of the production, something else happened. An eerie feeling came over me.
Unlike other disaster movies, this one really happened. All too often, when
we think of the real Titanic sitting there on the bottom of the ocean, we
forget something. Oh, we remember the tragedy of the situation and that hund
reds of lives were lost, but most of us never stop to think what it must
have like to be there on that ship as it was going down. James Cameron has
captured those last moments, in a way that will make you think wonder why
you never thought about it like that before.
As spectacular as the special effects were, they could not overshadow a
simple love story and the tragedy associated with one of the worst disasters
of all time. A truly remarkable film, it is no wonder that so many people
have gone back to this masterpiece several times.
One of the greatest films ever made.  10/10 - I would give it a higher
rating if I had one.

Title
Review for Night of the Creeps (1986)
Starring Jason Lively; Steve Marshall; Jill Whitlow; Tom Atkins & Wally
Taylor
"What is this, a homicide or a bad b-movie?" That is the prophetic question
asked by one of the leads in one of the early scenes of this movie. Let me
clear things up for you cupcake, this isn't a bad b-movie, it's a really bad
b-movie. So bad, it's almost good. Almost, but not quite. The movie starts
off in the 1950's with space aliens sending a botched experiment down to
Earth. It is a bunch of slug-like creatures that kill people and take over
their bodies. The slugs' first and only victim in the fifties is
cryogenically frozen where he is of no danger to anybody. That is, until two
loser university students unfreeze him in 1986. He, and the slugs inside
him, promptly begin wreaking havoc and turning more co-eds into slug
zombies. A slightly crazed cop (Tom Atkins) and the requisite girl with the
face of an angel (Jill Whitlow) join these two geeky university students
(Jason Lively and Steve Marshall) to do battle with the slugs. It more or
less falls on the four of them to make the world safe again from the evil
slugs.
The acting is bad with a capital B. The story is worse. And the special
effects are somewhere between an old rerun of Star Trek and what you see in
a home movie. The only saving grace was the requisite tit-shot courtesy of
Jill Whitlow. It had absolutely nothing to do with the story -- but I liked
it. Actually, it was the high point of the movie for me. Of course, that
isn't really saying much.
The story moves around in a hap hazard fashion. Which gives it a leg up on
some other horror films. Unlike most movies of this genre, there actually is
a story. Not a great one, but it is there. This is one in a long line of
movies from the 1980's that were thrown together to capitalize off the
success of the Friday The 13th, Halloween and Nightmare On Elm Street
movies. You could randomly select a movie out of the horror section of you
local video store and probably luck into something just as good if not
better. But Night Of The Creeps might make a nice addition to a b-movie
horror marathon. Just don't be too upset if you can't find it. You really
won't be missing that much.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Starring Mike Myers; Heather Graham; Michael York; Robert Wagner & Rob Lowe
I'll have to say that I thought that Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me
was better than the first one. Although, to the credit of the original, it
seems to be getting funnier each time I see it. I'm guessing that this one
might play the same way. Austin Powers (Mike Myers) is still adjusting to
the 90's when something evil happens. Dr. Evil, that is. Evil (Mike Myers)
and Mr. Bigglesworth (Evil's hairless cat) return to Earth from their
cryogenic sleep chamber on board their Big Boy satellite. Evil now has a
plan to stop Austin Powers for good. His right hand man, Number 2 (Robert
Wagner) has had a time machine built for Dr. Evil. Evil plans to use it to
return to the 1960's and steal Austin Powers' mojo. And he is taking along
some help. While Dr. Evil was in cryogenic sleep, his henchmen have cloned
him. His clone is not quite the perfect match -- he is only 1/3 Evil's size.
But even with his short stature, Mini Me (Verne Troyer) is a force to be
reckoned with. So Evil and Mini Me go back in time where they hook up with a
much younger Number 2 (Rob Lowe) and steal the mojo with the help of a
disgruntled Scotsman by the name of Fat Bastard (Mike Myers). Austin must
then return to the '60's to retrieve his mojo with the help of '60's secret
agent Felicity Shagwell (Heather Graham).
I was very disappointed in the somewhat cheesy way that Elizabeth Hurley was
dealt with in this movie. I'm not sure if it was supposed to be funny but it
really didn't work for me. She had about two minutes of screen time and her
scenes were pretty much the weakest points of the movie through no fault of
her own. As in the first one, Dr. Evil steals the show. Although, Fat
Bastard is pretty good too. Felicity Shagwell comes a close second to the
two evil Myers characters. Heather Graham is a very groovy, and a more than
adequate replacement for Hurley in both the looks and talent departments.
Also, like the first one, Robert Wagner does a great job. As does Rob Lowe,
playing Wagner's younger self. I wouldn't be surprised if this performance
by Lowe resurrects his career.
My sense is that fans of the old James Bond films will catch a few more of
the jokes here than the rest of the audience. There are a lot of very subtle
little things geared towards them that I really appreciated. Some of the
humor, especially surrounding Fat Bastard, was downright disgusting. But I
must admit that it was among the funniest in the film, and I laughed along
with everyone else in the theater.
At times I get the impression that Myers finds something that works and
milks it a bit too much.
The strategically placed object to disguise nudity worked really well in the
first film. So instead of coming up with something more inventive, he based
to whole opening sequence around the hidden nudity. It was funny, but just a
bit of a cop-out in my opinion. Especially considering how much thought was
put into the trailers spoofing the other movie of the summer of '99 -- The
Phantom Menace.
One sequence that I really enjoyed has a scene involving Dr. Evil'
spaceship, which was in the shape of a part of the male anatomy. The
descriptions used by people on the ground as they looked up at it flying
through the sky were hilarious. Then of course, we have Mini Me (Vern
Troyer), Dr. Evil's clone. He combined with Evil to come up with some great
scenes. The interaction between Evil and his son Scott (Seth Green) also
worked just as well in this film as it did in the original. As with the
first, the writers played off the fact that Evil was just slightly behind on
the progress that has been made during his 30 years of hibernation. But this
time they added to it by having Evil screw up in the '60's by using '90's
expressions with the 60's characters that he was trying to interact with.
The movie was stolen by Myers playing Evil as he tried to be the hip villain
but just usually ended up showing how square he really was. Austin Powers:
The Spy Who Shagged should easily rank as one of the funnier films of the
year. The movie was groovy baby, yeah!

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
Starring Denzel Washington; Angelina Jolie; Queen Latifah; Michael Rooker &
Mike McGlone
As action/suspense movies go, this is one that ranks above average. But,
make no mistake about it -- it isn't quite in the same league with movies
like Seven or Silence Of The Lambs. Although, it does try very hard to get
there. Including generous use of grisly, but not overly gratuitous, scenes
featuring butchered dead bodies.
Denzel Washington plays Lincoln Rhyme, a police forensic specialist who had
suffered a spinal injury several years before which left him a quadriplegic.
Rhyme now only has movement from his neck up, and limited movement in his
little finger. But even though he is no longer able to go into the field, he
still has the best investigative mind around and is called upon frequently
by the New York Police Department in serious cases. This is one of those
cases. A serial killer called The Bone Collector is posing as a cab driver
and kidnapping people. He then brutally kills them and leaves little clues
with the butchered bodies, taunting the police to put the pieces together
and find him before he kills again. Angelina Jolie plays a young officer who
finds one of The Bone Collector's victims and impresses Rhyme with her
natural ability in forensics. So much so, that he shanghais the reluctant
woman into joining him on the investigation. She is to serve as his eyes and
ears in the field while he talks her through the investigation from his bed.
No surprise that the investigation takes her to some of the deepest recesses
of New York city on her mission to stop the killer before he strikes again.
First, let me say that Phillip Noyce did an excellent job of directing The
Bone Collector. Like the movie that this is most easily compared to, Seven,
much of the action takes place in dimly lit areas. Unlike Seven, which
seemed to take place in a perpetual rainstorm, it is abandoned subway
tunnels and decaying buildings that give The Bone Collector it's feel of
impending death. A great soundtrack also helps to darken the mood
considerably.
Washington may have given his best performance ever in this film. It is
truly a credit to his abilities that he plays such an integral and
interesting part in this movie based solely on his facial expressions and
tone of voice. But as good as Washington is, this is Angelina Jolie's movie.
This is really Jolie's first major starring role and she carries the movie
beautifully. The fact that she is one of the most beautiful women in
Hollywood doesn't hurt either. Am I the only one that thinks she has the
most amazing lips ever? Washington and Jolie also have a great deal of help
from the supporting cast. Michael Rooker (Cliffhanger) is Jolie's nemesis,
the head of the police forensics department, and plays up the character's
arrogance to the hilt. Queen Latifah also does a solid job in her fairly
small role as Rhyme's personal aid. The two biggest surprises would have to
be Ed O'Neill and Luis Guzman. O'Neill plays the lead detective on the case
and gives a performance that I never would have expected from the man best
known as Al Bundy. But the biggest treat was Guzman as Eddie, an NYPD
forensic technician. He had some of the best one-liners in the film and
stole just about every scene that he was in. My only complaint with him was
that he didn't get more screen time.
The comparisons between this film and Seven are inevitable, and very
understandable. But The Bone Collector is more than able to stand on its own
besides the obvious similarities. If I had one major complaint, it would be
the film's ending. Without giving anything away, I thought the choice of the
killer was a bit weak, and the ending was just a bit too formula for an
otherwise clever movie. I haven't read the novel by Jeffery Deaver upon
which this movie is based, but I have read the sequel, The Coffin Dancer.
Knowing how clever that book was, I wouldn't be at all surprised to find
that The Bone Collector lost a little something in the translation from the
page to the big screen.
Regardless of its flaws, The Bone Collector is still a great movie. The
story is entertaining, albeit a bit gory in places, and the directing is
superb. But the best reason to check out this movie is for the cast. All the
performances are bang on and Jolie shows why she is an actress to watch in
the coming years.

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
Starring Kevin Bacon; Matt Dillon; Neve Campbell; Theresa Russell & Denise
Richards
If you were to judge Wild Things based on the advertising alone, it may be
reasonable for someone to conclude that it is nothing more than Hollywood's
version of a soft core porn flick. Considering most clips feature the very
well endowed Denise Richards walking around in very skimpy clothing. Of
course by now, most people have heard about the menage-a-trois involving
Kevin Bacon, Neve Campbell and the afore mentioned Ms. Richards. If that
wasn't enough you have also no doubt heard about Kevin Bacon's full frontal
nude scene. So with all this T&A being hyped and talked about, does the
movie have anything else besides sex and nudity. Much to my surprise, Wild
Things is a really good movie. Now I have to admit up front that the main
reason I went to this film, other than to review it, was for the over hyped
lesbian scenes. (Judging by the large proportion of males in the theater,
I'm not the only one who went because of that.)
Now Wild Things is sort of difficult to write a synopsis on. Not that it's
confusing, it's just one of those movies that you can't say too much about
before you start giving things away.
Wild Things revolves around a spoiled rich girl, Kelly Van Ryan, (Denise
Richards) and her claim that one of her high school teachers, Sam Lombardo,
(Matt Dillon) raped her. Kevin Bacon plays the police detective assigned to
the case, and Neve Campbell is the girl from the wrong side of the tracks
who comes forward with a similar charge against the teacher. Obviously not
everything is as it appears in Wild Things, but to say too much would ruin
the film. Let's just say that it is worth your time to go find out for
yourself. By the end of the movie nothing will surprise you anymore. This is
one well thought out movie.
As to performances -- having never been a big Matt Dillon fan I was
pleasantly surprised at how good he was in this film. Kevin Bacon also gave
one of his better performances in a while. Denise Richards who's only other
claim to fame was Starship Troopers does a good job here. She has a great
deal of potential, hopefully she will get recognized for her talent and not
just she looks. Too often talented actresses who happen to be well-endowed
fall into the trap of taking roles that involve nudity over substance.
(Natasha Henstridge is a good example.) Although,
I digress. Neve Campbell does a fair job, but seems to be taking roles that
are becoming more and more annoying. Theresa Russell also is in the film as
Denise Richard's over sexed mother. My question was, why? The woman is in
her 40's and they have her prancing around in a bikini. It was just
embarrassing. Robert Wagner has a cameo as Denise Richard's lawyer, while he
overacts in a way that would make William Shatner proud, it is good to see
him again in a film. The one to watch is Bill Murray as Matt Dillon's
attorney. Murray, as always is great, and unlike some of the films that he
has done in recent years, this time the writing backs up his talent. Murray
steals every scene he is in.
One other point about the movie that is interesting to note, is the end
credits. In recent years directors have taken to showing out takes and
bloopers during the end credits. Wild Things goes a step further. During the
credits they show how the events of the movie came to be. It's kind of like
a mini prequel. Its worth the extra few minutes that you have to stay in
your seat.
So if you want lots of sex, and shots of Denise Richards topless, then Wild
Things is the movie for you. If you are interested in a movie with a great
story and good overall acting, Wild Things fits the bill there too. It's
certainly going to rank as one of the most fun movies of the year.
8/10 (I would even rate it that high if Denise Richards wasn't naked)

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Starring Heather Donahue; Michael C. Williams; Joshua Leonard; Bob Griffin &
Jim King
To all of those "respected" critics out there who used words and phrases
like "terrifying", "bone chilling", "the scariest movie ever" and other such
expressions which lend themselves well to a movie advertisement, I have only
one question. Is this the first horror movie that you have ever seen?
Obviously for those of you who found it so terrifying, your only previous
"horror" experiences must have come courtesy of old Scooby-Doo reruns. I
guarantee you that if you had ever set foot in the horror section of your
local video store you would have realized that this was far from a scary
movie. But I guess for some people, jumping on the old "Blair Witch
Bandwagon" was more important than writing a credible review.
This movie ranked a 3 out of 10 for me. And to be honest, none of that is
for the scare factor in this movie. For those of you that have been living
in a cave the past little while, here is a recap of the basic plot of the
movie. The story goes that three documentary filmmakers went out into the
Maryland woods looking for evidence of a local legend. This legend is a
ghost known as the Blair Witch. The filmmakers went into the woods never to
be heard from again. But, some time later, their equipment was found --
including their cameras and all of the footage that they shot before
vanishing. This film has been compiled into the movie we now see as The
Blair Witch Project.
I'll say right off the bat that this is a very cool idea. So much so, that
some people actually believed that this was real documentary footage that
they were watching in theaters. This is of course due, in no small part, to
the incredible marketing that this movie got. The hype that surrounded this
movie, specifically over the Internet, before it opened was nothing short of
a phenomenon. Considering that this movie was reportedly made for something
in the 40 thousand-dollar range and grossed hundreds of millions in
theaters, the marketing campaign would have to be classed as an unqualified
success. Sadly, like many things in life, just because there is a huge
amount of hype, doesn't mean that there is actually anything good behind
that hype. The Blair Witch Project does not even come close to living up to
its advance word. Leaving me to wonder who exactly it was that had all these
glowing things to say about the movie. Regardless, I'm glad I didn't
actually pay to see this thing in a theater. I'm even happier that when I
saw it on video, I didn't pay for that either.
About the only part of this movie that even got close to what I would call
eerie was the final sequence in the movie. I'm certainly not about to spoil
the ending, but suffice to say that if you feel the urge to abandon ship
halfway through the movie you won't be missing anything. That also goes for
the "newly discovered footage" which has been tacked on after the credits in
the Home video versions. What a waste of about 5 minutes that was. The
scariest part of the movie is the now famous close-up shot of star Heather
Donahue looking into the camera and saying how scared she is. It is only
scary because we get an extreme close-up view up her nostrils. There should
be a law against such things.
Then we have the much-publicized camerawork that reportedly made some people
physically ill in theaters. Sorry, don't buy it. Sure the angles were herky
jerky, but there was nothing present that would make anyone ill who was not
already suffering from an acute case of the stomach flu. I expected the
lousy camera work and the black and white photography going in, so that, for
the most part, didn't annoy me. But there were parts that did qualify as
downright frustrating. In one scene "the witch" leaves a bundle of sticks
with something inside it. Donahue's character opens it and goes into
hysterics. The camera focus is so fuzzy that we can only see that whatever
it is looks to be bloody, but nothing more. So we have no idea why she is so
upset. The scares are like this the whole movie. The actors are running
around terrified, but we, the audience, never quite get why they are so
upset. They get all terrified when a pile of stones appears outside their
tent. Weird, I'll grant you, but I would have been a little more unnerved if
someone had been hurling them at my tent and not piling them outside it. But
nobody said that these characters were that bright. They hear strange noises
in the middle of the night. (Noises in the woods -- go figure.) They run off
blindly into the woods and sit in the dark. Call me crazy, but if I think
something might potentially attack me, I've got every light available on.
I'd have the whole place lit up like Christmas tree, not sit around in the
dark waiting for whatever it was to sneak up on me. This also leads to the
added annoyance of having protracted sequences where the screen is totally
dark with the characters whispering back and forth to each other -- very
annoying. One nice touch was the fact that there was no soundtrack to this
movie, which did give it more of an "authentic" feel about it. I almost
wonder if a little mood music might not have improved things.
I have to give the actors credit. There was very little script involved in
the making of this movie. The three were sent out into the woods where they
would be left notes as to the basic that their characters were to perform.
The rest is improv. And considering what they had to work with, I think that
they did a hell of a good job. To be fair, considering that the three actors
not only were the cast, but also doubled as the crew, the film turned out
pretty well. I'm certainly not faulting the ingenious ideas or methods used
in the production of this film.
What I am faulting is that this movie is billed as a horror, but it just
isn't scary. Not in the least. The Blair Witch Project may make for an
interesting topic for discussion in some university film class, but it sure
won't make you spill your popcorn while you are jumping out of your seat. I
think my brother summed it up best as the end credits started to roll. He
said: They shouldn't be giving us the credits, they should be giving us an
apology. Truer words were never spoken.
3/10 -- For the concept; the marketing; and the acting

Title
Review for Halloween (1978)
I first saw Halloween when I was in junior high, which was more than a
decade ago. To this day the theme song still gives me chills. By far,
Halloween has the best soundtrack of any horror film ever made, with the
possible exception of Psycho. Much like the other early slasher films such
as Friday The 13th or Texas Chainsaw Massacre, Halloween wasn't made on what
you would call a big budget. Unlike the other films of that era, Halloween
had one extra thing going for it, director John Carpenter. Carpenter makes
use of what limited money he had, down to the last penny. That is not to say
that Halloween always looks great, but in the places where the shoestring
budget shows itself it only adds to the charm. Carpenter probably also saved
money by not only directing the movie, but by writing it, and composing all
of the music. Fortunately for we the audience, Carpenter excels in all three
areas. The other leg up that Halloween has on the other early slashers is
its cast. Sure it has its share of acting class failures, but they aren't
bad enough to detract from Jamie Lee Curtis and Donald Pleasence.
Young Michael Myers, at the age of nine, decided to give new meaning to
trick or treat on Halloween night by killing his sister with a butcher
knife. He is confined to a mental hospital where he is placed in the care of
Doctor Sam Loomis (Donald Pleasence). 15 years to the day that he killed his
sister, Michael escapes from the institution to return to his hometown of
Haddonfield and resume his killing. He is pursued by Dr. Loomis and the
local police, but before they can catch him he resumes his love for large
cutlery by using it on some of the local teen population. One of the locals
who run into big Mike on Halloween is Laurie Strode (Jamie Lee Curtis) who
happen to be baby sitting in the wrong place at the wrong time. It should
come as no surprise that mayhem and carnage ensue.
As I said, the budget wasn't big, so don't expect Star Wars quality
production values in this film. With most of the cast (or if you prefer,
victims in waiting) the acting is passable. Pleasence does a great job at
being creepy, and Jamie Lee Curtis, even with the bad seventies hair and the
bell bottoms is a hottie. She also does a pretty good job in the acting
department, considering that this was her first role. The story is pretty
good considering this is a slasher flick. It is even more interesting if you
also watch the sequel that gives a bit more of the back story.
No review of Halloween would be complete without the requisite fun fact
about this movie. Take a good look at Michael Myers white mask that he wears
throughout his killing spree. You may just notice that it is actually a
William Shatner (that's right Trekkies, good old Captain Kirk himself)
Halloween mask painted white. Other fun bloopers include the fact that the
film is supposed to be set in Illinois but all of the cars have California
license plates. I would recommend Halloween to anyone who wants a good
scare, despite the fact that it looks very dated in places. One other
recommendation that I would make is that if at all possible watch Halloween
and its sequel at the same time as they take place within hours of each
other.

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
Starring Jared Leto; Alicia Witt; Rebecca Gayheart & Michael Rosenbaum
I didn't go into Urban Legend expecting a whole lot. I figured that I was
about to see your standard slasher film that would be watchable but
certainly not something that was going to be very memorable. Well, I was
very happily proven wrong. Apparently, films such as Scream; I Know What You
Did Last Summer and Halloween: H20 have raised the bar when it comes to the
quality of the once low budget, poorly acted slasher film. Don't get me
wrong, Urban Legend still has its share of blood and guts which it relies of
quite heavily in places for shock value, but the writing and acting are
surprisingly pretty good. Continuing the trend of the afore mentioned
Scream, Urban Legend doesn't take itself too seriously and pays homage to
some of the horror films that have come before it. Much like Scream, it also
pays tribute to pop culture with a number of inside jokes.
So enough analytical stuff, what's the movie about? Like all good slasher
films, Urban Legend has a killer who takes pride in his work. This
particular homicidal maniac has decided to pattern his killing spree after
popular urban legends. He recreates them in a particularly ghoulish and
bloody way, much to the dismay of the students at a small New England
university. Now I certainly wouldn't be doing my job if I didn't mention
that Urban Legends doesn't have too many real scary moments. In most cases
you can figure out what is going to happen before it actually does.
Although, surprisingly that fact doesn't really take too much away from the
movie.
The young cast is first rate. Alicia Witt plays a college student around
whom most of this killing seems to be centered. Rebecca Gayheart, is her
best friend. Both actresses do a good job in their first major starring
roles. They are joined by none other than Robert "Freddy Kruger" Englund as
a professor who teaches a course on urban legends. Rounding out the cast is
Joshua Jackson from TV's Dawson's Creek. Much of what makes the cast look so
good is the first rate writing. While it is not up to the quality of Scream,
it is certainly a far cry from the Halloween and Friday The 13Th movies of
days gone by. Urban Legend also is a very nice looking film, it doesn't have
the claustrophobic feel of some older horror films.
Urban Legend is far from the scariest film that you will ever see, but it
does have its moments. If you are in the mood for edge-of-your-seat terror,
this isn't the film that is going to give it to you. If, on the other hand
you are interested in watching something a little lighter, with a few scary
scenes mixed in, Urban Legend should fit the bill nicely.

Title
Review for Island of Dr. Moreau, The (1996)
Starring Marlon Brando; Val Kilmer; David Thewlis & Fairuza Balk
The Island Of Dr. Moreau has gotten a lot of bad press, most of it
undeserved. It centers on a man named Douglas (David Thewlis), a survivor of
a ship lost at sea, he is rescued by a fishing boat. This particular boat is
carrying another passenger, a guy by the name of Montgomery (Val Kilmer),
who offers to help Douglas. The fishing vessel is heading to the remote
island where Montgomery works as a scientist, and he offers to let Douglas
stay there until help arrives for him. It turns out the island is a research
station run by the once famous Dr. Moreau (Marlon Brando), who had dropped
out of site years ago. It seems that Moreau has been doing genetic
experiments, namely blending human DNA with that of animals, in order to
create a more perfect being. Well, he hasn't been real successful up to this
point, and the results of his work roam the island. These half human half
whatever (depending on the individual) are wild and kept in line only by
their fear of Moreau's henchmen. To make a long story short, Moreau loses
control over these creatures, and the results are not pleasant.
Marlon Brando, after you get over the shock of is enormous size, shows just
why he is one of the world's greatest actors. His part is not huge, but when
he is on camera he can hold your attention. (I was left thinking what a
shame it is that this talent has been left largely wasted these last few
years, partly due to his living as a recluse, and of course partly due to
the fact that he appears to never leave the buffet table.) Val Kilmer's
character, Montgomery, had absolutely no redeeming qualities. You pretty
much root for this guy to get knocked off from the word go. David Thewlis
puts on a fairly good performance as the man who is basically in the wrong
place at the wrong time. Fairuza Balk, one of the most underrated actresses
in Hollywood, does a great job as Moreaus tormented daughter. Although some
of the movies best performances come from the many actors who are buried
under piles of makeup as the creatures. A real credit to both actors and
writers as they don't get a great deal of meaningful screen time. The
creature makeup and effects are amazing -- this was not a low budget
production.
As genetic experimentation becomes more and more prevalent in the scientific
community, the creatures that populate this island don't seem all that far
fetched. Which makes the fact that the novel on which this movie was based
was written many years ago by H.G. Wells
This is a good film, it's not for everyone, and a bit gorey in places, but
it makes a great alternative to a traditional horror film.

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
Starring Cameron Diaz; Matt Dillon; Ben Stiller; Lee Evans & Chris Elliott
There's Something About Mary is, by far, the funniest movie that I have seen
this year. It is also one of the funniest films that I have ever seen,
period. A fair warning to all of you out there who are easily offended --
stay far away from this movie. Some of the scenes in this baby would make a
sailor blush, although that same sailor would probably be falling off his
seat laughing as he was watching. Mary centers on a one-time high school
geek played by Ben Stiller who wants to be reunited with the girl of his
high school dreams, Mary (Cameron Diaz). He enlists a sleazy investigator
(Matt Dillon) to find her. This is the story of his adventures trying to woo
the girl of his dream. That is a major simplification but if I told you any
more, I'd have to kill you. All right, maybe just a little more. Stiller
sends Dillon down to Florida where Mary is now living to find out what her
life is like. (I.e., whether she is still single or not.) When Dillon's
character gets down there he falls hopelessly in love with Mary too. So it
then becomes a contest between Stiller and Dillon as to who will win Mary's
heart. (My guess is that they are going after that body too.)
The jokes are nonstop in this film, and much of the comedy is on the
slapstick side. I guarantee you that if you wait to watch this movie on
network television, you will miss the best scenes in the movie. They will
surely edit out possibly the 2 funniest scenes ever put to film (namely Ben
Stiller having a problem with his zipper and Cameron Diaz's hair gel).
Every performance in this film was a great one. I've always though Diaz was
great, but I've never been a huge fan of either Stiller or Dillon (all
though his stock rose considerably after Wild Things). I have to say that
after this film, I'm a fan of both actors. The physical comedy was
choreographed perfectly and I really don't think that the writers could have
fit one more funny moment into this film. It was simply great from start to
finish.
My advice -- There's Something About Mary should only be seen in it's
original uncut version. Any other way would ruin one of the funniest films
you are likely to see in a long time.

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
Starring Pierce Brosnan; Jonathan Pryce; Michelle Yeoh & Teri Hatcher
Tomorrow Never Dies is the 18th film in the long running series of films
about British Secret Service agent James Bond. Pierce Brosnan returns for
his second stint as 007. Brosnan is joined by Jonathan Pryce as the evil
villain, and Teri Hatcher and Michelle Yeoh as the mandatory bond girls.
This time Bond is up against a madman bent on world domination of the media.
Jonathan Pryce plays Elliot Carver, the head of a world wide media
conglomerate who is expanding his news operations and wants a good juicy
news story to add spice to his new venture. So he decides to create it. As
usual, its up to Bond to stop the crazed villain and make the world safe.
Nothing new here in the basic plot line, but this is a Bond film and we
don't exactly expect an Academy Award winning drama here. This is meant to
be pure escapist entertainment, which it succeeds in being. While Tomorrow
Never Dies might not be the best Bond film ever, it's in the top 5 for sure.
It offers some of the best stunts of the Bond films, and what felt like the
most stunts ever in a Bond film.
Not surprisingly, Bond is backed up by an assortment nifty gadgets provided
by Q (Desmond Llyewelyn in his 17th appearance in that role). The most
notable of which, is his new remote controlled BMW. Like all Bond films
before it, Tomorrow Never Dies is not a deep movie. There are no deep hidden
meanings, nor is it laced with messages of social value. Although it is
laced with other sorts of messages -- Advertising. While this has been
present in the other Bond films (at least since the Roger Moore era) this
one seems to go a little over the top. I'm not sure if it really has more
product placement shots than previous Bond films, or if they are just more
glaring. (Q in an Avis Rentacar uniform) Or perhaps it was the unbelievable
amount of product tie in ads that aired in the weeks leading to the release
of the film. (Anyone who hadn't seen at least one ad must have been living
in a cave -- they were everywhere.)
Brosnan continues to fit well in the role of Bond. Pryce is a fine successor
to all of the Bond supervillans of days gone by. He would give Dr. No or
Goldfinger a run for their money. The biggest treat in this film is the new
Bond girl Michelle Yeoh. She is one of Asia's biggest action film stars.
Basically, she is the female Jackie Chan, doing all of her own stunts while
playing Bonds Chinese equivalent.
Bottom line -- if you are a fan of James Bond in general, and Pierce
Brosnan's in particular, go see this one, you won't be disappointed. On the
other hand, if you have never seen a Bond film that you liked, well, this
one isn't going to change your mind. And most likely you haven't gotten this
far into the review anyway.

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
Starring Ryan Phillippe; Salma Hayek; Sela Ward; Breckin Meyer & Sherry
Stringfield
54 focuses around the character of Shane O'Shea, played by Ryan Phillippe,
and how his life takes a dramatic turn after he becomes an employee of New
York's infamous nightclub, Studio 54, during the 1970's. The fictitious
story of the Phillippe character that is quite weak, but the interesting
look at the fact-based events at the club more than made up for the
weaknesses of the main character. I actually didn't expect a whole lot going
in, so I was very surprised at how good 54 really was.
Mike Myers is brilliant as Studio 54's owner, Steve Rubell -- I had to
actually remind myself a couple of times that I was watching Myers and not
the real Steve Rubell. Salma Hayek and Neve Campbell fans will be
disappointed. While both actresses are featured prominently in the ads for
the movie, their parts are really nothing more than fairly minor supporting
roles. The film's unlikely star, Phillippe (I Know What You Did Last
Summer), is not a bad actor, although I'm not sure if he would have been
able to carry the movie if it weren't for the 70's atmosphere. It kept my
attention most of the time, thereby minimizing the possibility of catching
any deficiencies in his performance. Also helping Phillippe was the fact
that the entire supporting cast was strong. While Myers and Campbell have
limited roles in this film, they do add significantly to it. Hayek isn't bad
for the most part, but there are a couple of scenes where she is a bit
painful to watch.
I have to admit it -- I actually enjoyed listening to all of the 70's disco
music. I feel I should be attending some sort of group therapy session after
owning up to that. Although I am happy to say that I still think that
everybody in the seventies had to be on some serious drugs for them to
actually go out in public dressed like they did. I must say that after
watching 54, I really wished that the club were still open. It looked like
it was a hell of a party. I think 54 captured the reason the club became the
hot spot that it was during the late 70's and early 80's. Sure, the
fictitious story of Phillippe's character was not great, but just the
atmosphere and look of the movie really did make me feel as though I was
actually there experiencing the party times at 54 during a more carefree and
swinging era. I'm sure another Mike Myers' character, Austin Powers, would
have approved. Worth checking out if only for the interesting look into the
world of the beautiful people in the 70's.

Title
Review for Lord of Illusions (1995)
Starring Scott Bakula; Kevin J. O'Connor; Famke Janssen; Vincent Schiavelli
& Barry Sherman
If you could say one thing about Lord Of Illusions, it would be that it is
definitely different. Scott Bakula stars as a private eye that specializes
in cases dealing with the paranormal, such as demonic possessions and the
like. Dorothea (Famke Janssen), who is the wife of a magician, approaches
Bakula's character, Harry D'Amour. She is worried about her husband's
safety. Hubby was involved in an incident, years before, where he and
several others tracked down and killed a cult leader who had kidnapped a
little girl. This was no ordinary cult leader -- this guy had the power to
control people's minds using the power of illusions. Well, all these years
later the folks that helped to get rid of the cult leader are starting to
die. Famke's character thinks the reason for the deaths is that the cult
leader is coming back to get revenge for his death years earlier. She wants
Bakula's character to get to the bottom of it, and provide some protection
to boot. That's pretty much the story in a nutshell, and if it sounds
strange, it's not just because I'm lousy at describing movies. The story
really is a little on the strange side, although surprisingly easy to
follow.
On the whole, the acting isn't bad in this film, but some performances are
over the top to the extent that they end up being just plain terrible. That
goes for pretty much all the villains in the movie. No, strike that. Bakula
and Janssen are OK in the film, but everybody else is bad or borders on it.
With that being said, it really doesn't hurt the film all that much. That is
to say that you could have had Robert De Niro or Jack Nicholson in some of
these parts and it wouldn't have made the film a whole lot better.
It really isn't a bad film all and all. Although, if you are someone who
can't stand magic, and really can't swallow mind over matter plots, then you
should definitely stay far away from this movie. The special effects in the
illusion sequences aren't bad, but they look like something that you would
see on television as opposed to a production intended for theaters.
Confusion, bad acting, and a less than wonderful idea for a movie all
contribute to making Lord Of Illusions just your average thoughtless horror
film. The only saving grace is the fact that Bakula can actually act, and
Famke Janssen is a major babe. (I'm sexist, so sue me.) But even Famke
couldn't get me to sit though Lord Of Illusions for a second time. I've
never understood why Clive Barker is held up with such great regard among
horror fans. His writing and direction of this film leave me even more
puzzled than before over his popularity.

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
Starring Katie Holmes; Helen Mirren; Marisa Coughlan; Barry Watson & Liz
Stauber
There was a time when I thought Kevin Williamson was pretty much invincible
when it came to churning out quality material. I'm not sure if the man has
just overextended himself, or he has reached the end of his brilliance.
Either way, Teaching Mrs. Tingle marks the end of his current string of
excellent movies that he has been responsible for writing. With Teaching
Mrs. Tingle, Williamson takes on the role of director as well as his normal
role of writer. It almost seems that the two jobs were just a bit too much
for him. While his directorial debut is a competent, if unremarkable effort,
the screenplay is, at best, just slightly above average. And at times it
borders on bad. The story is a fairly ridiculous one, and the only thing
that saves it is that the characters are pretty good. But the true reason
that this movie doesn't die completely is the fine cast of actors that have
managed to save this film.
Katie Holmes plays Leigh Ann Watson, a very bright girl from an under
privileged family. Her only hope of ever getting out of her small town is to
become valedictorian of her high school graduating class. That way she can
score a big scholarship, which will be her only ticket to university. Sound
familiar to any of you? It should. This is almost the exact same character
that Holmes plays on Dawson's Creek -- a character that Kevin Williamson
created. I guess Kevin should get some credit for not ripping off somebody
else's characters. At least he had the decency to rip off his own work.
Anyway, Leigh Ann has one obstacle in her quest for her scholarship -- her
history teacher, Mrs. Tingle (Helen Mirren). Tingle is like every bad
teacher you've ever had all rolled into one. Tingle finds herself in the
position to ruin Leigh Ann's plans to better herself, and seems to take a
great deal of glee doing it. Actually, the reason that Tingle is going to
ruin Leigh Ann is fairly legitimate, but Williamson is hoping that you will
look past that minor inconvenience and just focus of the fact that Tingle is
a first class bitch. So Leigh Ann and her two friends, Jo Lynn (Marisa
Coughlan) and Luke (Barry Watson), decide to try to talk Tingle into giving
dear sweet Leigh Ann a second chance. But in the end they end up holding her
hostage in her own home. Unfortunately they aren't quite prepared for
dealing with Mrs. Tingle.
I'm not sure if this idiotic plot line was supposed to serve as the basis
for some sort of dark comedy, but it didn't work for me. As dumb as the
story was, I have to give Williamson credit for his characters. The
interaction between Tingle and her young captors was excellent. It was just
too bad that Williamson couldn't have found a better way of making this
story happen besides this very lame impromptu kidnapping.
While Katie Holmes and Barry Watson were the obvious audience draws in this
film, the real star is Helen Mirren. This woman plays her character to the
hilt. The best part of the movie was watching Mirren's Tingle play with her
captor's minds. Everyone in this film is great. That also includes Michael
McKean and Jeffrey Tambor in what amounted to glorified cameos. All were
good, but all could have been better if they had had a bit more to work
with. I never really got over the feeling that Holmes was just repeating a
recycled script from Dawson's Creek.
Williamson may have been doomed to fail on this movie. The film's release
came around the same time as the Columbine High School shooting in
Colorado -- prompting the producers to change the title of the film from
Killing Mrs. Tingle to Teaching Mrs. Tingle. I'm sure that little marketing
problem didn't help the film's chances at the box office. Then we have the
fairly schizophrenic way in which this movie was directed. Parts of it
almost seem to be played for pure comedy, while other parts are a failed
attempt at the darker side of humor. Then we have the director himself. For
an open homosexual, his direction certainly seemed to show a preoccupation
with Katie Holmes' breasts. Not that I'm complaining, it just seemed a bit
strange. (I guess if you have to be preoccupied with something, it might as
well be Katie Holmes' chest.)
High marks to the cast for keeping this sucker from going completely in the
crapper. With most of the praise leveled squarely at Mirren. If she hadn't
been so much fun to watch, I'm sure that I would have dozed off.
Williamson's characters were good; it's just that the situation that he put
them in took away from any positives that he brought to the table. My advice
is to skip Teaching Mrs. Tingle and check out another of Williamson's far
superior efforts. Keep an eye out for Holmes' future work. She hasn't found
the right film yet, but when she does, I guarantee you it will be something
to see.

Title
Review for Blob, The (1988)
Starring Shawnee Smith; Donovan Leitch; Ricky Paull Goldin; Kevin Dillon &
Billy Beck
The Blob is the remake of the 1960's classic (a term that I use very loosely
to define the original) about a really mean glob of goop that takes out
anything that gets in its way. Now the original version has the virtue of
cheesy special effects which give it a kind of nostalgic campy feel. The
fact that Steve McQueen was the star of the film doesn't exactly hurt it
either. Fast forward to the late '80's. Steve McQueen isn't in the remake
(this might have something to do with the fact that he had been pushing up
daisies for years). Nor is there any Hollywood heavy hitters in the lead
role. That is unless you count Matt Dillon's brother Kevin as a Hollywood
heavy hitter. The other thing that works against this new Blob is that
special effects technology has improved dramatically since the original. The
only things you need now to have great special effects in a movie are deep
pockets. It looks as if the produces of the new Blob had a couple of holes
in their pockets. The special effects in this movie are cheesy, like the
original's. Unlike the original, they don't look campy, they just look
cheap. One bright spot in the movie from a purely sexist point of view is
Shawnee Smith. She is very attractive and can actually act, which is more
than I can say about some of her costars.
In terms of plot, a little ball of pink goop falls from the sky. Seems this
goop was an experiment that was being housed up on a satellite. Anyway, the
pink stuff has a taste for humans. The more people it absorbs, the bigger it
gets. And it isn't the friendliest goop on the block either. Anyway, it
attacks this little town and it's up to the attractive local teenage
population to stop it. Not really, but that is how it seems.
This version attempts to recapture the camp of the original. As I've already
said, this new version of The Blob comes off more as cheap, badly acted, and
badly written than campy. In the years since this film was made none of the
cast have gone on to greatness. Although, star Shawnee Smith had a very tiny
role in Armageddon. The reason that we have never heard of any of them again
is quite simple -- they all stunk out loud. Although some of the film's
smaller roles are filled with some actors that, while not big stars, are
doubtless people that you will recognize from their supporting roles in
other movies and TV shows. It also appears that the producers of The Blob
tried to compensate for the lack of a special effects budget by making the
scenes in which the Blob makes meals of the townsfolk as gory as possible.
Sadly, it doesn't work very well.
If you want to see a big ball of goop terrorize a town, then I would say
that you should skip the remake and rent the original. (Although that isn't
so hot either.) This newest version is seriously lacking in any redeeming
qualities.

Title
Review for Maximum Risk (1996)
Starring Jean-Claude Van Damme; Natasha Henstridge; Jean-Hugues Anglade;
Zach Grenier & Paul Ben-Victor
Here's a concept -- Jean-Claude Van Damme gets killed within the first ten
minutes of the movie. Now if that isn't enough to get you to finally see a
Van Damme movie, I don't know what is. All sarcasm aside, it is certainly a
different way to start a movie, of course a few minutes later we find out
that the newly deceased had a twin brother -- so lucky us, we get to see
more of Jean-Claude. Van Damme #1 works for the Russian Mafia in the United
States and is killed by some of their operatives. Van Damme #2 is a police
officer in France who finds out that he had a twin brother he never knew
about after #1 gets killed in France. The remaining twin (the French cop)
goes to the United States to find out who killed his brother and avenge his
death. Once there, he hooks up with his deceased brother's girlfriend,
played by Natasha Henstridge, and the two of them set out to discover who
the murderers are.
Jean-Claude's acting abilities don't seem to be up to the usual lackluster
standards in this movie. In other words, just in case you missed the
sarcasm, his acting is worse than normal. On the upside, Natasha Henstridge
is in this film, and she does what she did best in Species -- she gets
naked. Sadly, this is probably the high point in the movie. She is actually
a decent actress, but didn't improve as much as I thought she would after
Species.
This is the typical Van Damme movie, with Jean-Claude doing a variety of
high end martial arts moves on his opponents. Nothing new here, and
certainly nothing we haven't seen in every other Van Damme movie. Simply
put, there is absolutely nothing new about this movie. It has a retread
plot -- this isn't the first time Jean-Claude has played twins. He still
can't act. We all saw Natasha's breasts in Species (although this is one
repeat performance I'm not complaining about). This is pretty much like
every movie that Van Damme has ever been involved in -- sub par.

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
Starring Adam Sandler; Kathy Bates; Henry Winkler; Fairuza Balk & Jerry Reed
I still can't figure out why people went in droves to see this movie. Now
before you go assuming I'm some sort of high brow snob, who can't appreciate
a little dumb humor, let me say that I love cheap humor. I thought There's
Something About Mary was one of the funniest films that I have ever seen and
it was certainly one of the best films of 1998. Low brow adolescent humor
can be a lot of fun, the problem with The Waterboy is that it is just low
brow and adolescent, there is no humor component. I wanted to like The
Waterboy, I really did. I think I only laughed maybe 2 or 3 times throughout
the entire movie. Actually, I smiled a couple of more times on top of that.
Not a great record for a 90-minute film. The problem with The Waterboy is
the same as most other Adam Sandler movies. Those responsible for this mess
seem to think that the sheer fact that Sandler walks around using a goofy
voice and playing dumb the entire movie is a substitute for actual funny
material. Nothing could be further from the truth, as matter of fact,
Sandler's idiot voice started to get on my nerves at points in this film.
It's really a shame too, because this film had the potential to be very
funny. I personally believe that Sandler is probably a very talented
comedian, it's just that so far he hasn't been able to find the right film
to showcase his talents. If his only talent is making goofy voices and
playing morons, my guess is that his career in the movies will go down the
same road as the vast majority of the former stars of Saturday Night Live.
Most of whom are now happily no longer in the entertainment industry.
Sandler plays a 31-year-old, somewhat mentally challenged, waterboy for a
college football team. The team's somewhat mentally disturbed coach (Henry
Winkler) realizes that his waterboy has a great deal of pent-up rage, which,
if harnessed properly, would make him a force to be reckoned with on the
football field. You can figure out the rest from here. Sandler joins the
team and this once lowly waterboy becomes a football star.
As I said, the film had a great deal of potential. The idea was a decent
one, but the main potential of this movie is a result of the cast. All of
whom are very good, just hamstrung by really, really, lousy material. Even
Sandler, annoying goofy voice and all, has enough charisma and natural
comedic ability to overcome some of his bad material. Even as unfunny as his
character is, I still found myself rooting for him throughout the film. But
it is the supporting cast that I feel most badly about. If their material
had been just a bit better, this film could have been such a funny movie.
Fairuza Balk plays Sandler's leather-wearing biker-chick love interest and
does a great job playing sleazy and sexy at the same time. Winkler is great
as the coach who uses a "Coaching For Dummies"-style book to help him get
through games. The real standout though, is Kathy Bates. Even with some of
the worst material of her career to deal with, she is still a treat to watch
in her role as Sandler's overprotective and overbearing Mama.
Even with the performances of Bates and Winkler, there is absolutely no way
I would recommend this movie. Although I get the distinct impression that
without them, this film would have ranked in negative numbers for me. Which
is sad, because I can't really put my finger on a particular element of the
movie and single it out as the cause of the disaster that it became. It's
obvious that those involved, specifically the actors, tried very hard to
make what they thought was going to be a funny movie. It's just too bad that
99 percent of all of the jokes fell flat.

Title
Review for Deep Rising (1998)
Starring Treat Williams; Famke Janssen; Anthony Heald; Kevin J. O'Connor &
Wes Studi
A luxury cruise liner is on its maiden voyage when terrorists decide to
hijack it. The terrorists only have one problem -- when they board the
vessel, they find that all the passengers have been killed by a sea
monster -- and they are its next meal. Deep Rising is not real heavy in the
plot department, as you might have gleaned from that very brief synopsis.
This is what you would call a typical b-horror flick if it weren't for the
fact that the production values are high enough to bring it out of the
low-budget b-basement. It's obvious that far more effort was expended on the
look of this film than on the story.
I'm taking my shots at this movie, but to tell the truth, as average monster
flicks go, this was fairly entertaining. The cast, while far from
outstanding, wasn't that bad. Treat Williams and Famke Janssen (Goldeneye)
head up the cast. Sure, Treat was a bit over the top, and Famke was clearly
cast more for her stunning looks that her acting talent, but they were fun
to watch together on screen. The supporting cast of mostly unknowns is good
while they are with us. But, as is typical with movies like this, most are
just meals in waiting for the nasty sea monster. It goes after, and devours
things with a great deal of zeal and gore. We mustn't forget the gore in a
film like this. If there were no gross-out moments, where would we be?
The CGI monster shots are not bad (certainly no where near as bad as
Anaconda was), but they won't be heralded as groundbreaking either. They
work well in a movie of this caliber. The ship is very well done -- most of
the action seems to take place on the lower flooded levels of this rapidly
sinking cruise liner, and it all is very impressive from that standpoint. Of
course, the lower decks are also consistently splattered with generous
helpings of gory slime and excreted digested human bodies. How appetizing.
Fun little flick. No more suspension of disbelief required here than in any
other typical horror/monster movie. Just sit back with a big bowl of popcorn
and enjoy. But I would finish the popcorn before they start going to the
lower decks, if I were you. Enjoy.

Title
Review for Star Trek: The Motion Picture (1979)
Starring William Shatner; Leonard Nimoy; DeForest Kelley & James Doohan
This is the film that Star Trek fans waited for ten years for. They were so
thrilled that Paramount made the damn thing that fans went in droves to see
it, and made it a hit. At least that's my theory, because nothing else about
this movie could explain its success. I could be being a little hard on this
film -- for its day the special effects were amazing -- possibly the best
that had ever been in a film. The problem is that it's now 20 years later
and the special effects don't stack up quite as well today, so this film
needs a little more to hold an audience. Unfortunately, it doesn't have it.
Now before I get thousands of angry letters from Star Trek fans, I have to
point out that I am a big fan of the series. As a matter of fact, I still
remember going to see Star Trek: The Motion Picture when it was released
back in 1979. I, like everyone else in the theater was thrilled with the
movie. That was then, and this in now. I usually like to judge films on
their own merits, but it is extremely hard to do so when dealing with the
Star Trek franchise. It seems as though you can turn on your TV any hour of
the day and catch a rerun of the original series or one of its spin-offs. So
Star Trek: The Motion Picture almost has to be judged by the quality of the
writing that has come before and after it. Even in comparison to the sequel,
Star Trek II: The Wrath Of Khan, which is arguably the best of all of the
Star Trek films, Star Trek: The Motion Picture pales in comparison. I was
shocked as I screened this movie in order to review it. I hadn't seen it in
several years and I was astounded as to how draggy it was. From the extended
sequence of music before the opening credits, to the long flyby shots of the
Enterprise as Kirk sees it for the first time this movie gives boring a new
definition. To be fair, the Enterprise flyby shots were included to give
millions of Trekkies the chance to see the restyled Enterprise and marvel at
what ten years of special effects advancement and many millions of dollars
can do in terms of a facelift. Unfortunately, after almost twenty years of
these movies we all know what the Enterprise looks like, so it just amounts
to extra minutes of pointless nothingness.
I'm not even going to get into the Klingons, who ten years earlier had
looked like humans who hadn't bathed in a few months and then go from that
into having a spiny ridge down the center of their heads. I guess the
make-up artists were so concerned with impressing the audience that they
forgot to bother watching the original television series.
OK, on to the plot. A huge cloud is heading towards Earth, wiping out every
thing in its path and the only vessel that can reach it in time is the newly
refitted U.S.S. Enterprise. Star Fleet gives command back to James Kirk
(William Shatner) and he and the gang go off to save the galaxy. Another
thing that I should point out is that the first half of this movie is just
like one big reunion show with the typical "Hi, how are you? How long has it
been?" Now that was fine and dandy when the movie first came out, but kinda
monotonous now. One high note of this movie is that Willim Shatner gives one
of the most understated performances of his career -- this isn't saying that
he still doesn't give overacting a whole new meaning at certain points, just
that he keeps it to a minimum. Of course many might argue that it is just
that quality that made Bill Shatner the star he is today.
The plot is weak, and the movie is slow to the point of tears at some points
in order for director Robert Wise to get in as many special effects shots as
he could. It is obvious that the producers figured that between the
spectacular special effects and the reunion aspect of the movie, the
audience wouldn't care if there was a plot. I'm not going to gripe anymore
about this movie -- did a mention the uniforms? -- They all look like they
are wearing pajamas. I'm not saying that this is a bad movie, although, it
is far from being a good one. It's just that the years have not been kind to
it. Combine that with the fact several of its sequels have been many times
superior (Start Trek II: The Wrath Of Khan and Star Trek IV: The Voyage
Home) and you get the feeling of being a little cheated by people who made a
name for themselves because of the top notch writing so long associated with
Star Trek. If you are a Star Trek fan who wants to get a little nostalgic,
it's not a bad choice. If you aren't interested in nostalgia, or not a
particularly big Star Trek fan, do yourself a big favor and watch Star Trek
II: The Wrath Of Khan -- a better film (albeit darker) in every respect.
No where near as good as some of its sequels  5/10

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Starring Mel Gibson; Gregg Henry; Maria Bello; Deborah Unger & David Paymer
In the grand scheme of Mel Gibson movies, Payback was better than Conspiracy
Theory, but not as good as Braveheart or Lethal Weapon. In other words, it's
a decent couple of hours of entertainment, but 20 years from now if a they
compile a list of Mel Gibson's greatest hits, Payback probably won't be on
it.
Gibson plays a crook who gets double crossed by his partner after they heist
a payroll. Mel's partner needed the money to pay off a mob debt. So he puts
a couple of bullets in Mel, leaving him for dead, and goes on to pay off his
creditors. But, Mel isn't dead (it would be a real short movie if he was)
and he certainly isn't happy. To make matters worse, he wants his money back
and is willing to go to any lengths to accomplish this feat. His ex partner
has already used it to pay off the mobsters, so Mel goes after the mob to
get it back.
Payback is often a very violent film. To its credit, there are a few scenes
that could have been very graphic, but the director (I'm not sure which
one -- more about that in a second) made the choice to let the audience use
their imagination instead of subjecting us to the usual gratuitous gore
found in many films. The film appears a bit disjointed in places, which is
understandable considering producer / star Gibson wasn't thrilled with how
the film turned out and wanted parts of it re-shot. When the director
refused, another one was brought in to do the re-shoot. So as a result while
the final product is apparently better than the original (although
personally I would love to see the original version for comparisons sake) it
does get a bit of a choppy feel to it towards the end.
It's always tough to make a film where the main character is a villain,
unless that person has some redeeming qualities. In this case, Gibson's
character has few redeeming qualities. But hey, its Mel, so even when he is
killing people in cold blood we are still rooting for him. My guess is that
if that you put some other Johnny Bananas actor in this role, the audience
would not be quite as responsive. Gibson is Gibson, whether he is playing a
suicidal cop or a stone cold killer, he does a good job. He almost
guarantees that no matter what else happens in the rest of the movie at
least the audience is going to get one good performance. This time out Mel
is surrounded by a good supporting cast, including Maria Bello (as his love
interest), William Devane and Kris Kristofferson (as mod bosses). The man
who steals the show and unfortunately doesn't have a real big part is James
Coburn (as yet another mobster). If I had one big disappointment in this
film, it would be that Coburn didn't have a bigger role.
In the end, Payback is a fairly solid action thriller, just not in quite the
same league as some of Mel Gibson's other work.

Title
Review for Freeway (1996)
Starring Kiefer Sutherland; Reese Witherspoon & Bokeem Woodbine
I used to think that The Conversation was the worse film I had ever seen.
Freeway is giving me second thoughts. Freeway is a modern retelling of
Little Red Riding Hood. Only in the nineties, Little Red Riding Hood is a
foul-mouthed juvenile delinquent played by Reese Witherspoon, and the Big
Bad Wolf is a serial killer (Keifer Sutherland). To top that pathetic
premise off -- Reese goes to visit Granny and you'll never guess who's
waiting under the cover's in Granny's bed.
Keifer Sutherland is one of Hollywoods most talented, yet underrated
actors, and Reese Witherspoon is exceptionally talented and will most likely
become a major star. So what are they doing in this movie? After seeing the
end result, undoubtedly they are both asking themselves the same question.
You might be asking yourself why this is such a short review. The answer is
quite simple -- I dont want to waste any more of my time writing or
thinking about this movie than absolutely necessary. I wasted enough of my
time just sitting through it.
Note to Keifer: You wonder why you aren't a bigger star in Hollywood?
Because you keep making movies like this. Note to Reese: You were great in
Fear, what happened this time? Note to both: Don't worry about it too much,
no one saw this movie anyway.
Bottom line -- I'm still shaking my head. Don't waste your time on this
turkey. If you want to see a great Keifer Sutherland movie, go rent
Flatliners or Young Guns. Reese Witherspoon's abundant acting talents are
used to their full potential in Fear, a great thriller. Do yourself a favor
and rent one of these movies -- but stay as far away from Freeway as you
possibly can.

Title
Review for Night of the Living Dead (1968)
Starring Duane Jones; Judith O'Dea; Karl Hardman; Marilyn Eastman & Keith
Wayne
It seems that something is happening to the East Coast of the United States.
The dead are starting to rise again, and they are now flesh-eating zombies.
Those that they kill quickly rise again to join their killers in their
bloodthirsty exploits. This movie centers on a group of individuals who have
sought shelter in an old farmhouse to get away from the suddenly walking
dead. The group is now trapped in the house, which is surrounded by the
walking dead. They then have to try to figure out a way to escape without
becoming dinner to the ghouls.
Having already seen the 80's remake of this movie, I'll have to admit that
it took a bit away from the experience. Specifically, some of the scenes
that probably should have been a bit more shocking weren't, since I had a
pretty good idea at all times what was coming next. When I saw the remake, I
really thought that the actress playing the character of Barbara was one of
the least talented that I had ever seen. I was wrong. The original Barbara
(Judith O'Dea) is ten times worse. And as bad as she is, the rest of the
cast isn't a hell of a lot better. The possible exception is Duane Jones,
who does a decent job surrounded by bad actors and dead people knocking at
his door.
Over the first half of this movie, I'll admit that I really had no idea why
this movie has been so revered over the years. The acting isn't especially
good, the photography is dark and grainy (at least the print I was
watching). And there was really nothing particularly scary about what was
taking place. Not to mention that the film was released in 1968, but it was
still black and white.
By the second half, the film started to show a few small, but critical
differences, from its poor white trash remake. There are protracted scenes
involving TV news clips with people trying to deal with the ghoul crisis.
While they are a small part of the movie, they do add to it significantly.
Although, they certainly do nothing to add to the main part of the movie,
which is this group stuck in the farmhouse. Maybe I'm the only one who ever
thought of this, but these zombies are walking slower than a 90-year-old
with a walker. Why didn't these people just walk right past them?
I guess that maybe that is why I don't make horror films. My IQ seems to be
above the normal cut-off point for horror film writers. Anything above that
of a cabbage, and you aren't allowed to write horror films. Sure, there are
some very impressive exceptions, but the writers responsible for this movie
sure aren't among them. If you are curious to see what the hype is about,
check it out. If you are in the market for some scares, look elsewhere.

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
Starring Michael Douglas; Gwyneth Paltrow; Viggo Mortensen & David Suchet
Michael Douglas plays Steven Taylor, a rich financier who has a very young
wife. (Gwyneth Paltrow). Things are not going great in the marriage. This
may have something to do with the fact that she is having an affair with a
struggling artist (Viggo Mortensen). So Hubby decides to have his lovely
young wife murdered -- and he hires his wife's lover to do it. If that
doesn't interest you right there, I don't know what will. Douglas's
character has the murder planned to perfection. Except one little thing goes
wrong, his wife survives the murder attempt. Now her husband must cover his
tracks and avoid being caught.
A Perfect Murder is based on the stage play "Dial M For Murder" and is a
remake of the Alfred Hitchcock classic of the same name. This latest version
is certainly on of the most well written movies that you are likely to see
in the near future. I was amazed at the amount of thought that was put into
the story, particularly the amount of detail surrounding the murder plot.
The dialogue is also first rate, which is what you'd expect for a film of
this caliber.
It's one thing to have good writing, but you also need the acting to go with
it. Casting Michael Douglas in this film was the best thing they could have
done. He gives his usual stellar performance, and makes everyone around him
look that much better. That's not to say that Douglas's costars weren't
great. Quite the opposite, Gwyneth Paltrow and Viggo Mortensen did a
fantastic job in this film. In both cases though, they did not fail to give
their best performances in the film when they were doing a scene with
Michael Douglas.
Also worthy of mention is the overall look of this film. To say it was
stylish was an understatement. This is one good looking film. The obvious
attention to detail that was paid to the sets and overall feel of the film
is more than a match for the intricate plot line of this film.
A Perfect Murder is a film that makes you pay attention. Not because you
have to, but because you want to. This is a tribute to the fine storytelling
of this movie. It also makes A Perfect Murder a very good choice for your
next trip to the video store.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Starring Patrick Stewart; Jonathan Frakes; Brent Spiner & LeVar Burton
Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the rest of the crew of the U.S.S.
Enterprise are back for their third outing in the ninth film based on the
1960's series, Star Trek. Gone are Kirk, Spock and McCoy and in their wake
in the very able and very talented cast from Star Trek: The Next Generation.
As usual, a crisis is brewing and it is up to the crew of the Enterprise to
make the galaxy safe again. This time out The United Federation of Planets
and an alien race led by F. Murray Abraham are trying to move some colonists
off a planet against the colonist's will. It turns out that this planet is
the fountain of youth and the Federation and their alien buddies feel that
is should be used for the good of everyone and not just a few hundred
colonists. Of course Picard feels that this sort of treachery is wrong, so
he disobeys direct orders and vows to help protect the colonists.
Insurrection is a lighter movie than the last two Star Trek films. The film
focuses on the lofty question of whether the rights of society as a whole
outweighs the rights of a small group. In this respect it gets back to the
roots of Star Trek by disguising social commentary as science fiction. It
doesn't do a bad job, other than it tries to inject too much humor into the
story line. Many of the jokes are your typical inside Star Trek-Fan-Only
jokes, while many of the others just fall flat. The other criticism that I
had with the story was that it ignores common sense. There are only a few
hundred people on this whole planet, why do they have to be moved? The
explanation is that the planet has to be bombarded with deadly radiation so
that this fountain of youth effect will be strong enough to help heal F.
Murray Abraham's aliens who number only a couple of dozen. So the basic
story line is bad enough in that we have a few hundred being booted out for
a few billion, at least that's plausible. But in reality we have a few
hundred being moved for the benefits of a few dozen, which makes no sense
whatsoever.
The other little hiccup in logic is the inclusion of Worf (Michael Dorn),
the trusty Klingon. Worf was on Star Trek: The Next Generation, so they want
to include him in the films. No problem so far. Worf is now a character of
Star Trek: Deep Space Nine, so the writers have to find a way to have him
show up. In the last Star Trek movie, First Contact, the included Worf in a
credible fashion, in this one, the writers are so lazy that the completely
gloss over why he is even in the movie. What little explanation they do give
is so small that you would have missed it if you weren't hanging on every
word on the screen.
My minor problems with the movie aside, Star Trek: Insurrection does have an
overwhelming number of good points as compared to its bad ones. While many
of the jokes do miss the mark, many are pretty good, even for non-trekkies.
The special effects are among the best for the Star Trek series. The action
is plentiful and well done. This is a very good-looking movie. It should
come as no surprise to anyone who ever watched Star Trek: The Next
Generation that the acting is first rate. It is very obvious that these
actors have been working together for over a decade. They interact with each
other with a skill that few other ensemble casts can muster.
Most Star Trek fans probably will not be disappointed with this latest film
in the series. If you've always hated Star Trek, there is nothing here that
is going to change your mind. Star trek: Insurrection is not the best film
in the series, but it is good enough to dispel the long standing tradition
of the odd numbered films in the series being far inferior to the even
numbered ones.

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
Starring James Van Der Beek; Jon Voight; Paul Walker; Ron Lester & Scott
Caan
I didn't go into Varsity Blues expecting a whole lot. I'll have to admit
that I'm not the biggest football fan in the world, so the whole premise of
the movie wasn't at the top of my list as far as appealing story lines go.
Having said that, I am a fan of Jon Voight, and I think James Van Der Beek
is one of the more talented actors on television on one of the best shows on
television (Dawson's Creek). So I wasn't real surprised that I enjoyed the
performances of Voight and Van Der Beek, although Van Der Beek could use
some serious practice on his southern accent. The part that did surprise me
was that I actually enjoyed the rest of the movie. The fact that it included
a scene in a strip bar and another scene with a girl wearing nothing other
than whip cream probably didn't hurt. But the supporting cast was good, and
the story line, while revolving around football, had enough extras to keep
even those of us who avoid football telecasts at all costs something to
enjoy.
The basic premise goes something like this. The movie is set in typical
small town Midwest America. The town is crazy over the high school football
team, and even crazier over the local coach (Jon Voight), who the townsfolk
consider to be a legend, even though he is the meanest S.O.B. to ever put a
whistle around his neck. Van Der Beek plays a second string quarterback who
never gets playing time and who takes the brunt of the coach's abuse. Like
all good formula sports movies, the all-star quarterback suffers a season
ending injury and Van Der Beek is called upon to lead the team into the
state finals. Coach and new starting quarterback still don't like each
other, which is where most of the conflict in this movie arises from. Thrown
in for good measure are the teams off the field antics in what comes off as
a rip off of Porky's with a higher budget.
As I already alluded to, Voight and Van Der Beek do a good job in their
roles. Voight is perfectly cast as the coach who only cares about winning no
matter what the personal cost to his players. Van Der Beek, aside from the
lousy accent, shows that his great performances on Dawson's Creek are not
just a result of working with a talented cast and creative genius Kevin
Williamson. Van Der Beek really stands out in this movie. It is a credit as
much to his performance as to the decent supporting cast surrounding him. If
Van Der Beek's performance in this film is any indication, he may be well on
his way to a very successful career as a leading man in Hollywood. Let's
face it Kevin Costner's missing in action english accent in Robin Hood:
Prince Of Thieves certainly never hurt his career. As long as Van Der Beek
can avoid roles in movies involving post-apocalyptic postal carriers, or
post-apocalyptic flooded continents, he should do OK. The supporting cast
does their job fairly solidly, but none leap out as being overly
outstanding.
The interaction between Voight and his players and Van Der Beek's rise to
become the town VIP and the problems that that cause him more than give the
non-sports minded something to latch on to, even with all of the football.
Add to that the performances of Van Der Beek and Voight, and you have a
fairly entertaining couple of hours.

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
Starring Wesley Snipes; Stephen Dorff; Kris Kristofferson; N'Bushe Wright &
Donal Logue
Blade is the movie that shows that Wesley Snipes really can live up to his
potential as one of Hollywood's premier leading men. Blade is based on the
comic book character of the same name and has that comic book kind of feel
to it. It is a very stylish movie and for the most part that style works
very well. Although, at a few points I thought I was watching a music video
as opposed to a movie. The ideas behind Blade are good, as is the basic plot
of the story. But at times, things seem to get a bit muddled, and the
writers appear to want to do too many things at once. That really doesn't
take away from the story too much, but it does hurt it a little bit.
Blade (Snipes) is half man, half vampire. His mother was bitten by a vampire
when she was pregnant with him and as a result he has many of the classic
traits of a vampire. Including a thirst for human blood that must be kept
under control by a special serum which quenches his blood lust. Blade has
spent his life hunting down and killing vampires as a sort of revenge for
the fact that one of their kind killed his mother. But this isn't as easy as
it seems, because the vampires in Blade's world are more sophisticated than
the ones that you find in most films. The government and other authorities
know of the existence of vampires, but they let them feast of the population
at large because they are taking bribes from the vampires. Where do vampires
get money? Well, in Blade, they run multinational companies in order to
finance their vampire organizations. I personally thought that this whole
secret corporate world run by vampires to be a very clever idea, and a great
addition to the movie. Blade runs up against the evil Deacon Frost (Stephen
Dorff) a maverick in the vampire community. He isn't content to live among
humans, and is convinced that the vampire race is the superior one and he
means to insure its superiority. He has managed to translate the ancient
vampire scrolls that tell of the method of making him an all-powerful
vampire -- rendering him virtually unstoppable. It's up to Blade to see that
this doesn't transpire.
Admittedly, Blade is style over substance through and through. The story is
a relatively forgettable one, but it is fun none the less. The acting in
Blade is just about what you would expect from a movie of this type. This
isn't a film that is going to win accolades for its performances, and the
actors know this. The movie is played for fun and nobody seems to think
otherwise. It's a popcorn movie, and no one involved has any illusions
otherwise.
Blade's production values are as slick as any that you will find in your
typical summer blockbuster. The combat sequences between Blade and his
vampire targets are incredibly well done. Although, the MTV-style cuts did
get on my nerves after a while during long sequences.
Blade is a fun movie with an interesting take on the vampire genre. This is
not the movie for those of you who like your vampires in tuxedos and living
in coffins in the basement of some gothic castle. What Blade excels at is
bringing the classic lore of the vampire into the next century with a fresh
outlook on life. Very cool.

Title
Review for Crash (1996)
Starring James Spader; Holly Hunter; Elias Koteas; Deborah Unger & Rosanna
Arquette
Strange, disturbing, and weird are all words that would make apt
descriptions of Crash. Simply put, Crash is a movie about people who become
sexually aroused over car crashes. Both being a participant in them, and
even viewing such carnage is a turn on. James Spader stars as a man who has
a very open relationship with his wife (Deborah Kara Unger). They share
stories of their extra marital sexual exploits with each other as a way of
turning the other on. Nice. Anyway, good old James Spader is driving down
the highway and loses control of his car, running into a car carrying Holly
Hunter and her husband. The result sends Hunter and Spader's characters to
the hospital and the husband to the graveyard. Both Hunter and Spader suffer
crippling injuries but one thing leads to another and they end up meeting
and having sex in the back of a car. Sure, makes sense to me. Every woman
would just rush right out and do the nasty with the guy that just killed her
husband. I might add that this is the point were the movie completely lost
me. Hunter draws Spader into a world populated by weirdoes who get off on
watching car wrecks and who seem to enjoy the pain associated with these car
crashes. Especially if the injuries sustained are permanent. Spader brings
wifey along for the ride too, and it just keeps getting stranger and
stranger. The only way to sum up the plot of this movie is that most people
will want to stop watching it before the halfway point. Those that actually
make it through the whole movie will be left shaking their heads.
The acting is, I guess, what you would call decent. To be honest, the whole
thing is just so weird it was really hard to tell. One standout in this
otherwise cave of weirdness is Deborah Kara Unger, who purrs her way through
her dialogue. While Unger may not qualify as drop dead gorgeous, she
certainly has the exotic good looks to cause a traffic accident. (Sorry, bad
joke.) In all seriousness, she was, at least for this male reviewer, the
high point of the movie. Which compared to the rest of this film, isn't
exactly a big feat.
Crash is not for the easily offended. Actually, Crash might even offend the
not so easily offended. At the very least, it will leave you scratching your
head. Not so much at the fact that people would get sexual gratification at
a car crash. We all know that the world is filled with weirdoes. What you
will be left scratching your head over is the fact that somebody would
actually make a movie about this subject matter. Director David Cronenberg
leaves little doubt in my mind that he is now the undisputed king of strange
movies. Here's a piece of advice Dave. I think it's time for you to change
careers. Hopefully your new one will keep you far away from movies -- making
theaters a lot safer for everyone.

Title
Review for American Werewolf in London, An (1981)
Starring David Naughton; Griffin Dunne; Jenny Agutter; Don McKillop & Paul
Kember
An American Werewolf In London is John Landis' groundbreaking feature about
an American tourist who gets himself bitten by a werewolf in jolly old
England. The groundbreaking part of the movie is the special effects. More
specifically, the makeup used for the transformation of a man into a
werewolf; and for the ghosts that haunt the main character. Even twenty
years after its release, that part of the movie is still impressive.
Although, I would have to say that it really is the only part of the movie
that could be considered impressive. The rest of the movie is a run of the
mill werewolf flick with some extra gore thrown in for good measure. If it
weren't for the cutting edge makeup effects used in the werewolf
transformation it is most likely that this is a film that would have gone
largely unnoticed when it was released back in 1980. And with good reason --
the acting isn't great and neither is the writing. Well OK, we don't
actually expect either of those things to be great in a horror film. But one
other important element is lacking here too -- it isn't scary. With no
exception, you know what is going to happen before it happens. You don't
even need the obligatory scary music to give you a hint. I will give
director John Landis credit for this being one of the best looking horror
films that I have ever seen. But John, it just wasn't scary. I didn't know
if this was intended to be some sort of romantic drama and the whole
werewolf thing was just thrown in to get people to come to the theater to
see it, but it didn't work for me. Actually, it was intended as a sort of a
spoof on horror films. But the mix of the comedic moments with the melodrama
was so bad; the intended humor was lost on me. It's never a good sign that
you don't realize a movie is supposed to be funny until after the movie is
long over and you read it in the background material. Call me crazy, but you
shouldn't have to do research on a movie to enjoy it.
I'm not even going to get into the plot of the movie that much, since the
title pretty well sums the whole thing up. Werewolf bites boy (David
Naughton). Boy ends up in hospital where he is tended to and eventually
falls for pretty nurse (Jenny Agutter) and then strange things begin to
happen to boy. Including, and I must admit this is a very nice touch, visits
from his friend who was killed in the same werewolf attack that ended up
with him in the hospital. The neat thing here is that his buddy is a rapidly
deteriorating corpse. I know it sounds strange, but it actually works. The
scenes between David Naughton and the dead buddy (Griffin Dunne) are really
the best parts of the movie.
As I said, probably the only reason that this film was a hit was because of
the special effects. While they are still impressive today, they aren't
impressive enough, or plentiful enough to warrant watching this film. And
since they are more or less the highlight of the film, there are far better
choices out there if you want a scary movie to curl up with your sweetheart
to watch. Actually, the 1998 sequel, An American Werewolf In Paris, is more
entertaining since it doesn't take itself as seriously and actually provides
a few more laughs along the way.

Title
Review for Dante's Peak (1997)
Starring Pierce Brosnan; Linda Hamilton; Jamie Renée Smith; Jeremy Foley &
Elizabeth Hoffman
Pierce Brosnan stars as volcano expert Harry Dalton who works for the US
government's geological department. He is sent into the quite town of
Dante's Peak when geological readings indicate a higher than normal level of
activity around the dormant volcano on which the small community is built.
When Harry arrives, he also notices a variety of other factors which lead
him to believe that Dante's Peak may have some very big problems on its
hands in the not too distant future. Harry tries to warn the mayor (Linda
Hamilton) and town council of the impending danger, but is over ruled by his
boss who prefers to take a wait and see approach to the possible problem. Of
course, in the end, Harry is proven right, and the volcano awakens with some
of the best special effects that movie producers can buy.
While the special effects are great, Dante's Peak is more about the story
leading up to the impending disaster than the disaster itself. Which is not
to say that when the volcano eventually erupts that the producers don't milk
it for all it's worth. Now at this point, there is probably some fool out
there thinking "gee thanks for spoiling the movie for me by telling me that
the volcano blows". To that guy I say  hey moron, what did you think was
going to happen in a movie about a volcano? That they were going to spend a
pleasant day looking at it while eating a picnic lunch? Although I guess
that kind of is a small problem with movie like Dante's Peak -- you pretty
well know from the get go that massive property damage is going to occur at
some point in the film.
While most of the movie takes place before the actual eruption, there is
enough tension in the air to keep the audience interested. I really didn't
notice that the movie isn't filled with high-end special effects. And
towards the end of the film when the computer-generated lava rears its ugly
head, it makes the wait well worth it. I think a good deal of credit for the
tension should go to the amazing score of the movie. I don't think it would
be possible to match up a score to a movie better than what was done in
Dante's Peak. When we do get to the eruption, the volcanic effects are
impressive and very realistic. Pierce Brosnan does a great job in the
leading man role here, although this should come as no surprise to James
Bond fans. An impressive supporting cast backs up Brosnan and Linda
Hamilton. Most of whom are relative unknowns, but they all do a very solid
job.
There will be no doubt in your mind that this is what it feels like to be in
the midst of a volcanic event. My hat goes off to director Roger Donaldson
for the film's impressive realism. This was the first of 1997's two lava
movies, the other being Volcano. Of the two, Dante's Peak has the stronger
story and is just a tad bit more on the realistic side. While it might not
have the dizzying number of special effects that populated Volcano, I think
it is fair to say that Dante's Peak's effects budget was put to slightly
better use, by concentrating on making the volcanic activity look more
realistic as opposed to simply over the top. Good movie -- well worth
checking out.

Title
Review for Ice Pirates, The (1984)
Starring Robert Urich; Mary Crosby; Anjelica Huston; Ron Perlman & Michael
D. Roberts
Cheesy from the word go. But I enjoyed it. I have to say that The Ice
Pirates holds a few memories for me. When I first saw it in a theater, oh so
many years ago, it was the first movie that I had ever seen in a theater
with any sort of sexually suggestive dialogue. Quite the shock. It is also
the very first movie I ever rented when I got my very first VCR. I didn't
get it because it was so spectacular the first time around, but because it
was Christmas and there wasn't a great selection in the video store.
Watching this time, I was surprised at just how packed to the max with
cheese this sucker really was. Although, that seems to be the intention of
the filmmakers. I can't imagine that they ever expected anyone to take this
film too seriously.
The Ice Pirates is set in a distant galaxy where ongoing wars have depleted
the galaxy of water. So the most precious commodity is ice, and the evil
rulers of the galaxy control that. Robert Urich (yes, Spencer: For Hire)
plays an ice pirate who makes his living hijacking transport ships filled
with shipments of ice. His crew is a motley band of scoundrels including
Anjelica Huston. (Yes, that Anjelica Huston). On one of these raids, Urich
runs into a beautiful princess (Mary Crosby -- Bing's daughter). He ends up
falling for her and the two of them go off looking for her father -- who has
disappeared. This is a big simplification, but to be honest, in The Ice
Pirates, I don't think plot was ever something that anyone was real
concerned about.
The movie is filled with every plot device, prop and cheesy special effect
that can possibly be crammed into one film. All with seemingly the same
purpose -- the specific intent of making this film as cheesy as possible.
These range from the space herpe that infects the ice pirate's ship. To the
high-speed effects which are used when the ship hits a time warp. I'm not
even going to bother getting into the robots that populate this film.
Actually commenting on the performances of this film seems pointless.
Everyone in this movie seems to be giving 110% effort at making their
performances as over the top as the possible as they can without actually
breaking up laughing during a line of dialogue. Bad. Bad. Bad. Since that is
what they were going for, they can be excused somewhat.
If there were one compliment that I could give The Ice Pirates, it would be
that nobody would ever confuse it for a good movie. But I still had fun
watching it again.

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
Starring Matt Damon; Gwyneth Paltrow; Jude Law; Cate Blanchett & Philip
Seymour Hoffman
In some strange way, The talented Mr. Ripley is what you would consider to
be a chick flick. I'm not sure why, but that's how it ends up. The two guys
who I saw the movie with both disliked it as much, if not more, than I did.
But yet my buddy's wife and her female friend really liked it. I'm not sure
what it was about this movie that we males disliked the most. I would have
to say that a movie starring Matt Damon and Jude Law would never normally
top my must-see list. Add Gwyneth Paltrow to the mix and you have the
makings for a movie that is just too sickly sweet for words. Maybe it was
all the gay references that we didn't appreciate. I really don't want to pay
to see one guy put the moves on another guy. (Two women, yes. But not two
guys.) But I think the real killer for me was the male frontal nudity. Do we
really need to see Jude Law in a bathtub? Let me answer that with a
resounding NO. What is it with the dick shots in movies lately? The night
before watching The Talented Mr. Ripley, I had to endure Oliver Stone's
3-hour tribute to male genitals, Any Given Sunday. I know all the females
out there will say that it's about time we get male nudity, since females
have been going topless in movies for years. But ladies, there is a hell of
a difference between breasts and penises. I propose a new rule for male
nudity in movies. If we have to endure male genitals swinging in the breeze,
I say that it should be mandatory for female genitals to get an equal amount
of screen time. Just a thought. Anyway, back to this movie.
Another problem that I had with this movie was the story. Matt Damon plays
Tom Ripley, a young man, who by a twist of fate, (or is it?) runs into a
shipping magnate (James Rebhorn) who mistakenly thinks that Ripley is a
former classmate of his son's. Ripley does nothing to correct this error.
Instead he accepts an offer from the man to travel to Italy to try to
persuade the man's son, Dickie Greenleaf (Jude Law), to return home to the
United States. This is where things get interesting. Tom Ripley immediately
begins to show signs of some serious sociopathic behavior. He arrives in
Italy and immediately ingratiates himself into the lives of his "friend"
Dickie, and Dickie's girlfriend Marge (Gwyneth Paltrow). It is difficult to
go into a great deal of detail without giving too much of the movie away,
but suffice to say that Tom wants Dickie's life, and is willing to do
whatever he has to in order to get it. The pure sociopathic genius with
which Tom Ripley goes about his chores is amazing. My hat goes off for
writing of Ripley's manipulation of everyone else in the movie. At times I
almost feel sorry for his character's occasional problems, until I began to
wonder if everything that is going on is not just some part of his master
plan. My problem with the plot is that I was never sure why Ripley was doing
what he was doing. (I know he was nuts, but I wanted more than that.) I
could never see his goal. Maybe that was supposed to be the point, but I
felt that it hurt the story more than helping it.
I can't find fault with the Ripley character, and if everything surrounding
him was a little more rounded, this might have been a better movie. I just
didn't care about anybody else in the movie. So the manipulation that they
endured at Ripley's hands never elicited much of a reaction. I made a crack
about Damon, Law and Paltrow at the top of the review. It's not that I
dislike any of them, they are just the sort of actors that fall into my
"take them or leave them" pile. Damon is actually quite good as Ripley, but
not good enough to overcome the multitude of weak spots in the plot. Jude
Law continues to land in my "who cares" pile. He was good, but I was so
ambivalent towards his character that I really can't give him high marks.
Then we have Gwyneth. It seems her only job was to play the girl who you
can't help but fall madly in love with. She fills the role nicely and, as
usual, exudes charm. The one actor who I do have very good things to say
about is Philip Seymour Hoffman, who plays Dickie's playboy friend. He is
about the only one who is suspicious of Ripley and you can cut the tension
with a knife when he and Damon appear on the screen together. Unfortunately,
his role, while integral, is fairly small.
This is a movie that I have no doubt I would have really enjoyed under
different circumstances. Other than the above-mentioned problems, I can't
really put my finger on the major flaw that really hurt the film. But it was
there nonetheless. The Talented Mr. Ripley is the sort of film that I hope
gets remade someday. All of the major components are there for a spectacular
movie. With some expert tweaking, it could have been one hell of a film.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Starring Jack Nicholson; Helen Hunt; Greg Kinnear; Cuba Gooding Jr. & Skeet
Ulrich
Jack Nicholson and Helen Hunt both won Oscars for their performances in As
Good As It Gets, and Greg Kinnear was nominated for his performance as well.
For a movie that received such attention at the awards ceremonies, it was
certainly a heck of a disappointment. As Good As It Gets was marketed as
sort of a romantic comedy, but this movie was short on comedy and the
romance was the pits.
Nicholson plays an obsessive-compulsive writer who, to put it bluntly, is
obnoxious. He falls in love with his waitress at the local restaurant (Helen
Hunt), who just happens to have a gravely ill son. Throw in to the mix
Nicholson's gay next door neighbor (Greg Kinnear), who Nicholson's character
takes great delight in tormenting and you have the basis for a movie that
isn't that great. Certainly not worthy of all the critical acclaim that it
has received. But then again, what do critics know? Adding to the intricate
plot twists of the movie (I'm being sarcastic here, just in case you missed
it), Kinnear's character gets beaten up when he walks in on burglars. So by
some miracle of modern cinematic genius, Kinnear, Hunt and Nicholson go off
on some road trip so Kinnear's character can go beg his parents for money to
tide him over until he recovers from his injuries. It sounds stranger than
it actually is, but it really isn't significantly better.
If it were anyone else other than Jack Nicholson playing the role of the
obsessive-compulsive belligerent lead character, I will go out on a limb and
say that this movie would have crashed and burned within the first ten
minutes. But since it is Jack, no matter how unlikable the character is, you
still have to begrudgingly be rooting for him. Nicholson injected enough
humor into the part to prevent me from hating the character. As for Helen
Hunt, I have no idea why she ever won an Oscar for her performance. Her
acting abilities are not bad, but the character was so whiny that I kept
wondering what the heck Nicholson's character saw in her. Next to Nicholson,
Greg Kinnear gave the most solid performance in this film, although even he
was also a little on the whiny side. Cuba Gooding Jr. should also be
mentioned as one of Kinnear's gay friends. Cuba stole every scene he was in,
including those that he shared with Nicholson -- no small feat.
Aside From the good performances from Nicholson, Kinnear, and Gooding, there
is really no other reason to recommend that people actually sit through As
Good As It Gets. The love story isn't that compelling. I never cared if
Nicholson and Hunt ever got together. On top of that, Nicholson mellowed far
too quickly for my liking. At the first of the film he was just plain
obnoxious, towards the end he was almost likable which seemed to be just a
little too convenient for my tastes. As Good As It Gets ranks as one of the
bigger disappointments in recent years.

Title
Review for Anaconda (1997)
Starring Jennifer Lopez; Ice Cube; Jon Voight; Eric Stoltz & Jonathan Hyde
OK, so Anaconda is not going to go down in history as the greatest film ever
made. For that matter, not even anywhere near the top of the list. But it's
a fun little movie none the less. You simply have to take it for what it
is -- the kind of movie that you watch for some light entertainment, nothing
more, nothing less. I can say that I was disappointed in one area though,
and that was special effects. Before seeing this film, I kept hearing about
the great snake effects. Well friends, they might have been great compared
to the special effects on an old episode of Star Trek, but they weren't
anything to write home about compared to what audiences are used to today.
As computer generated animal effects go -- if you compared the snake in
Anaconda to the dinosaurs in Jurassic Park -- these effects look downright
cheesy. But that's OK, because it goes along well with the cheesy acting of
most of the film's stars. Most notably, Jon Voight. Now my guess is that
this was the effect that the filmmakers were going for, because Jon Voight
is just too fine an actor to give an over the top performance like this
without it being intentional. Although I do think he should have put a
little extra effort into what turned out to be a really bad accent. As I
said, the producers seemed to want to inject an element of camp into just
about every aspect of this film, and they certainly accomplished that goal.
The basic premise goes something like this -- a documentary film crew is
sailing up the Amazon River to make a movie. The crew includes Ice Cube and
bodacious babe Jennifer Lopez. Along the way, they meet up with snake hunter
Jon Voight. When one of the crew gets injured, Voight's character convinces
them to take a shortcut so they can get the man back to civilization for
medical attention. What they don't know is that his shortcut also happens to
be the home turf of a very large, and very mean, anaconda. The anaconda, by
the way, isn't accepting visitors.
In Anaconda, acting and plot take a back seat to the computer-generated
snake. Let's not pussyfoot around it, Anaconda is just one big showcase for
the snake. It is never a good idea when little things like plot are pushed
aside for the special effects. It becomes even worse when the special
effects stink. In some scenes the stupid snake looks so bad that you would
think that they had a bunch of 5 year olds with a pack of crayons doing the
animation. OK, maybe it's not that bad, but you get the point. When they
base a movie around special effects it would be nice if they actually had
spent money on the special effects. Or better yet, hired people who knew how
to create them properly.
Anaconda is campy -- not a bad thing had the snake made up for the camp. The
only reason I can really recommend this film would be for the fact that
Jennifer Lopez is hot and sweaty throughout. For my money, worth the price
of admission any day of the week. But other than Ms. Lopez's perspiration,
there is really nothing else that warrants an exuberant recommendation for
this movie.

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
Starring Thomas Jane; Saffron Burrows; Samuel L. Jackson; Jaqueline McKenzie
& Michael Rapaport
Let me first start out by saying that Steven Speilberg made the greatest
shark film ever made with Jaws. But Renny Harlin has come in a very, very,
very close second with Deep Blue Sea. Deep Blue Sea is easily the best new
movie that I have seen this year, and is far and away the best of the crop
from the summer of '99. Sure, The Phantom Menace was spectacular, but no
movie has been this much fun in a long time. I can honestly say that do not
remember ever having jumped so much during a film. When I was not jumping in
my seat, my hands were firmly grasping the armrests steeling myself for the
next scare that I knew was going to be right around the corner. At one point
in his career, director Renny Harlin looked as if he may easily become one
of the best directors in the business. His successes included Die Hard 2 and
Cliffhanger. In recent years he has faltered, making such fare as Cutthroat
Island. Well, Renny is back, and with a vengeance.
Saffron Burrows stars as the head of a scientific research team that is
trying to develop a cure for Alzheimer's disease. Their potential cure
involves extracting fluids from the brains of mako sharks. In order to get
as much as they can, they have genetically enlarged the size of the shark's
brains. You can probably guess where this is headed. Bigger shark brains
equal smarter sharks. And these smart sharks have a distinct attitude
problem. Burrows and her crew, along with Samuel L. Jackson (playing the man
funding their research) are all on board their research lab in the middle of
the Pacific during a severe storm. This is when they realize that the sharks
are now Einsteins with big teeth. They quickly find out that the sharks are
looking for a meal and that they are the main course on the menu.
Let me first start with the flaws of this movie, as minor as they are. The
writers obviously watched Jaws and it's first sequel a few times, since they
do seem to "borrow" a few things from those two movies. This minor lack of
creativity can very quickly be excused though. The writers then proceed to
apparently borrow a few other things from these films, only to end up
throwing the audience for a bit of a loop. Let's be real clear, this is not
a real deep movie (if you'll pardon the pun). It is written with scares in
mind. And on that count, it delivers beautifully. In many cases, I had a
pretty good idea what was going to happen next -- but I didn't care. I was
just having too much fun. Of course, part of the fun in these types of
movies comes at the first of the movie when you can go through the cast a
pick which ones are going to be shark food and which ones are going to
return in any potential sequels. Most times the audience can guess pretty
accurately. This movie is no exception. Although, I can almost guarantee
that nobody is going to be 100% accurate on their predictions.
The special effects are excellent. Every bit of what one would expect from a
summer popcorn flick like this. The underwater sequences are particularly
impressive as are the real stars of the movie -- the three mako sharks. The
sharks were done with a combination of live shots, animatronics and live
action. For the most part they are all blended fairly seamlessly together.
The sets are amazing. This lab is supposed to be an old World War II sub
base and it is very cool. I must admit that I'm always a sucker for the old
flooded-set movies with everyone running around waist deep in water. This
one is particularly well done -- mostly because you are never quite sure
what is swimming around under that water.
Samuel L. Jackson is always a whole lot of fun to watch, so it should come
as no surprise that he is his usual cool self here. Mark my words, English
beauty Saffron Burrows is one her way to superstardom. She has a commanding
presence on screen and rivaled Jackson's talent in the acting department.
Plus, that accent is just so darn sexy. The real surprise is LL Cool J. He
has done a pretty decent job in his past films, but he absolutely,
unequivocally steals this movie. This guy is great. On top of every other
wonderful point of this movie, his scenes were the highlights.
The special effects were very plentiful, but I never found myself being
overpowered by them. The other thing that surprised me was the noticeable
lack of gore in this film. Sure, you have a couple of scenes -- it wouldn't
be a killer shark movie without people being eaten -- but the restraint
shown on the old blood and guts was commendable. It seems as though
everything that Renny Harlin tried in this movie worked. That included a
cheesecake shot where Burrows strips down to her skivvies. You almost buy
that she is down to her bra and panties because it is integral to the story
line and not because Harlin wants to show off her fabulous body. Almost, but
not quite. But, if Harlin feels he has to include shots like that, I guess
we are just going to have to suffer through them. Oh, the agony.
I loved this movie. Everything about it was just plain fun. It was scary, it
was fast paced, but above all, it is the kind of movie that makes me
remember why I love going to the movies. Go see Deep Blue Sea -- you will
not be disappointed.

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
Starring Jennifer Love Hewitt; Freddie Prinze Jr.; Brandy; Mekhi Phifer &
Muse Watson
I have to admit that I avoided going to see this film in the theater. Quite
frankly, while I am a fan of Jennifer Love Hewitt's breasts, I don't think
that they should be the entire selling feature of a movie. That is how it
seems to be in I Still Know What You Did Last Summer. The more accurate
title might have been I Still Know What Jennifer Love Hewitt's Breasts Did
Last Summer, since they appear to be the stars of the show. And very
impressive stars at that... But, I digress. Of course the other obvious flaw
in the title of this little gem is the fact that the events referred to in
the title actually happened two summers before this film takes place. So I
don't think that it requires some sort of advanced university degree to
figure out that the title really should be I Still Know What You Did Two
Summers Ago. Either the producers think that the audience that is stupid
enough to pay to watch this thing will miss this small point or maybe they
aren't real adept at reading a calendar. This second option holds some
appeal for me since it is fairly obvious that they aren't real adept at
making movies either.
If this were some B-grade straight-to-video knock off that had at its core a
bad story, dumb villain and an abnormal obsession with Ms. Hewitt's breasts,
I'd say, "OK, I'll happily sit here and watch her breasts for a couple of
hours". The fact is that this is a sequel to one of the better horror films
of the past few years, so I expected a little more. (Story wise, not breast
wise.) If you are beginning to think that I might have some sort of
obsession with Ms. Hewitt's chest, it's really not so. Although I am an
admirer. It seems that this film is truly based around her chest. All of the
publicity shots from this film inevitably show her in some low cut number.
And she always seems to be a little damp. Every time this turkey gets a
little slow (which is all too frequent) the camera inevitably pans over and
focuses in on her chest. I kid you not. It almost makes me think that the
producers knew that what they had on their hands film wise wasn't what you'd
call a masterpiece. So they figured that the only way that they were going
to get anyone in theaters was to pander to the lowest denominator --
over-sexed teenage boys. My guess is that this group predominated the
tickets sold for I Still Know's theatrical run.
Gone is the clever Kevin Williamson script from the first film. In its wake
is every tired and overused horror film cliché from the past twenty years. I
guessed who the killer was the first time that that person was on camera,
and I'm not exactly a rocket scientist. I'm not even going to get into the
ending of the first film that, without giving it away, didn't exactly seem
to lend itself to a sequel.
No matter, here we are again and Jennifer Love Hewitt is back at university
a year after most of her friends were killed by a hook-wielding fisherman.
She has finally getting a little good luck in her life. Her roommate
(Brandy) wins a radio contest and the two roomies, with two guys in tow,
head off on a free weekend in the Bahamas. Of course, the hotel is on a
small and mostly deserted island (how convenient) and a hurricane is just
blowing in as they arrive (you can't make a formula horror film without high
winds and rain). Sorry if I spoil any surprise kids, but guess what? Our old
buddy the hook-wielding fisherman turns up on the island with them and
starts slicing and dicing people one by one.
The only positive thing that I can say about this movie is that at least
this time the killer fisherman, who I have long considered to be one of the
dumbest slasher film killers ever (he would be the dumbest if it weren't for
Leatherface) is at least dressed somewhat properly here. Since they are in
the middle of a hurricane, his black rain hat and slicker don't look too out
of place. Unlike in the first movie when he seemingly wandered around
unnoticed in the middle of a hot sunny day wearing the same ridiculous
getup.
Acting wise -- lets just say everyone avoids embarrassing themselves. Not
much else can be said for the cast. Holdovers from the first film Jennifer
Love Hewitt and Freddie Prinze Jr., proved in the original that they are
talented actors. Unfortunately, the script of this latest film doesn't give
them any material to enforce that.
In the end, this is a B-grade slasher flick from the word go. If it wasn't
for the fact that it is the sequel to the very clever I Know What You Did
Last Summer and for the fact that it boasts Jennifer Love Hewitt and Freddie
Prinze Jr. in the cast, this film would wind up collecting dust on the shelf
of your local video store. Sadly, it is very obvious that Hollywood hot shot
Kevin Williamson was not involved in this project to give it the same depth
that he injected in to the first one.
6/10 -- 4 for the movie and 2 for Jennifer Love Hewitt's breasts

Title
Review for Caddyshack (1980)
Starring Chevy Chase; Rodney Dangerfield; Ted Knight; Michael O'Keefe & Bill
Murray
I remember really enjoying this movie when I saw it years ago. I guess my
memory really sucks.
There is very, very little that is funny in Caddyshack. The laughs are few,
and far between, and what there are really aren't that great.
Caddyshack, as the name implies, more or less centers on one young caddy
working at an exclusive country club. Michael O'Keefe plays said caddy. Why
they cast this unknown, fairly untalented actor in the lead role is
completely beyond me. The movie doesn't seem to have a real plot, just a
series of scenes that are little more than opportunities for the rest of the
cast to mug at the camera. The only real story, if you can call it that, was
a subplot involving the mentally disturbed greens keeper, Bill Murray, who
is having his own private little war against a gopher who is ruining the
course.
Most of the marginal laughs come from Rodney Dangerfield and Ted Knight
mugging and overacting for the camera -- with painfully limited success.
Bill Murray is slightly amusing in places, but fairly wasted. The biggest
waste of all is Chevy Chase, who didn't even crack a smile on my face with
his character's lame Zen-like approach to golfing. There are a few decent
scenes involving the interaction between Dangerfield and Knight, but they
are far too infrequent to carry the movie.
I guess that's what you get for basing a story around an unknown kid. I'm
not sure what the writers of this thing were thinking of, but I really think
it was something far removed from comedy as they were putting pen to paper.
Nothing about this movie works. It wouldn't have taken a genius to figure
out that this thing wasn't going to fly. Most of the scenes just couldn't
possibly be funny. It's as if the writers where off in their own little
brain damaged world. I'm sure scenes involving Chevy Chase and his oneness
with the golf ball were supposed to be funny. In reality, they were
painfully embarrassing to watch. There is a scene at the club pool where all
the caddies go wild for the "hot babe" of the movie walking by in her
bikini. Olive Oil would have filled out this swimsuit better than this girl.
Everything about this movie was just completely implausible as far as the
comedy was concerned. Maybe if you were drunk out of you mind or high off
some sort of illegal narcotic this thing might be funny. But for the rest of
us, stay the hell away from Caddyshack.

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
Starring Neve Campbell; David Arquette; Courtney Cox & Sarah Michelle Gellar
Somebody is taking their love of sequels too far. Although it isn't Wes
Craven. If ever a horror movie deserved a sequel, it was Scream. The
original was, in this reviewer's humble opinion, the best horror film of all
time. While scream 2 might not be number 2 on the list, it is certainly top
5.
Scream 2 picks up a couple of years after the first movie left off. Sidney
Prescott (Neve Campbell) has gone off to university as has one of the few
survivors of the first blood bath, film trivia buff Randy Meeks (Jamie
Kennedy) who steals most of the scenes he is in, as he did in the first
film. Enough time has elapsed so that journalist Gale Weathers (Courtney
Cox) has written a book about the original murders, and it has been made
into its own slasher flick "Stab". The release of Stab has obviously given
someone a few ideas. The murders begin again. It seems our friend in the
black cloak and goulish white mask has been lurking around again and toting
a very sharp knife that is just perfect for carving up coeds at Sidney's
university.
Also returning from the first film is David Arquette playing deputy Dewey
Riley. Joining the cast for this go round are Buffy The Vampire Slayer's
Sarah Michelle Gellar as a sorority sister and Slider's Jerry O'Connell as
Sidney's new boyfriend.
It is hard to compare the sequel to the original. Scream 2 has the same
great dialogue as the first film and continues the great parody of slasher
films and pop culture. The only problem is it is not as new any more. When
Scream came out no one had ever seen a slasher film so well made before, so
it had the extra advantage of never having been tried. With scream 2, the
solid writing and plot twists are expected, so in small way it takes a
little bit of the fun out of it. Scream 2 is definitely the best horror film
you will see this year. (Although Screenwriter Kevin Williamson's other
horror film of 1997, I Know What You Did Last Summer, is close second.) A
word to the wise though, this is not a film for younger children or the
easily upset. This is a very violent and bloody film. Those that saw the
first film will know what to expect. Word to the wise #2 -- Those that
haven't seen the first film should go out and rent it before seeing Scream
2. Unlike the slasher films of yore this movie has a plot and that plot is
heavily dependent upon the fact that the audience has to be real familiar
with the events of the first movie. Trust me, if you haven't seen the first
film, not only will you miss out on most of the inside jokes in the film you
will be completely lost before you get halfway through this movie.
It is great to see TV stars Courtney Cox, Neve Campbell, Sarah Michelle
Gellar and Jerry O'Connell move to the big screen. It proves that TV stars
really can carry a big screen effort. Although, they owe a lot of thanks to
Kevin Williamson's screenplay and the direction of Wes Craven. I guess if
you put all the right people together on a project you can't help making a
good movie. Too bad Hollywood doesn't come to that conclusion more often.
One of the best horror films you will see this year 8/10

Title
Review for Sudden Death (1995)
Starring Jean-Claude Van Damme; Powers Boothe; Raymond J. Barry & Whittni
Wright
The Muscles from Brussels is back. This time good old Jean-Claude Van Damme
plays a fire marshal who just happens to be assigned to check the arena for
fire violations before an N.H.L. playoff game. Now this normally would not
be much of a basis for a movie. (Not even a Van Damme movie.) If you throw
in the fact that the Vice President of the United States is going to be in
attendance at this game, and then add a few terrorists to the whole mix, you
may have the ingredients for a half decent little action thriller. Maybe.
Powers Boothe plays Joshua Foss, a terrorist who decides that he wants a
little cash. He figures the best way to do that is by taking over the
private box that the Vice President is watching the game from by using men
with big guns. Just to make sure he has everyone's attention he wires the
whole arena with explosives. If anyone tries to get in or out of the arena,
they are in for a little surprise.
Now back to our hero. Well good old Jean-Claude's character, Darren McCord,
has taken his two kids to see the game while he does whatever it is fire
inspectors do during a hockey game. As bad timing would have it, he manages
to be in the wrong place at the wrong time and it is up to him to
single-handedly save everyone in the building, including the Vice President,
assorted dignitaries and his two kids. The burning question here is -- Gee,
will he manage to do it? Well, I'm pretty sure that you can take a wild stab
at that one.
Maybe I'm being a little hard on the plot line, but it deserves it. As
original as this idea is, and to the writers credit it is an original idea,
they just take it waaaay over the top here. I'm not going to give anything
away but lets just say there is really no need of our intrepid fire marshal
getting into hand to hand combat on the peak of the roof of the stadium.
All right, I've made my cracks. If you can get by the total lack of
believability in the plot you will find Jean-Claude giving one of his best
performances to date. (Let's face it, if you enjoy this type of film you
realize that in most cases plot is an afterthought at the best of times.) We
still aren't talking a possible best actor nomination here, but his acting
skills do seem to be getting better. Powers Boothe is great as the villain.
While he is truly evil, somehow you have to like him. It's a shame Boothe
isn't more widely recognized for his work, or for that matter given better
roles, since he is always a lot if fun to watch on screen.
I've got a few other beefs with this film. One of them is a subplot
involving how Van Damme's character came to become a fire inspector. As a
firefighter a child died as he was trying to save her, and he hasn't been
the same since. I really don't know why this story line was included in the
film. Perhaps it was to make him more sympathetic and make us root for him
against the bad guys all that much harder. Although I was left asking why
are they wasting my time on this crap?
In the end I would say that I would probably recommend this film to Van
Damme fans or to those who just love action flicks regardless of the
questionable writing. To everyone else out there, I would have to say that
there are better Van Damme films out there. If you are in the mood for the
"one guy takes on as bunch of terrorists" theme -- rent the original
Diehard.
